 the high-yielding, high-risk paper that let self-styled raiders terrorize corporate giants, fueled company growth, buy-outs and mergers, and made some of its purveyors billionaires -- seems to be coming to an end.  As prices plunged last week, market professionals sounded both nostalgic and apprehensive about the go-go decade of the 1980s even as they talked about a new, more cautious era where merger deals and buy-outs are likely to be much tougher to finance.  Even Michael Milken, who personified the junk-bond market until his indictment on 98 felony counts earlier this year, calls for a return to equity.  In a talk to big junk-bond buyers last week, Mr. Milken told them it was time for some companies to de-leverage, urging many companies to swap their junk debt for a combination of equity and higher-grade debt carrying a lower interest burden.  Spurred by the troubles of highly-leveraged retailer Campeau Corp., a disorderly rout last week slashed an estimated $10 billion of value out of the $200 billion junk market.  Many investors who wanted to sell couldn't find any buyers, and there were widespread fears that some junk-bond financed companies, despite the relatively strong economy, were close to defaulting on their heavy interest payments.  "This is the junk-bond market's October 19," says Lazard Freres & Co. investment banker Stephen Rattner, referring to the date of the stock market's 1987 crash.  Mr. Rattner, who has used junk bonds to finance many merger deals, notes that while last week's decline "looks like a cataclysmic event," dissatisfaction with the junk market "has been building for a while."  Nobody thinks the junk market will collapse, but on the other hand, nobody's sure just how long the current outbreak of panic selling will last.  At the Beverly Hills operation of Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., once Mr. Milken's redoubt and still the most important investment bank in the junk market, there is a conspicuous lack of confidence.  "I don't have an answer" to how bad things will get, says Joseph W. Harch, co-head of junk-bond sales for Drexel.  "We'd be taking big positions if we knew."  Last week's nosedive sent shock waves through Wall Street, hurting stock prices at times and producing some unusual, panic-driven developments.  "Things were so crazy that I actually heard that I was dead," says Raymond Minella, co-head of Merrill Lynch & Co.'s merchant banking division, which includes the junk-bond unit.  At Morgan Stanley & Co., "a lot of us had the cold sweats," says a junk-bond trader who asked not to be identified.  "You just didn't want to pick up the phone because it might require you to do the one transaction that would wipe out your year-end bonus."  Junk bonds will undoubtedly continue to be an important part of the financial landscape, and some have rushed to defend the market's long-term viability.  "I would be far from taking the view that (the current collapse of prices) is a nail in the coffin of the junk-bond market," says John Brookmeyer, a senior investment official at Prudential Insurance Co. of America, the nation's largest insurer and one of the top three investors in the junk market.  Nevertheless, Mr. Brookmeyer acknowledges that many of the junk bonds in his portfolio took some serious body blows since August.  He also concedes that almost a year ago, Prudential, suspecting trouble, decided to drastically upgrade the quality of bonds in its $6 billion junk portfolio.  Prudential wasn't alone.  Many junk-bond investors, including mutual funds, have been anticipating a downturn and increased the amount of cash they have in their accounts relative to junk bonds.  Many investment bankers and major institutional investors say the current crunch in the junk market will have long-lasting effects on the volume and pace of corporate mergers and buy-outs, which so dramatically reshaped the face of corporate America in the 1980s and which were often fueled by junk bonds.  "It seems fairly clear that financial buyers, or bust-up artists, are going to have a much harder time putting companies into play," says Lazard's Mr. Rattner.  Even before last week's rout, some corporate acquirers and takeover artists had been shunning the junk-bond market because they feared the presence of junk bond financing damaged their credibility and gave their targets grounds for impugning their bids.  Two of this year's biggest takeovers, those of airlines NWA Inc. and UAL Corp., have been junkless -- funded by equity and bank debt.  This year's biggest attempted hostile raid in the U.S., Paramount Communications Inc.'s failed $10.7 billion bid for Time Inc., relied solely on bank loans for financing the initial offer.  Some takeover professionals, looking for any semblance of a silver lining, argue that the easy accessibility of junk bonds led many bidders to over-price takeovers, such as Campeau's acquisition of Allied and Federated, and now deals will be able to be done at more realistic levels.  "Prices will come down some, to a point where you can get the deals done because they make more sense," says Charles Nathan, co-head of mergers and acquisitions at Salomon Brothers Inc.  Of course, cheaper takeover prices could be bad news for the stock market, especially stocks of companies perceived as takeover targets, since takeover speculation has been a driving force in the post-crash recovery.  But Mr. Milken, seemingly siding with his critics who have argued that many companies' stock prices have been held down by the burdensome interest payments called for by their junk bonds, argues that a shift away from junk is now the best way for investors to make money.  Speaking to a group of junk-bond buyers at an Institute for International Research in New York late last week, Mr. Milken said that rather than using junk bonds to buy out companies' stock, investors should instead buy companies' junk through a combination of equity and higher-grade debt.  "You have much, much higher returns if you raise the capital and buy the debt of the company," he said.  Such comments are an abrupt departure from the once-prevailing view that junk bonds could justify paying almost any price for a company.  Now, more and more acquisitions and buy-outs from the last decade appear to be highly unsound, and are running into what appear to be insurmountable debt burdens.  Veteran corporate raider Carl Icahn says he believes we are entering an erawhere the acquirers of such unsound targets and their junk-bond investors "are going to have to pay the piper."  Already paying is Robert Campeau, who has now lost voting control of his department store empire to a group of investors and lenders.  The full extent of Campeau Corp.'s problems remains unknown.  More debt-laden companies could run into similar if not more dire straits, particularly if the economy takes a turn for the worse.  Such companies would be restructured either in or out of bankruptcy court, with junk-bond holders undoubtedly being asked to sustain major losses.  The rise of junk bonds -- and the corporate restructuring they fostered -- was arguably the most important financial development of the 1980s.  Raiders began attacking big corporations using junk bonds.  Then corporate America realized it could use junk bonds to defend itself, with recapitalizations and leveraged buy-outs that put billions of dollars of junk debt on companies' balance sheets.  Some milestones in the junk era: In 1979, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. acquired Houdaille Industries Inc., the first New York Stock Exchange-listed company to be snapped up in a leveraged buy-out; in 1984, T. Boone Pickens Jr., backed by Drexel and a huge offer of junk bonds, launched an unsuccessful but lucrative $13 billion hostile bid for Gulf Oil Co., showing that no company was too big to be immune from junk-bond attack; in 1986, KKR snapped up Beatrice Cos. for $6.2 billion, then a record price for an LBO, selling $2 billion in junk bonds through Drexel.  Junk bonds made celebrities out of previously anonymous businessmen like Mr. Milken, who earned $550 million in 1986; Ronald Perelman, who wrested control of glamorous Revlon Co. and became a billionaire, and LBO magnate and socialite Henry Kravis of KKR, which earlier this year completed the largest takeover in history, the junk-financed $25.3 billion buyout of RJR Nabisco Inc.  Then, just as the triumph of junk bonds seemed complete, Mr. Milken was forced out of Drexel Burnham earlier this year under a plea bargain the securities firm reached with the government.  Mr. Milken was considered a master at exchanging junk bonds on the verge of default for new bonds, a practice that may have artifically lowered the reported default rate of high-yield bonds.  Many in Mr. Milken's awesome network of junk-bonds buyers were either so loyal -- or so beholden -- that they willingly bought or sold on his advice.  Some investors believe the junk-bond market's current problems are attributable to the absence of Mr. Milken as chief market maker.  Mr. Milken couldn't be reached for comment, a spokesman said.  A Drexel spokesman said, "This is a professional market with hundreds of people on the buy and sell side.  The market responds to its own supply and demand characteristics and to major defaults."  Others, too, say Mr. Milken's absence is coincidence, and the market's current problems would have arisen whether Mr. Milken was active in the market or not.  For example, in April, a Harvard University study cast doubt on the relative safety of junk bonds, finding that junk bonds have a default rate of 34%, or much higher than the rate junk-bond professionals have boasted about.  Next came a few high-profile defaults.  Integrated Resources Inc., a Drexel client, defaulted in July on nearly $1 billion in debt; Resorts International Inc. failed to meet interest payments on $925 million in junk debt.  All told, more than $3 billion in junk bonds have defaulted this year, a substantial increase.  Meanwhile, Congress, in its massive bailout of the thrift industry, is pressuring thrifts to sell junk bonds; they own an estimated $13.5 billion of junk bonds, or about 7% of junk bonds outstanding.  Indicators have pointed to a sick junk-bond market since this spring.  Many junk-bond prices tilted lower despite a big drop in interest rates and no signs of recession.  So far this year, the returns to investors from junk bonds have been far outstripped by returns from almost every sector of investment-grade debt securities, including Treasury, corporate and mortgage-backed bonds.  Now Wall Street itself, which made so much money from the junk-bond craze, is being stung by the junk-market shakeout.  Not only do many Wall Street firms own hundreds of millions of dollars in junk bonds, but Wall Street also has sizeable amounts of its own capital tied up in what were supposed to be short-term loans to clients that made acquisitions.  The loans were supposed to be replaced by sales of junk bonds, but with that market so uncertain, it isn't clear when the Wall Street firms will be able to get their money back.  At First Boston Corp., which advised and helped finance Campeau's burgeoning retail empire, the collapse of Allied and Federated bonds have saddled the investment bank with paper losses totaling well over $100 million on Campeau-unit bonds it owns.  Campeau "has been a career shortner," says a First Boston executive.  First Boston, following its failure to sell $475 million of junk bonds for Ohio Mattress (now dubbed "burning bed" among traders), has its own capital locked in a "bridge loan"; it also shares a $400 million bridge loan to Federated with PaineWebber Inc. and Dillon Read & Co., and has a $1 billion bridge in place for the $1.2 billion acquisition of the Petrolane unit of Texas Eastern.  Merrill Lynch has about $1.4 billion of bridge loans outstanding; the largest is a $1 billion bridge to Time Warner.  Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. also has a $1 billion bridge loan outstanding to Time Warner.  Drexel, the leading underwriter of junk bonds, says it has only $400 million in bridge loans outstanding, but industry executives say it has the Street's largest portfolio of junk bonds.  A spokesman declined to quantify Drexel's exposure.  For a while, the junk-bond market seemed to be a liquid public market.  Now, it is being exposed for what it really is: A place where highly risky loans to lower quality companies are traded.  As recent days have demonstrated, the market's liquidity can be thin or non-existant at times.  Price quotations have recently varied widely from sale prices actually realized by bondholders.  Yet despite its current problems, investment professionals say there will continue to be junk-bond offerings for solid companies with good earnings which for any number of reasons don't qualify for a higher-quality debt rating.  But the distinction between "good junk" and "bad junk" will be crucial, both for underwriters and investors.  "People have tried to make the junk-bond market into a commodity market, but it isn't," says Drexel's Mr. Harch.  "The market is very credit specific and will become more so."  An example of a solid company that seems to have thrived on the strength of junk-bond financing is FMC Corp., which makes armored combat vehicles and other military equipment.  In 1986, the company, its shareholders and employees bought out its stock in a leveraged buy-out financed by junk.  Last week, as other junk issues fell, FMC's $200 million issue closed little changed.  Says Amy Minella, a manager of junk-bond investments for closely held Deltec Securities Corp., FMC "is just another example of the junk bonds that deserve a wide investment following."  ---  Linda Sandler contributed to this article.  ---  @ A Fast Growing Market's Recent Woes  Total returns (price and income) for the periods ended Sept. 15, 1989  @ Last Year-  @ Week to-Date  @Long-term U.S. Treasurys 0.206% 14.983%  @Long-term Investment-Grade Corporations 0.247 12.559  @Investment-Grade Corporates  @ (all maturities) 0.421 11.332  @U.S.  Treasurys (all maturities) 0.450 11.086  @Mortgages 0.687 11.055  @Junk Bonds -1.581 5.240  @Source: Merrill Lynch Capital Markets  The wedding of UAL Corp.'s management and pilot union prompts the same question as any shotgun marriage: How long can it last?  Though driven together by their desire to block an outside bid for the company, the two groups pursuing UAL are more accustomed to combat than collaboration.  Until recently, United Airlines' pilots were still staging a work slowdown in protest of management's demands for contract concessions.  And it wasn't so long ago that UAL Chairman Stephen M. Wolf vowed to oppose any employee bid for the company -- saying he didn't want the pilot union for a boss.  In May 1988, Mr. Wolf wrote a letter to employees, blasting an earlier $4 billion takeover proposal from the pilot union.  "We do not see how {employee} ownership . . . of a debt-laden United benefits our pilots or other employees," he wrote, adding, "We believe that a costly adviser group to our pilots has done them a disservice."  Now these longtime adversaries have teamed up to launch the most ambitious experiment yet in employee ownership.  Last week, UAL's directors approved a $6.75 billion joint offer submitted by the pilot union, UAL senior managers and British Airways PLC.  The transaction, which still faces several hurdles, would give employees and management 85% ownership, making UAL the largest worker-owned company in the nation by a wide margin over the next biggest, Avis Inc.  The buy-out would also reshape corporate governance at UAL, giving union employees broad new powers.  For example, they would get three of 15 seats on the board, the same number as management.  Moreover, management would be required to meet regularly with labor representatives to thrash out corporate policy.  Yet, despite the board's endorsement, questions already are being raised about how well the plan would work.  Besides the huge debt required to finance the transaction, there is skepticism about whether a management-union partnership could be nimble enough to compete effectively in the rough-and-tumble airline industry.  "It's going to be very tough to manage," says Wesley G. Kaldahl, retired senior vice president of American Airlines.  "It's something that's never been tried and been truly made to work" in such a sizable company, he adds.  Even some key players in the labor-management bid say the alliance could prove fragile.  "This isn't a marriage made in heaven," says one person involved in putting the bid together.  "This is a marriage of convenience."  Employee ownership has produced mixed results in other industries.  Studies by the government's General Accounting Office and the private National Center for Employee Ownership show that, in many cases, productivity doesn't improve as expected.  Labor is also sometimes reluctant to take steps to improve efficiency.  Within the airline business, such arrangements haven't fared much better.  A 1984 employee-ownership plan at Eastern Airlines that gave workers broad representation faltered quickly.  "Both union leaders and senior managers kept letting their personal differences interfere," says Joseph Blasi, a Rutgers University professor who studied the Eastern situation.  Mr. Blasi says Eastern's managers never looked upon labor's board members as equals.  Labor, meanwhile, used its board seats to haggle over wages.  "United has to guard against the same thing happening," he cautions.  For now, however, the honeymoon is on at UAL.  The pilots, Mr. Wolf says, "have been guided throughout our discussions by a desire to do what is best for their membership and United."  He predicts that the buy-out would infuse UAL with "entrepreneurial vigor."  Most pilot-union leaders chalk up their past disputes with management to traditional collective-bargaining posturing.  Over the weekend, the union began asking its members to discard all anti-management buttons and stickers from the cockpits of United's jets.  "We must now demonstrate that employee ownership means cooperation and employee-management peace," said J. Stephen Smith, vice chairman of the United pilot union, in a message to members.  So far, reaction from the pilot union rank and file has been positive.  "I personally feel there's no other choice," says Robert McGowan, a DC-10 co-pilot based in California.  Mr. McGowan says he's talked to some 75 pilots in the past few days who believe "it's better for employees to be owners and operators than for some speculator to come in and raid the airline."  There is still a chance the plan could collapse.  Among other things, the pilot union has to persuade its members to give up $250 million in concessions (which go beyond what it has denied management) and to transfer $200 million out of one of their pension plans.  What's more, the machinists and flight attendants at United haven't decided whether they will formally support the bid.  Brian M. Freeman, the machinists' financial adviser, has accused the pilot union of using "blue-collar-mail" to force the other unions to support their bid "just so they can declare victory."  Partly because of these uncertainties, Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis, whose own takeover proposal was what sparked the battle for the airline several weeks ago, wrote to the UAL board last week to say he would remain in the wings with a competing bid -- betting, in effect, that his best chance is to wait for the management-pilot plan to fall through.  If the employee buy-out does succeed, both labor and management will be under considerable pressure to make it work, especially if an economic downturn destroys profits and management has to ask the pilots for new wage reductions and productivity gains.  "One of the most perilous issues is whether labor and management can function under economic pressures of a high debt load, with little room to maneuver," says Mr. Blasi, the Rutgers professor.  Airlines could well face profit-eating fare wars and fuel-cost increases in the near future, says John Pincavage of the Transportation Group, a New York investment-banking firm.  He also notes that yields, or the amount of profit airlines take in on ticket sales, declined in June and July.  To help pay for the takeover, the buy-out group is borrowing $7.2 billion.  That debt will cost the company $600 million to $700 million in interest payments a year.  At its current operating level, analysts say, United generates about $1.1 billion in cash annually to pay its interest bill.  The pilot concessions would add only modestly to that.  "That doesn't leave a big cushion," says Helane Becker, an analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  A 6.5% drop in United's revenue, projected at $9.1 billion for this year, would be enough to wipe out its profit, Ms. Becker notes.  Such concerns are likely to prompt a serious review of the proposed transaction by the Department of Transportation, which could threaten to suspend United's operating certificate if it appears that financial problems would undermine safety.  UAL and pilot-union advisers say tax advantages available to employee stock-ownership plans would help the company pay down its debt more rapidly.  UAL can deduct from its federal taxes the principal it borrows to pay for the employee stake.  And because its lenders can deduct 50% of the interest they earn on UAL's loan, the buy-out group has been able to line up financing at a more favorable interest rate.  The two groups have also attempted to head off potential conflicts through a number of special provisions in their plan, says Stuart Oran, a lawyer with Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison who is serving as the pilots' legal adviser.  The pilot-union leaders, for instance, have agreed not to strike for at least seven years and have promised concessions -- including a 10% pay cut, fewer vacation days, more flying hours and higher medical deductibles -- that just a few months ago the union said would lead to "indentured servitude."  The difference now, says Frederick C. Dubinsky, chairman of United's pilot union, is that "we wouldn't be investing in someone else's company, but in one we own."  In return for the concessions, management has consented to meet on a monthly basis with labor leaders to foster "an environment of mutual trust."  The two sides also agreed to a special task force so that captains could directly communicate their suggestions for running the airline more efficiently to management.  Moreover, employees would have "super-majority voting rights" to block certain moves, such as major sales of routes or aircraft, and could influence the selection of eight outside directors who would make up the majority of UAL's board.  But will management find this arrangement too much of a straitjacket?  Until two months ago, Mr. Wolf, the UAL chairman, appeared steadfastly opposed to giving the pilots any additional say in the company.  In a recent letter to employees, he hinted at the shotgun nature of the alliance, explaining that he had become convinced UAL would succumb to a takeover following Mr. Davis's $240-a-share, $5.75 billion, offer last month.  "The only question was not 'Will it happen?' but 'What form it will it take?'" he wrote.  A UAL spokesman says that, once the situation became clear, Mr. Wolf decided the best course was to put the company in employee hands.  Still, tensions arise.  Even after the two sides had submitted their joint offer to the board, they fought over UAL's request to call the bid "management-led."  Mr. Wolf isn't known for being cozy with labor.  As chairman of Tiger International Inc. a few years ago, he once told the unions that if they didn't agree to wage concessions, Tiger's board would liquidate the company within 24 hours.  When the pilots dawdled over signing an agreement, he went ahead and imposed the reductions.  At United, the cool, reserved Mr. Wolf has held his distance with union leaders.  Because of his refusal to budge in contract negotiations with the flight-attendant union, the attendants haven't had a pay raise since November 1986.  The pilots have been working without a contract for more than 18 months.  Relations between UAL and the pilots had been rocky for a year before United became a takeover target.  Pilots simmered over a memo Mr. Wolf sent out in July of 1988 about the need to cut labor costs.  Mr. Wolf wanted more productivity, an extension of a lower-wage "B scale" and a freeze on the wages of higher-paid pilots.  The message didn't sit well with pilots at a time when United was enjoying record profits.  What irked them in particular was that the UAL board had paid Mr. Wolf a $5.8 million bonus in 1988.  Mr. Dubinsky, the United pilot-union chairman, warned of a strike this fall, and in recent months relations reached new lows.  To protest the lack of progress in their contract talks, United pilots began flying "by the book" -- meaning, for instance, that aircraft taxied more slowly at O'Hare International Airport in Chicago, the airline's main base.  Such tactics help explain why only 62% of United's flights arrived on time in July -- its worst record ever.  The pilots' refusal for most of the year to work any voluntary overtime has forced United to cancel dozens of flights for lack of crews.  And at a cost to United of $200,000 a day, two Boeing 747-400 aircraft sat idle for months because the pilots refused to fly them without a new contract agreement.  Amid such scrapping, some United managers would bitingly refer to the pilot leader as "Mad Dog Dubinsky."  The pilots called Mr. Wolf "Ice Man" for his obstinacy on the contract issues.  The pilots have shown how sensitive they can be in their business dealings throughout the takeover battle.  Some early false steps by Mr. Davis cost him their support for his bid.  In a meeting with Mr. Dubinsky and his advisers, Mr. Davis was asked why he wanted to own United.  After saying how he wanted a premier airline to leave to his children, he explained: "When I was a boy, I liked to play with toys.  I still like toys.  They've just gotten more expensive."  Mr. Davis then cupped Mr. Dubinsky's two cheeks in his hands like a playful father and exclaimed, "Let's have some fun]"  "That meeting was the end of Davis," one pilot adviser says.  Adds Mr. Dubinsky, "We weren't about to be trifled with as some rich kid's toy."  An adviser for Mr. Davis who attended the meeting confirms that Mr. Davis told the pilot leaders that when he was a child he played with toy airplanes, but that Mr. Davis immediately added he didn't consider United a toy.  The adviser argues that the real reason the pilots wouldn't join the Davis bid was that Mr. Davis insisted on control, and "they were looking for a deal in which the unions have control."  When Mr. Wolf and Mr. Dubinsky met to discuss the buy-out seriously for the first time on Aug. 24, things went more smoothly.  "Surprisingly or not, the two men found they weren't very far apart on what they wanted for the airline," says Eugene Kailin, the pilot's financial adviser at Lazard Freres & Co.  Just five days later, the 27 members of the pilot union's governing board arrived in New York from various parts of the country to deliberate on the proposal; their concurrence was essential.  After nearly three days of debate, they approved it unanimously.  Then the 27 members stood up and applauded.  All that was left was for Mr. Wolf and Mr. Dubinsky to sign on the dotted line.  The two men met at 8 a.m. at Le Restaurant in New York's Regency Hotel.  Both men signed the agreement papers, smiled and shook hands.  To maintain such a blissful relationship, executives at other employee-owned companies counsel the importance of tolerance and patience.  "Managers have to realize they're not just there to run the business in a traditional way -- they have to open themselves to dialogue with the employees," says Joseph Vittoria, chairman of Avis, which substantially reduced operating expenses and customer complaints in the first full year after employees acquired a majority stake in 1987.  "That often means being patient, because you're going to get some crazy ideas."  There's a new kind of corporate raider on the scene: the bankruptcy raider.  Typically he aims to help creditors -- not shareholders -- by threatening to disrupt a company's reorganization proceedings.  It is happening now in the long-running bankruptcy-court battle over Wheeling-Pittsburgh Steel Corp., which has struggled since 1985 to devise a plan to pay more than $1 billion face amount of claims.  Reflecting the big stakes, the fight is getting dirty, with mudslinging and litigation.  Recently, just when a new reorganization proposal for Wheeling was gaining support, a militant group of so-called vulture investors led by the New York brokerage firm Oppenheimer & Co. arose to try to wrench a bigger piece of the booty for themselves and other junior Wheeling creditors.  Oppenheimer isn't the first to stage a bankruptcy raid.  A few months ago, some Todd Shipyards Corp. junior creditors wrested concessions in that company's ongoing reorganization.  Yet the Wheeling skirmish seems particularly intense, perhaps because so many aggressive investors own Wheeling claims.  As more debt-laden companies falter, bankruptcy specialists say, such holdups could become routine.  The target drawing fire in this particular raid is money manager Ronald LaBow of Neuberger & Berman in New York.  He is a senior Wheeling creditor and author of the new reorganization plan.  Oppenheimer won't comment on its insurrection, which is badly upsetting key factions in the Wheeling battle.  But at the very least, the Oppenheimer group, which owns more than 20% of unsecured Wheeling claims, could hold up the bankruptcy proceedings, making everybody wait longer for their payoff.  "It's always better to have a consensual plan {for reorganization} because it's quicker," says Mr. LaBow.  His clients own 86% of Wheeling's bank claims and would make a killing if Mr. LaBow can push through his plan in federal bankruptcy court in Pittsburgh.  Mr. LaBow thinks he could guide Wheeling out of bankruptcy court by January 1990, though key labor and legal roadblocks remain.  And he has the backing of some heavyweight Wheeling creditors who want payment as soon as possible.  "This bankruptcy has gone on 4 1/2 years," complains Stanley West of Cleveland-Cliffs, a big Wheeling trade creditor.  Mr. West heads a committee of unsecured Wheeling creditors, which recently endorsed Mr. LaBow's plan.  With the steel business slowing after being on a roll, some creditors worry that Wheeling's growing cash pile might erode, leaving less value for everybody.  Caught in the middle are Wheeling's common shareholders, including another big Wall Street player, Goldman, Sachs & Co., which bought 34% of Wheeling stock early this year.  In bankruptcy court, shareholders are on the bottom of the totem pole.  They face massive dilution of their stake in the company and generally lack much power to influence the battle.  Yet the fight over Wheeling has rekindled equity investors' hopes.  Recently, Wheeling stock, which traded as low as 7 5/8 this year, has climbed in active trading, finishing at 15 1/4, up 1/4 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  The company has said it has nothing new to report and can't explain the activity.  Currently only Wheeling is allowed to file a reorganization plan.  "We want to keep our exclusivity," Wheeling says.  It now is revising its initial plan, drafted with Mr. LaBow's help and filed December 1988.  But Mr. LaBow, who wants greater control over the proceedings, has asked the court to let him file a plan instead.  If Mr. LaBow could push through his plan, which resembles Wheeling's initial proposal, his investment clients might nearly treble the value of their $140 million investment, taking Wheeling debentures and half of the newly organized Wheeling's stock.  Meanwhile, Oppenheimer and other unsecured Wheeling creditors might get 70 cents on the dollar for their claims, two-thirds in cash and one-third in new Wheeling stock.  Vulture investors generally paid 10 cents to 60 cents on the dollar for unsecured Wheeling claims.  Mr. Labow would offer to buy creditors' new Wheeling shares for cash, perhaps giving him control of the company.  Under Mr. LaBow's plan, many new Wheeling shares would be issued, shrinking existing common stockholders' 100% stake to only 7.5%.  Thus Goldman's 34% stake in Wheeling, bought at $8, would shrink to about 2.5%.  In his plan, Mr. LaBow has valued existing Wheeling shares at less than 5.  While some think he might raise that valuation, Mr. LaBow says Wheeling can't pay creditors in full, so there won't be much left for shareholders.  The steel union might get more breaks from Mr. LaBow than current shareholders would.  "The union has made substantial contributions to the company in the past four years,' Mr. LaBow says.  Without a new wage contract, Wheeling cannot get out of bankruptcy court.  Wage talks won't even start for a few weeks.  Oppenheimer is said to want a higher payout from Mr. LaBow, and more stock.  It also has filed court papers supporting Wheeling's right to file its own amended plan.  And Oppenheimer has floated its own reorganization proposal that might buy out Mr. LaBow and give the Oppenheimer group much of Wheeling's new stock.  "For the company and the workers, a more diverse ownership might be beneficial," says Sean Mathis, Wheeling's financial adviser.  Goldman won't comment on its role.  But it is said to be offering to raise additional money for Wheeling's plan, in hopes of improving Wheeling stockholders' fate in a reorganization.  Goldman apparently owns restricted Wheeling shares that must be held for some time.  Bankruptcy players say Goldman also has sought a possible acquirer for Wheeling, but no buyer has yet emerged.  Currently Mr. LaBow is trying to pacify Oppenheimer, bankruptcy players say.  But recently he sued to stop the brokerage firm from taking possession of, and voting, some claims it bought from original Wheeling creditors, alarming factions he needs as allies.  "In general, creditors ought to be able to transfer claims," says Lawrence Handelsman, a lawyer for Wheeling's committee of unsecured creditors.  Oppenheimer also is playing rough.  Recently in bankruptcy court in Pittsburgh, David Strumwasser, a lawyer for Oppenheimer, said he wanted to know who the investors are in the Neuberger & Berman partnerships that hold Wheeling bank claims.  Mr. LaBow's limited partners are believed to include the family of Michael Milken, the former junk bond king who was indicted for securities fraud.  Mr. LaBow won't confirm or deny that, but says he alone makes investment decisions for the partnerships that hold Wheeling claims.  A spokesman for Mr. Milken declined to comment.  Dennis Cronin, a lawyer for Mr. LaBow, says he will soon give Oppenheimer a list of the limited partners.  Mr. LaBow's relationship with Mr. Milken is periodically a subject of speculation in the market.  Since 1985, Mr. LaBow has been a director of Regency Equities in Omaha, Neb.  Regency's big shareholders include Mr. Milken and his brother Lowell.  Ken Schneier of R.D. Smith, whose clients hold Wheeling claims, is keeping an open mind.  "We will vote our claims in a way that suits our customers' interests," he says.  "We hope for the best return."  ---  Wheeling-Pittsburgh Steel  (NYSE; Symbol: WHX)  Business: Steel producer  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Sales: $1.10 billion  Net Income: $258.5 million; $48.69 a share Second quarter, June 30, 1989:  Per-share earnings: $10.76 vs. $11.69  Average daily trading volume: 10,385 shares  Common shares outstanding: 5.1 million  Canfor Corp. said it may spend "significantly more" than the 300 million Canadian dollars (US$253 million) it previously estimated it would invest to expand output at its Prince George, British Columbia, pulp and paper mills.  "What we announced was an initial generalized estimate of what we'd have to spend for the minimum enlargement, if we do it in phases.  It wasn't a firm game plan," said Canfor Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Peter Bentley.  Mr. Bentley said he couldn't provide specific spending figures until Canfor's board approves the plan early next year.  The C$300 million figure, which includes an estimated C$150 million of related environmental improvements, would allow Canfor to raise kraft-pulp output at its two Prince George mills by about 300 metric tons a day, to a total 1,900 metric tons.  Canfor ultimately plans to raise daily output to a total 2,600 metric tons.  A metric ton equals 2,204.62 pounds.  Mr. Bentley said proceeds from the sale of Canfor's lumber operations in northern Alberta, for which the company recently retained Salomon Inc.'s Salomon Brothers Inc. unit to solicit bids, may be used to help finance spending at Prince George or other operations, or to reduce debt.  Canfor's long-term debt rose to C$146.5 million, or about 30% of capital, as of June 30 after its C$93.8 million purchase of Vancouver's Balfour Forest Products Inc.  "It {the sale} just enhances our options on what we can do.  Not only in terms of timetable or scope at Prince George, but also in any opportunities we have to integrate {production of} pulp and higher-grade papers," he said.  Mr. Bentley wouldn't discuss specifics, but said joint ventures "could be one way {for Canfor} to get further integrated into the paper business," while reducing its risk.  He said Canfor has no plans to boost its interest in newsprint production.  Canfor's 50%-owned Howe Sound Pulp & Paper Ltd., a joint venture with Japan's Oji Paper Co., is currently spending about C$1 billion to build a newsprint mill and expand pulp output at its facilities in Port Mellon, British Columbia.  Nynex Corp.'s New York Telephone unit requested $880 million in rate increases as well as pricing flexibility and greater opportunities to raise profits, which have plummeted under "incentive" regulations.  Analysts said the proposal, if adopted by the New York Public Service Commission, could help to improve Nynex's lackluster earnings.  New York Telephone is proposing to nearly double basic monthly rates for residential service and to increase business rates about 25%, between 1991 and 1995, by eliminating subsidies, said John Hopley, the company's managing director of pricing and costing.  He said the company could try to woo its business customers by reducing rates for regional long-distance, Centrex switchboard and data-transmission services.  The proposal would allow for a net revenue increase of 2% to 3% a year, Mr. Hopley said.  Analyst Robert B. Morris III of Goldman, Sachs & Co. said the proposal could help reverse the earnings slide at New York Telephone, which contributes two-thirds of New York-based Nynex's profits.  Mr. Morris said he has downgraded Nynex's 1989 earnings projections to $6.10 a share, from an estimate made in January of $6.65, and 1990 projections to $6.65 a share, from $7.05.  Last year, Nynex earned $1.3 billion, or $6.63 a share, on revenue of $12.7 billion.  Nynex spokesman John J. Bonomo declined to comment on earnings.  Mr. Morris said the proposed plan would provide "an opportunity -- not a guarantee.  The company still has to perform."  New York Public Service Commisioner Eli M. Noam said it's too early to say whether a rate increase is justified.  He said the commission hopes to act by December on the company's request for an initial $359 million rate increase, effective Jan. 1, and for a new regulatory plan, effective in 1991.  A majority of New York commissioners doesn't have "as strong an aversion to rate increases as in some states.  We understand the need for new investment in the network," Mr. Noam said.  New York Telephone said its overall rate of return has dropped to a projected 9% this year -- far below the 14% rate authorized -- despite new regulations in 1988 providing incentives to earn higher profit.  The incentive plan hasn't worked, Mr. Hopley said.  A slow economy and stiff price competition have hurt revenue, and the plan freezes basic telephone rates until 1991, he said.  However, analysts said the company's slow progress in cutting costs and boosting labor productivity was also a factor in its failure to meet profit projections.  New York Telephone Comptroller Arthur Flaherty disagreed.  He said the company achieved all cost-cutting goals, including a $100 million reduction in labor expenses.  The proposed initial rate increase of $359 million is to be applied toward replacing $367 million of inside wire.  An additional increase of $520 million is requested for 1991 so that the company can achieve a 14% rate of return and can begin eliminating subsidies on basic service.  Under the plan, basic residential rates, currently $15.63 a month, would increase to an estimated $20 in 1991 and $30 in 1995.  Business rates, now $24.48 a month, would jump to about $27.50 in 1991 and $31 in 1995, Mr. Hopley said.  Bio-Technology General Corp., a health-care products concern, named Christopher Illick to its five-member board.  Mr. Illick, general counsel and corporate secretary of Clarendon America Insurance Co., fills the seat vacated by Frederick R. Adler.  Mr. Adler, who resigned, is a venture capitalist who controls 13.4% of Bio-Technology common.  The company said it is waiting to hear from the Securities and Exchange Commission about Bio-Technology's plan for debt restructuring.  Major holders have approved the plan.  Without such a restructuring or additional financing, the company faced the prospect of a bankruptcy-law filing.  A group of four U.S. accountants has been asked to go to Poland this week by the U.S. Commerce Department to check on the status of the Polish accounting profession.  With a proposal in Congress to give Poland anywhere from $100 million to $150 million, the Commerce Department wants to find out more about Poland's accounting methods.  A Commerce Department spokeswoman said that Poland hasn't any national accounting standards.  "Also, we're really not sure where the Polish accounting profession stands because we haven't compared it with our own yet," she said.  The Canadian government plans to ban smoking on all international flights by Canadian airlines.  The ban is to take effect at the end of this year, making Canada likely to be the first country to prohibit smoking on all international flights.  "Canada is on the vanguard of a world-wide movement," said David Sweanor, a spokesman for the Non-Smokers' Rights Association, a Canadian lobby group.  Canada, like many other countries, already prohibits smoking on all domestic flights under two hours.  The U.S. Senate approved a permanent smoking ban on all domestic airline flights in the U.S. Thursday, but the measure now will go before a conference committee of the Senate and House.  Canada's two largest airlines, Air Canada and Canadian Airlines International Ltd., which is a unit of PWA Corp., voluntarily extended the current Canadian ban to include all domestic and North American flights.  The ban on international flights is part of a new law that prohibits smoking in federally regulated workplaces including government buildings, trains and banks.  A spokeswoman for Canadian Transport Minister Benoit Bouchard said the draft regulations can still be changed but she said Mr. Bouchard "feels strongly" about them.  Gordon Sinclair, president of the Air Transport Association of Canada said the airline industry was "generally supportive" of the ban but he said it could be "a possible disadvantage" given that all other international carriers allow smoking.  "It's a form of discrimination against a portion of the Canadian traveling public," said Jacques LaRiviere, a spokesman for the Canadian Tobacco Manufacturers' Council.  Earlier this year, the Canadian government implemented a law that prohibits tobacco advertising in newspapers and magazines and phases out billboard advertising.  It also prevents tobacco companies from using cigarette brand names to sponsor sports and cultural events.  Imperial Tobacco Ltd, a unit of Imasco Ltd. and RJR-Macdonald Inc., a unit of RJR Nabisco Inc., launched joint court action to challenge the constitutionality of the law.  Hearings are scheduled to begin Monday.  Rothmans, Benson & Hedges Inc., which is 40%-owned by Philip Morris Cos. and 60%-owned by Rothmans Inc., has launched a separate court action, which is due to begin in October.  Eastland Financial Corp. said it would report a loss for the third quarter, resulting from charges and additions to its loan-loss reserves.  In the 1988 third quarter, the bank holding company reported net income of $2 million.  Non-performing loans increased to $45 million as of Sept. 15, from $14 million at June 30, Eastland said.  Loan-loss reserves will be increased to $28 million from $5 million at June 30.  In addition, Eastland said it charged off $4 million in problem loans during the third quarter.  These actions will result in a third-quarter charge against pretax earnings of $27 million.  The increase in non-performing loans resulted from deterioration in collateral underlying some commercial and real estate loans, Eastland said.  Investor Harold Simmons said he and NL Industries Inc. are willing to give Georgia Gulf Corp. some time to pursue alternatives to their proposed $55-a-share buy-out -- but only a short time.  "We'll give them a few days to work something out," Mr. Simmons said in an interview last week.  If Georgia Gulf shows progress toward a transaction that would offer shareholders $55 a share, Mr. Simmons said, "We'll be pleased.  If they don't, we'll pursue our $55-a-share deal" or pursue a consent solicitation to replace Georgia Gulf's board.  Still, Georgia Gulf's stock tumbled $5.125 Friday to close at $52.125 on volume of 1.4 million shares in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The decline came after a Securities and Exchange Commission filing by Mr. Simmons and NL, a Houston chemicals concern, indicated they were backing down from their aggressive stance.  Mr. Simmons said NL is delaying its consent solicitation for now because, "that's our last alternative.  Our first alternative is to let them do a restructuring."  And if the transaction is above $55 a share, he said, "I would sell."  The Simmons group's SEC filing disclosed that NL already sold 230,000 Georgia Gulf shares between Sept. 8 and Sept. 12 at prices between $58.50 and $59.50, reducing the group's stake in the Atlanta chemicals concern to 8.9% from 9.9%.  In the filing, the group said it sold because the shares were trading at a price higher than it thought could be realized through a sale or recapitalization of the company.  Georgia Gulf's stock had been trading above $55 a share since Mr. Simmons and NL offered to help the company recapitalize or go private in some transaction that would pay shareholders $55 a share, or about $1.4 billion.  According to the SEC filing, J. Landis Martin, NL president and chief executive officer, told Georgia Gulf last week that the Simmons group is as willing to support a Georgia Gulf transaction as it is to complete its own transaction.  After the meeting, Georgia Gulf said it and its advisers will pursue other alternatives to a transaction with the Simmons group.  "They basically said, 'We don't want to do a deal with you,'" Mr. Simmons said.  In an interview yesterday, NL's Mr. Martin said that NL will tell Georgia Gulf's advisers that it still is interested in participating in one of the other alternatives.  He said NL probably also will ask for a close look at NL's books to see if NL could propose a transaction valued at more than $55 a share.  In Atlanta, Georgia Gulf said it hadn't any comment on the SEC filing.  Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis put aside his active pursuit of United Airlines Friday, saying he can't compete against a $6.75 billion pilot-management buy-out of UAL Corp. if that group holds together.  But instead of conceding defeat, he submitted a backup bid of $300 a share, equal to the pilot-management offer accepted Thursday by the UAL board, in case that transaction falls apart.  One person familiar with the Davis strategy estimated there is a 40% chance the pilot-management buy-out will collapse, even though most analysts and takeover stock traders put it at only 5% to 10%.  Davis aides said $250 million in annual cost concessions by the pilots gave the pilot-management group a bidding advantage of $50 a share.  If Mr. Davis's only chance of winning is the rival group's collapse, he would just be raising the price unnecessarily by raising his bid now, they added.  "The idea behind this $300 is let's not be silly and bid against ourselves," said John Davis, one of Mr. Davis's two sons.  "We can backstop this thing at $300 and see if they're able to put it together."  Some takeover stock traders called the Davis move a public-relations ploy to put the best face on being outbid.  One person familiar with UAL called it "a graceful exit" after a six-week seige that began Aug. 7 with disclosure of a Davis offer of $240 a share, or $5.4 billion.  However, people familiar with the Davis strategy see potential rifts between UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf and the pilots, and between the white-collar pilots and blue-collar machinists, who haven't yet joined the bid, over features of the buy-out.  They believe the pilots could tangle with management over the fact that employees will own 75% of UAL but only control three of 15 board seats.  They also believe the price management pays for 10% of UAL -- $15 million for 1%, plus options for 9% at no extra charge -- may provoke friction.  They believe the machinists may resent the idea of a pilot-dominated airline so much they will try to torpedo the deal.  On the other hand, the pilots have been seeking to buy the airline for more than two years, and the machinists can't legally do much to block them.  Federal labor laws bar wildcat airline strikes, and the machinist contract doesn't expire until November.  "I think in the end there will be a meeting of the minds among all the employee groups," said Michael Derchin, an airline analyst at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  He said the employee involvement is likely to blunt any regulatory concerns about debt leverage or foreign ownership.  British Airways PLC is investing $750 million for a 15% stake in UAL.  So far, the machinists haven't begun talks about joining the pilot-management group.  They are balking at a demand by management that details of the bid remain secret.  For Mr. Davis, UAL may become the second major airline to have eluded his pursuit, which could intensify questions about the seriousness of his interest in making acquisitions.  He finished third in the bidding for Northwest Airlines parent NWA Inc. in June.  However, as in NWA, Mr. Davis has evidently gained substantial profits on his UAL stock as a consolation prize.  He accumulated a reported stake of 3.5%, or about 750,000 shares, when the stock was about $160 a share.  His average cost may have been even less.  On Friday, UAL stock fell 75 cents a share to $279.75 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Assuming Mr. Davis sold around the current market price, his profit before expenses would be about $90 million.  On NWA, he pocketed $48 million minus $18 million in expenses.  But aides describe Mr. Davis as a "disciplined buyer" and an "identifier of value" rather than a financial manipulator.  "He wants to own an airline and has been dealt two tough hands," said one.  They note that Wall Street takeover stock traders appreciate that he has forced his two most recent targets to be sold.  But they acknowledge such questions will persist until he makes another major acquisition.  His last, the Twentieth Century Fox Film Corp. entertainment company, was in 1981.  Earlier this year he purchased Spectradyne Inc. for $650 million.  Beckman Instruments Inc. said it will phase out about 150 jobs in its Bioanalytical Group and take other steps to reflect a world-wide slowdown in public spending for life science research at university and government laboratories.  Beckman, a supplier of diagnostic and life science laboratory instruments and related products, said the jobs would be trimmed by year end.  The company said it would require the group's approximately 3,000 remaining employees to take five vacation or furlough days during that period because of the slowdown.  The company said its Diagnostic Systems Group will be unaffected, and continues to post strong sales.  Sales growth in that unit should offset the impact of currency exchanges to result in a modest sales rise in the year, the company said.  "Although we are experiencing difficult business conditions in the life sciences, we will continue our investment in the development of new products, since we expect a return to normal business as public spending for bioresearch revives," said Louis T. Rosso, Beckman chairman and president.  Beckman, which was spun off by its former 84%-owner SmithKline Beckman Corp. earlier this year, has more than 7,000 workers.  Oops.  There goes the air out of Woolworth again.  The shares, which spurted on heavy volume Sept. 7 and 8, deflated 12% last week amidst general anguish for rumored takeover stocks.  Even at Friday's close of 63, many analysts and money managers say, buyers essentially are speculating on a takeover of Woolworth, as the stock otherwise is fully valued.  Fundamentals justify the current price, they say, but not much more.  Takeovers suddenly look tougher to carry out because "the bottom is falling out of the junk-bond market," one money manager says.  And a raider without junk-bond financing is like Zorro without his sword.  Woolworth's shares have trended upward for the past year, helped partly by strength in its specialty retailing units.  Analysts are especially keen on its Foot Locker stores.  "The athletic-shoe business has been very good to them," says a New York money manager.  "But it's a $4 billion market now.  It's a maturing market.  Absent a takeover, the stock is expensive."  "In the low 50s the stock was a screaming buy on fundamentals," says another money manager, who bought at that price but sold too soon -- for a mere 4-point profit.  She now considers the shares "fully priced."  The stock is a "hold to a sell," says Edward Johnson, analyst at Prescott, Ball & Turben.  He expects Woolworth to earn about $5.60 a share in 1990.  Applying a multiple of 11 times earnings, he thinks the stock is worth about 61.  Some analysts still like Woolworth on fundamentals.  Oppenheimer & Co. put the big retailer on its recommended list last month, as analyst Bruce Missett praised its acquisition of Champs, a sporting-goods and sports-apparel chain.  Robert Raiff at C.J. Lawrence Morgan Grenfell last October called Woolworth "one of the few remaining great values."  The stock then was at 52 to 57.  When it passed 70 last week, he called it "fairly valued."  On the slip back to 63, he said, "I'm a buyer."  He thinks the stock could sell for 75 next year on fundamentals, and close to 100 in a restructuring or takeover.  Still, much of the buying these days comes from speculators.  Takeover rumors have flickered since May 1984.  The latest chitchat features the usual suspect, New York financier Meshulam Riklis, though other names pop up, too.  Mr. Riklis's closely held Rapid American Corp. controls McCrory's, a discount chain that competes with Woolworth.  He is deemed a logical buyer for two reasons.  Rapid American held 3% of Woolworth back in 1983 (it apparently sold the holding in 1985).  Also, Mr. Riklis recently pocketed some $1.5 billion by selling two cosmetics companies, Faberge and Elizabeth Arden, to Unilever N.V. Mr. Riklis, who couldn't be reached, has declined to comment on similar rumors in the past.  Interstate Properties, a closely held investment partnership in Teaneck, N.J., is also mentioned as a potential buyer.  Managing partner Russell White declines to comment.  Other, vaguer, rumors deal with an unidentified foreign buyer or an American buyer that covets Woolworth's real estate. (Woolworth has large and valuable real-estate holdings in West Germany and Canada.) The takeover speculation has spilled over into the options market, with heavy buying of calls (options to purchase a certain amount of stock at a set price until a specified date).  "They're flocking to these calls like bees go to honey," said Don Fishback, director of research for Investment Research Institute in Cincinnati.  But he thinks buying calls based on widely circulated rumors is usually unsuccessful.  Options buyers who got in a few days ago have already taken a bath.  One popular option (the November call to buy the stock at 60) reached a high of nearly 14, but fell back to 6 3/8 Friday.  Several market-watchers doubt the rumors.  They note that volume in Woolworth common stock peaked Sept. 7 and 8 at more than a million shares a day, triple the normal level but probably not heavy or sustained enough to indicate a major accumulation of shares by Mr. Riklis.  "I'm pretty sure someone has taken a stake," said an official of a stock-watch firm. (Such firms are paid to provide corporations with early warning when a raider is accumulating stock.) "But from what I can gather, it's less than 5%.  They could be in and out."  ---  The market as a whole looks a little woozy to some people, even though the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up Friday.  Technician and newsletter writer Joseph Granville says 359 stocks (15% of all New York Stock Exchange issues) are within a point of making new 12-month lows.  New lows outnumbered new highs Thursday (28-14) for the first time since March.  He continues to predict an "October massacre." ---  Woolworth  (NYSE; Symbol: Z)  Business: Retailer  Year ended Jan. 28, 1989:  Revenue: $8.09 billion  Net Income: $288 million; $4.47 a share  Second quarter, July 29, 1989:  Per-share earnings: 74 cents vs 68 cents  Average daily trading volume:  385,838 shares  Common shares outstanding: 64 million  Baxter International Inc. said that Utah Medical Products Inc. will buy back 300,000 Utah Medical common shares at $4 each.  As part of an agreement in principle, Utah Medical will also buy back from Baxter for $1,350,000 warrants to acquire 675,000 Utah Medical common shares.  The agreement was summarized in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing.  According to the filing, Baxter currently controls 1,325,000 Utah Medical common shares, or the equivalent of 15.9%.  Baxter, of Deerfield, Ill., is a medical care products concern.  Utah Medical is based in Midvale, Utah.  A second agreement in principle reached between the two companies concerns certain aspects of the purchase and supply agreements between the companies and provides for payments by Baxter to Utah Medical of $757,720.  BCE Development Corp. said it expects "material" writedowns of its real estate portfolio and suspended payment of its preferred share dividends.  The 67%-owned real-estate subsidiary of Montreal-based BCE Inc. said a review of the value of its properties is underway.  The company had 2.09 billion Canadian dollars (US$1.76 billion) of property on its books at the end of last year, mostly in the U.S.  The move wasn't a suprise.  BCE Development said last month that it would have to review the value of its properties if a C$700 million bid for the company didn't succeed.  The bidder, Toronto's Olympia & York Developments Ltd., later dropped the bid when an insufficient number of the concern's securities were tendered.  BCE Development said dividends on the preferred shares would continue to accumulate during the suspension.  It said dividends of its subsidiaries will continue to be paid.  The company hasn't paid any common share dividends since January 1987.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange Friday, BCE Development closed at C$1.91, down seven Canadian cents.  Friday, August 25, 1989  Following is a weekly listing of unadited net asset values of publicly traded investment fund shares, reported by the companies as of Friday's close.  Also shown is the closing listed market price or a dealer-to-dealer asked price of each fund's shares, with the percentage of difference.  @ Stock N.A. Stock %  @ Fund Name Exch.  Value Price Diff.  @ Diversified Common Stock Funds  @ Adams Express NYSE 19.50 16 1/2 - 15.38  @ Baker Fentress NYSE a28.79 23 5/8 - 17.94  @ Blue Chip Value NYSE 8.33 7 3/8 - 11.46  @ Clemente Global Gro NYSE b11.06 8 3/4 - 20.89  @ Gemini II Capital NYSE 20.79 17 - 18.23  @ Gemini II Income NYSE 9.86 12 3/4 + 29.31  @ General Amerinvest NYSE 22.05 18 1/4 - 17.33  @ Growth Stock Outlook NYSE 10.44 9 1/2 - 9.00  @ Lehman Corp. NYSE 16.71 13 1/2 - 19.21  @ Liberty All-Star Eqty NYSE 9.62 7 7/8 - 18.14  @ Niagara Share Corp. NYSE 17.76 14 1/2 - 18.36  @ Nicholas-Applegate NYSE 11.38 9 1/4 - 18.72  @ Quest for Value Cap NYSE 17.44 12 3/4 - 26.89  @ Quest for Value Inco NYSE 11.79 12 5/8 + 7.08  @ Royal Value Trust NYSE 11.27 9 5/8 - 14.60  @ Schafer Value Trust NYSE 11.83 10 1/8 - 14.41  @ Source Capital NYSE 42.66 42 1/4 - 0.96  @ Tri-Continental Corp. NYSE 29.31 23 5/8 - 19.40  @ Worldwide Value NYSE 21.95 18 1/8 - 17.43  @ Zweig Fund NYSE 11.60 11 5/8 + 0.22  @ Closed End Bond Funds  @ CIM High Yield Secs AMEX 8.52 8 - 6.10  @ Franklin Prin Mat Tr NYSE b9.16 10 + 9.17  @ Franklin Universal Tr NYSE b9.34 9 5/8 + 3.05  @ Municipal High Inco NYSE 9.57 9 3/4 + 1.88  @ Zenith Income Fund NYSE 7.96 8 7/8 + 11.49  @ Flexible Portfolio Funds  @ America's All Season OTC 5.75 5 1/4 - 8.70  @ America's All S Inco OTC 9.19 9 1/2 + 3.37  @ Zweig Total Return Fd NYSE 9.64 9 1/2 - 1.45  @ Specialized Equity and Convertible Funds  @ American Capital Conv NYSE 24.30 21 7/8 - 9.98  @ ASA Ltd. NYSE bc55.35 42 - 24.12  @ Asia Pacific NYSE 14.32 12 7/8 - 10.09  @ Bancroft Convertible AMEX 21.71 18 3/4 - 13.63  @ Bergstrom Capital AMEX 62.41 60 1/8 - 3.66  @ BGR Precious Metals TOR be11.53 10 1/8 - 12.19  @ Brazil NYSE 17.72 10 7/8 - 38.63  @ CNV Holdings Capital NYSE 10.51 5 3/8 - 48.86  @ CNV Holdings Income NYSE 9.61 11 7/8 + 23.57  @ Castle Convertible AMEX 22.53 19 1/8 - 15.11  @ Central Fund Canada AMEX b4.99 4 7/8 - 1.52  @ Central Securities AMEX 12.85 10 1/4 - 20.23  @ Couns Tandem Secs NYSE 12.49 10 3/8 - 16.93  @ Cypress Fund AMEX 10.59 10 1/2 - 0.85  @ Duff & Phelps Sel Utils NYSE 8.49 8 1/8 - 4.30  @ Ellsw Conv Gr & Inc. AMEX 9.01 7 3/4 - 13.98  @ Engex AMEX 13.77 10 1/4 - 25.56  @ Financ'l News Compos NYSE 20.80 20 1/8 - 3.25  @ 1st Australia AMEX 10.83 9 3/4 - 9.97  @ First Financial Fund NYSE 11.78 10 5/8 - 9.80  @ First Iberian AMEX 10.21 10 3/4 + 5.29  @ France Fund NYSE b12.47 11 7/8 - 4.77  @ Gabelli Equit Trust NYSE 14.19 13 3/8 - 5.74  @ Germany Fund NYSE 9.55 10 3/4 + 12.57  @ H&Q Healthcare Inv NYSE 10.11 8 1/4 - 18.40  @ Hampton Utils Tr Cap AMEX b11.57 9 7/8 - 14.65  @ Hampton Utils Tr Pref AMEX b49.33 48 5/16 - 2.06  @ Helvetia Fund NYSE 12.14 11 3/8 - 6.30  @ India Growth Fund NYSE f13.96 17 1/8 + 22.67  @ Italy Fund NYSE b11.77 10 1/4 - 12.91  @ Korea Fund NYSE 19.47 42 1/4 +117.00  @ Malaysia Fund NYSE 12.07 11 1/4 - 6.79  @ Meeschaert G&C MWSE 8.02 7 3/4 - 3.37  @ Mexico Fund NYSE b12.48 11 1/2 - 7.85  @ Morgan Grenf Sm Cap NYSE 10.86 9 1/2 - 12.52  @ Patriot Prem Div Fd NYSE 9.72 10 1/4 + 5.45  @ Petrol & Resources NYSE 30.52 26 - 14.81  @ Pilgrim Regional NYSE 11.46 9 7/8 - 13.83  @ Rl Estate Sec Inco Fd AMEX 8.66 8 1/4 - 4.73  @ Regional Fin Shrs Inv NYSE 9.96 9 - 9.64  @ ROC Taiwan Fund NYSE 16.27 15 1/2 - 4.73  @ Scudder New Asia NYSE z z z  @ SE Savings Inst Fd OTC b11.14 12 1/2 + 12.21  @ Spain Fund NYSE 14.14 19 + 34.37  @ Taiwan Fund NYSE b42.35 41 3/8 - 2.30  @ TCW Convertible Secs NYSE b9.04 8 1/4 - 8.74  @ Templeton Em Mkts AMEX b13.28 13 1/8 - 1.17  @ Templeton Value Fund NYSE b10.96 9 5/8 - 12.18  @ Thai Fund NYSE 17.21 19 1/4 + 11.85  @ United Kingdom Fund NYSE 2.17 10 1/4 - 15.78  @ Z-Seven OTC 14.42 14 3/4 + 2.29  a-Ex-dividend.  B-As of Thursday's close. c-Translated at Commercial Rand exchange rate. d-NAV reflects $1.54 per share for taxes. f-As of Wednesday's close. z-Not available.  Ralston Purina Co. agreed to buy Nestle S.A.'s troubled Beech-Nut Nutrition Corp. baby-food unit, gambling it can overcome problems that have lingered at Beech-Nut since the unit was stained by scandal seven years ago.  Beech-Nut, the U.S.'s second-largest baby-food maker, hasn't been profitable for several years, according to analysts, partly because of the image damage it endured over the sale of apple juice that turned out to be water, sugar, and flavoring.  While the letter of intent's terms weren't disclosed, analysts estimate Ralston-Purina paid about $85 million for Beech-Nut, which has annual sales of about $150 million.  Among other things, the agreement is subject to completion of a definitive agreement.  Despite the problems the unit has encountered, Ralston will get a bargain in Beech-Nut, according to John McMillin, a food industry analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities.  "Food companies are typically being acquired for 2 1/2 times annual sales.  Ralston is probably paying little more than half Beechnut's sales," he said.  Ralston wouldn't comment.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Ralston Purina rose $1.75 to $87.25.  Beech-Nut's share of the $837 million a year U.S. baby-food market is about 18.2%, a distant second to Gerber Products Co.'s 70%, according to analysts.  H.J. Heinz Co. ranks third with an 11% share.  Beech-Nut has boosted its market share from 16% in the past three years, in part through expanded marketing and new-product campaigns that wiped out profit margins, Mr. McMillin said.  "Ralston finds Gerber's profit margins, which are about 25%, very appealing.  They probably hope they can cut costs and introduce other new products and make money," added Mr. McMillin.  "And they got a bargain because Nestle wanted out."  Nestle, based in Switzerland, put Beech-Nut on the block several months ago.  The unit, based in Fort Washington, Pa., has three manufacturing plants and about 1,100 employees.  Ralston, based in St. Louis, said BeechNut fits into its array of other food lines, including such cereals for children as Cookie Crisp.  Ralston had sales of $5.88 billion last year.  Ralston has been in an acquisition mode for some time.  In February, William Stiritz, chairman and chief executive officer, said the company might bid for certain food assets sold off by the new owners of RJR Nabisco Inc.  But despite RJR's entering agreements to sell several pieces under Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., Ralston hasn't been a buyer.  The sale of Beech-Nut would free Nestle to pursue its rumored acquisition plans in the U.S., where analysts have long considered its most likely target to be Gerber.  With Gerber, based in Fremont, Mich., Nestle would have the baby-products lineup it dreamed of when it acquired Beech-Nut in 1979 for $35 million.  Nestle, the world's largest supplier of formula for infants, invested an additional $60 million in Beech-Nut, increased marketing budgets and boosted sales.  But although Beech-Nut's managers promised Nestle the company would be profitable by 1982, Beech-Nut was never able to successfully compete against Gerber.  The juice scandal forced Beech-Nut to pay a $2.2 million fine and $7.5 million to settle a lawsuit brought by a Scranton, Pa., supermarket chain.  Also, in 1988, two former top executives were sentenced to a year and a day in prison and fined $100,000 each for their role in the consumer fraud.  Earlier this year, a federal appeals court overturned the conviction of Neils L. Hoyvald, the company's former president, on a technicality.  The panel also overturned the conviction of John F. Lavery, former vice president, manufacturing, for violation of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, but left intact his conviction on certain other charges.  Spending more, earning more, inflating more, building more -- that's the message expected from this week's indicators.  The consumer price index, personal income, personal consumption and housing starts all are thought to have jumped in August, according to a survey by MMS International, a unit of McGraw-Hill Inc., New York.  But that doesn't necessarily mean the trend will continue.  Several economists point out that recent indicators are distorted by two significant factors -- falling oil prices and robust auto production, neither of which is expected to continue indefinitely.  "What it's all telling you is the economy is still growing, somewhere close to its long-term potential growth rate.  There is certainly no evidence the economy is running out of steam," said Robert H. Chandross, chief economist at Lloyd's Bank, New York.  In the overall economy, inflation is still around 4.5% and looks like it will hover around that level "from here on out," Mr. Chandross said.  The August producer price index, reported Friday, slid 0.4%, pushed down by a 7.3% drop in energy prices.  Excluding food and energy, producer prices jumped 0.5%.  The more down-to-earth measure of August inflation, the consumer price index, is expected to show a rise of 0.2%, the same as in the two previous months.  The reasons?  Consumer prices, which are measured farther down the pipeline than producer prices, don't react as strongly to energy prices; and the cost of services plays a big role in the consumer index.  Charles Lieberman, managing director of financial markets research at Manufacturers Hanover Securities Corp., New York, says a drop in energy costs means lower gasoline and fuel costs to consumers, which frees up more disposable income for discretionary spending.  But Mr. Lieberman, who also expects a 0.2% increase in the CPI, said that "everything in the service sector is pretty much rising, and at a decent clip."  Fortunately, consumers have been earning more; they also have been buying more.  August personal income is expected to rise 0.3% and would have risen further but for the continuing telephone workers' strike, economists said.  Consumption is thought to have outpaced that gain with a jump of 0.7%, largely because of auto sales that have been buoyed by incentive programs.  "There's no question that {auto makers} managed to unload inventories by discounting," Mr. Lieberman said.  "In effect, they've trained consumers to buy only when prices are discounted."  Economists said the batch of numbers that came out last week and the data expected this week probably will do little to spur any credit action by the Federal Reserve.  The Fed recently eased credit a bit when it appeared the economy was halting.  One area where that earlier easing seems to be paying off is in housing, economists said.  August housing starts, due tomorrow, are expected to at least maintain July's 1.4 million-unit annual rate and possibly reach 1.5 million.  And the government signs off on second-quarter real gross national product Thursday.  Its final revision of the figure isn't expected to make much of a change in last month's 2.7% estimate.  ---  @ Closely Watched Reports  @ Statistics Released in the Week Ended Sept. 15  @ CHANGE  @ (from prior  @ TOTAL period)  @Money Supply  @ M1 Week ended  @ Sept. 4 (in billions) $774.7 -$2.7  @ M2 Week ended  @ Sept. 4 (in billions) $3,140.6 +$2.6  @ M3 Week ended  @ Sept. 4 (in billions) $4,007.3 +$1.0  @Merchandise trade deficit  @ July (in billions) $7.58 -$0.43  @Producer price index  @ August 113.3% -0.4%  @Retail sales  @ August (in billions) $144.29 +0.7%  @Industrial production index  @ August 142.4% +0.3%  @Capacity utilization  @ August 83.8% Unch.  @Business inventories  @ July (in billions) $785.51 +0.6%  @Business sales  @ July (in billions) $511.09 -0.9%  @New jobless claims  @ Week ended Sept. 2 319,000 +0.3%  @Auto sales  @ Sept. 1-10 138.065 -4.1%  @ Statistics to Be Released This Week  @Consumer price index (Tues.)  @August  @Housing starts (Tues.)  @August  @Money supply (Thurs.)  @Real GNP (Thurs.)  @2nd quarter, revised  @Personal income (Fri.)  @August  @New jobless claims (Thurs.)  @Personal consumption (Fri.)  @August  @Saving rate (Fri.)  @August  The South Korean government will partially liberalize foreign-exchange rates, officials said.  The Ministry of Finance announced that foreign-exchange banks will be allowed to freely set daily buying and selling cash rates of foreign exchange applied for by customers beginning Wednesday, as the first step to liberalizing the foreign-exchange-rate system.  Also, foreign-exchange banks will be given a free hand to decide telegraphic-transfer rates for the dollar every day within a 0.4% limit of the basic rate calculated by the Bank of Korea.  For other currencies, such as the yen and the mark, domestic banks will be allowed to set buying and selling telegraphic-transfer rates within a 0.8% limit of the basic rate calculated by the Bank of Korea.  Currently, the buying and selling rates of foreign exchange are fixed according to the calculated basic rate announced by the central bank.  The buying telegraphic-transfer rate for the dollar is 0.4% less than the basic rate, while the selling rate is 0.4% higher.  Similarly, the buying cash rate for the dollar is 1.5% less than the basic rate, while the selling cash rate is 1.5% higher.  Monetary measures to cool Spain's overheated economy are beginning to take hold, just in time to let the Socialist government claim success for its policies in next month's elections.  Economy Minister Carlos Solchaga said signs of a slowdown in private consumption, coupled with significant reductions in Spain's inflation and money-supply growth rates during August, indicate that further austerity measures won't be needed.  "Though consumption remains strong, a certain deceleration is already visible," he told a press conference.  Measures imposed earlier this year to tighten credit and bring forward some tax payments "are having their effect and will surely make other measures unnecessary," he declared.  His statements, coinciding with publication of a slower-than-expected 0.2% gain in Spain's consumer-price index in August, give a strong boost to the government's campaign for re-election on Oct. 29.  After several months of unfavorable statistics, Mr. Solchaga was able to announce a significant slowdown in Spain's principal money-supply indicator in August, reflecting slower credit growth.  Liquid assets held by the public grew 10.3% in August from a year earlier, compared with a rate of 12.4% in July, he said.  Though Spain's trade deficit widened to $2.35 billion in August from $1.81 billion a year earlier, Mr. Solchaga said the figures were "not bad" and indicated slower import growth.  The reduction in total domestic demand, meanwhile, was being achieved without significantly affecting the buoyancy of investment spending, he added.  Following the August inflation figure, which brought Spain's year-to-year inflation rate to 6.6% from 7.4%, Mr. Solchaga said he aimed to lower inflation for all of 1989 to below last year's 5.8%.  He indicated that the Socialists, if re-elected, would propose a 1990 budget that would be neither expansionary nor restrictive.  He declined to give details, but he said spending wouldn't be allowed to outpace the rate of economic growth.  In part, his remarks amounted to a rebuttal of suggestions from the Communist coalition that the Socialists plan new economic austerity measures if re-elected next month.  Though the Socialists are widely expected to win the elections, the main issue is whether they will retain a parliamentary majority.  If they don't, some analysts think they could be forced to rely on the Communist coalition for support in parliament, potentially heralding a leftward shift in economic policies.  In statements clearly designed to counteract such pressures, Mr. Solchaga offered left-wing voters the prospect of several more years of strong economic expansion.  "We have strong growth prospects ahead of us, which if channelled correctly can give growth rates well in excess of other European countries," he said.  PepsiCo Wines & Spirits International said it plans to introduce Priviet, a premium vodka from Russia, in the U.S. in October.  Priviet, whose ad pitch will be "Serious vodka you don't have to take too seriously," will be priced around $10 a bottle, compared with the $13 generally charged for PepsiCo's Stolichnaya line of Russian vodkas.  Priviet will be launched in Boston, Chicago, Dallas and Rhode Island.  PepsiCo expects to roll it out nationally next year.  The new vodka will be included as part of a 1972 trade agreement between the Soviet Union and PepsiCo Inc., a soft-drink, snack food and restaurant concern.  Under the pact, Pepsi-Cola concentrate is sold to the Soviet Union, and in return, PepsiCo is given the rights to supply Russian vodkas in the U.S.  Translated roughly from Russian, Priviet means "my best regards," PepsiCo said.  You asked for a soft landing.  You got it.  If investors are finding the economic environment bewildering these days, they shouldn't complain.  Confusion is the consequence of the long-hoped-for soft landing, that catch-all phrase that connotes moderating economic growth, declining inflation and lower interest rates.  After all, a soft landing is neither fish nor fowl.  It isn't a powerful economy that drives corporate earnings (and eventually inflation) sharply higher, but neither is it a sickening plunge into recession.  "We're all groping for the trend in the economy, and the data are contradictory," says Brian J. Fabbri, chief economist at Midland Montagu in New York.  "If it weren't and the statistics were all bad, we'd be talking about a recession.  If the statistics were uniformly good, we'd be talking about an accelerating economy and no need for the Federal Reserve to ease" credit.  But all this leaves investors confused and worried.  Because the economic picture is so puzzling, they don't know whether to buy or sell stocks, and which stocks they should own.  That's particularly important now because this is the stage at which the economy is delicately balanced and could move quickly either into a recession or acceleration.  And that's the trouble with the "soft landing" analogy.  While an airplane taxis to the gate and shuts off its engines after landing, the economy just keeps rolling right along.  "The logical flaw in the whole concept of a soft landing is that there isn't any end," says James Solloway, chief economist at Argus Research in New York.  "You either get more softness, ending up in a recession, or you take off again.  You can't keep soft landing forever."  The lack of a clear direction for the economy contributes to what some market experts call "data paralysis," the tendency of traders and investors to await whatever the next economic statistics are in the hope that a clear trend will develop.  Yet in the midst of a soft landing, the latest economic reports aren't very helpful.  Take last week's batch of statistics.  No one claims that August retail sales, up 0.7%, were robust, but they weren't dismal either.  The producer-price index -- which measures wholesale price inflation -- shows inflation dropping, but the declines were from falling prices in the volatile areas of food and fuel.  The trade gap surprised most analysts by shrinking, rather than growing, and factory utilization and industrial production didn't change much from previous months' reports.  So where does all that information leave forecasters?  Argus' Mr. Solloway is sticking to his guns and continuing to predict a recession, probably beginning before the end of the year.  Yet Joseph McAlinden, director of research at Dillon Read, says the data reinforce his bullish view of the economy and the stock market.  Mr. Solloway's gloomy prediction of a recession stems from what he sees as a tight Federal Reserve credit policy aimed at checking inflation.  Relatively high interest rates are slowing retail sales, while manufacturing inventories are growing.  At some point, probably soon, that leads to manufacturing cutbacks, he says, and that's what a recession is all about.  "It's a recession brought on by the simple fact that monetary policy is being kept tight to keep inflation in check," he says.  The one bright spot in his outlook?  "It will be a mild recession, nothing like the ones we had in the mid-'70s and early '80s."  Consistent with that forecast, Argus is recommending that investors place their bets on such traditional defensive stocks as food, drug and entertainment issues and avoid any stocks tied to the economic cycle, particularly autos.  The one exception: International Business Machines.  "IBM offers some very good value," says A.C. Moore, director of research at Argus.  "It isn't up as much as many cyclical stocks are, and there's every reason to believe that over the next several years demand will continue for the computer hardware and data processing equipment that IBM makes."  Mr. McAlinden, looking at the same economic data, rejects the notion of a recession any time soon.  "The overall picture is still somewhat murky, but it's converging toward a pattern of an economy that's not falling apart and that isn't overheating with inflation," he says.  "That's all very bullish."  If there's going to be any trouble at all, he adds, it's likely to be that the economy zooms upward, rather than into a recession.  "Right now, I'm very bullish on the equity market, but after a few months I think the economy is going to turn out to be expanding too strongly," he says.  "Ultimately, inflation will worsen, and the Fed will respond to that with a severe tightening.  But that might not play out until some time next year."  Thus Mr. McAlinden isn't at all reluctant to recommend some cyclical stocks such as heavy machinery and factory equipment, albeit with a few caveats.  One is that investors should favor issues more closely tied to capital spending, rather than industrial materials like chemicals and paper.  Another is that they should look for secondary stocks, not the biggest and best-known names in an industry.  "Where the fundamentals are good, I think secondary stocks will be the target of a lot of buying," he says.  "I expect the Amex {American Stock Exchange} and over-the-counter markets to outperform the Dow Jones industrials."  One note of caution from Mr. McAlinden: be wary of takeover stocks.  The problems that junk bond-financed companies are running into, most notably Campeau Corp.'s troubles, don't bode well for takeover speculation, he says.  "If these problems are cropping up now with modest inflation, interest rates down and the economy expanding, what in God's name do you think will happen with extremely tight money and an economic downturn?" he asks.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  Stock prices rose modestly as stock buying to settle futures and options positions offset more selling of takeover issues.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average gained 9.69 points to 2674.58.  A "triple witching hour" -- the nearly simultaneous expiration of stock index futures, options on index futures and options on individual stocks-boosted trading volume on the New York Stock Exchange to 234.9 million shares, the largest in three months.  But declining issues on the Big Board were ahead of gainers 837 to 651.  For the week, the Dow Jones Industrial Average was off 34.96 points, or 1.3%.  Among blue-chip stocks, General Electric climbed 1 3/8 to 57 1/4; General Motors rose 5/8 to 49 1/8; American Express added 1 to 36 7/8; Bethlehem Steel closed at 22 3/8, up 1; Westinghouse Electric gained 1 1/4 to 68 3/8 and United Technologies added 1 to 55 7/8.  As traders and investors shied away from takeover issues amid turmoil in the junk-bond market, hotel and casino stocks dropped sharply.  Hilton Hotels lost 5 3/4 to 96 7/8 and traded as low as 96; Kyle Krueger, a senior vice president of Eagle Asset Management, thinks that the stock could lose 25% of its value without the prospect of a takeover.  Holiday fell 1 5/8 to 78 3/8, Circus Circus Enterprises lost 1 1/8 to 46 5/8, Golden Nugget slid 1 1/4 to 26 and Ramada slipped 3/8 to 14.  Georgia Gulf plummeted 5 1/8 to 52 1/8.  NL Industries, controlled by Dallas investor Harold C. Simmons, said it wouldn't pursue a proxy fight for control of the board because of Georgia Gulf's decision to consider a sale or restructuring.  NL rose 1/8 to 26.  Other casualties on the takeover front included American Medical International, which went down 1 1/4 to 22 1/8; Honeywell, down 1 5/8 to 80 7/8; International Minerals & Chemical, down 2 1/2 to 50 1/4; Sea Containers, down 2 1/8 to 59 3/8; Ferro, down 3 to 31 1/2, and Armstrong World Industries, down 1 1/4 to 42 1/2.  But MGM/UA Communications gained 1 7/8 to 22 1/2 after accepting a sweetened takeover bid of $25 a share from Australia's Qintex Group and ending discussions with News Corp. about a rival offer.  Qintex Entertainment, the U.S. unit of Qintex, rose 1 1/8 to 7 3/8 in over-the-counter trading; News Corp. added 5/8 to 24 5/8 on the Big Board.  Di Giorgio, which put itself up for sale, went up 1 to 33 3/4.  The company said others besides investor Arthur Goldberg, who is bidding $32 a share, have expressed interest in buying all or part of its operations.  AMR, which owns American Airlines, fell 1 3/4 to 75 7/8 as 2.2 million shares changed hands.  Chairman Robert Crandall told analysts he expects slower earnings growth in the third and fourth quarters, as well as next year.  Other airline stocks also ran into selling, including UAL, which dropped 3/4 to 279 3/4 even though investor Marvin Davis said he would match the $300-a-share offer from a labor-management group if that bid isn't completed.  Davis has already offered $275 a share for the parent company of United Airlines.  Elsewhere in the sector, Delta Air Lines fell 1 to 70 5/8, USAir Group dropped 1/4 to 46 3/8, Southwest Airlines lost 3/8 to 26 3/8, Alaska Air Group eased 1/2 to 25 1/2 and Midway Airlines slid 7/8 to 17 1/4.  The Justice Department said it has taken over litigation of a whistleblower's lawsuit alleging fraud by Fairchild Control Systems Co., a unit of Paris-based Matra S.A.  The government charges that Fairchild Control, a former division of Fairchild Industries Inc., deliberately sold the Air Force defective devices used to test the transfer of fuel from jet fighters' spare tanks.  The devices were supposed to eliminate the need for inflight tests of the tanks.  Actual damages haven't been established, but penalties for the alleged false claims alone could exceed $1 million, the Justice Department said.  The original suit was filed in July 1988 by Neil Aliksanian, who had been a program manager for Fairchild Control until September 1987.  A Matra spokeswoman said the company hasn't received the lawsuit and officials won't comment until they can review it.  Value Line Inc. said a one-time, after-tax charge of $7.5 million related to its sale of Integrated Resources Inc. commercial paper resulted in a fiscal first-quarter loss of $927,000.  In the year-earlier quarter, the investment advisory service and money management firm had earnings of $4.7 million, or 47 cents a share.  Value Line incurred the charge in June, when it bailed out its $600 million money-market fund by buying the fund's $22.6 million holding of Integrated commercial paper.  The company said that in a subsequent transaction it sold $21.7 million face amount of that commercial paper on the open market.  These transactions resulted in the $7.5 million charge.  At the time, Integrated had defaulted on short-term debt.  In discussing the charge in its fiscal 1989 annual report, Value Line said it purchased the fund's holdings in order to protect its reputation and the continuing income from its investment advisory and money management business.  Value Line said revenue in the first quarter ended July 31 fell 10% to $15.6 million, from $17.3 million the year earlier.  The company declined to discuss other aspects of the quarterly report.  In national over-the-counter trading Friday, Value Line closed at $24, unchanged.  A tremendous change is taking place in West Germany.  Only yesterday the political parties shoved and jostled one another to grovel at East German ruler Erich Honecker's feet like so many German dachshounds.  Overnight they are shoving and jostling one another to prove that they are more anti-Honecker than thou.  The Social Democrats, who used to insist proudly that they invented the New Ostpolitik and therefore had first call to be received by Communist dictators, are now desperately defending a long-arranged visit to East Berlin against the Christian Democrats' charge that such a visit "betrays" the refugees from East Germany.  The Social Democrats did not have the sense to call off the visit, but they swore to confront the East Germans with "reform" demands -- whereupon they suffered the supreme humiliation: The communists withdrew their invitation.  This is what the free part of Germany has come to.  The Christian Democrats (CDU) of course do not look much better.  They have faithfully and brainlessly "continued" Social Democrat Willy Brandt's Ostpolitik.  CDU Chancellor Helmut Kohl received Erich Honecker with military honors in Bonn only two years ago this month; so did German President Richard von Weizsaecker, also of the CDU.  The East German regime was as repressive then as it is now.  West German payments to Erich Honecker total about seven billion Deutsche marks a year ($3.5 billion U.S.), with nary a demand on granting full human rights -- Bonn was satisfied with some reciprocal visiting and better transit travel and the release of prisoners.  No wonder Erich Honecker can boast that his is the most successful communist regime in the world, the prop of the U.S.S.R.  The Social Democrats and their allies, the Greens, laid down the line that there must not and will not be a German reunification.  Both parties have openly given their reason: such a call destabilizes the Honecker regime and angers Erich Honecker.  Egon Bahr, architect and chief negotiator of former Social Democratic Chancellor Willy Brandt's Ostpolitik treaties, has called the idea of German reunification "a lie," "hypocrisy" and "baloney."  The latter term (in German "Quatsch") he actually hurled at an East German audience only last year.  And The Christian Democrats, who at first fought Mr. Brandt's Ostpolitik, became thoroughly intimidated by it and the success it seemingly enjoyed with the voters.  They never expressly forswore reunification but never stood up for it either, hiding behind alibis: Reunification is, at best, a long way off; it can be achieved only with the support of "our neighbors,"; it is possible only within "a European solution."  East German refugees were long smeared with the imputation that they were "merely economic refugees" seeking the good life (as if it were indecent for anybody except West Germans to seek the good life).  This is not the fashion any more, but some diehard Honecker stabilizers still insist that the great flight movement has nothing to do with a wish for reunification; that the refugees are "merely seeking freedom."  Now even Mr. Bahr foresees reunification (although he used the Nazi term "Anschluss."  What worked the great change?  A sheer coincidence: The Hungarians happened to open their borders while thousands of East German summer holiday tourists were in the country, and these availed themselves of the unexpected chance to go West.  This caused a television sensation, but actually anybody with eyes to see -- and the Germans should have eyes to see, considering the reproach that they closed their eyes to Hitler's crimes -- could see East German dissatisfaction turning into desperation for many years.  After all, what did the East Germans build and maintain the Wall for?  As long as only a few people managed to get across the Wall, West German politicians could and did assure one another that if the East Germans did not come in masses it meant that they would not come in masses.  West German politicians were convinced that fascist governments may go but that communist regimes are for eternity -- the Thousand Year Reich at last -- leaving appeasement and "peace in our time" as the only option.  Election campaigns were fought in the free part of Germany on the theme of who gets the redder carpet and who is more loved by the oppressors.  But now the refugees are streaming across the border and alarming the world.  In the middle of the crisis, Erich Honecker was hospitalized with a gall stone operation.  It is becoming more and more obvious that his gallstone age communism is dying with him: the Bonn intelligence service "Bundesnachrichtendienst" reported that Gorbachev adviser Valentin Falin has warned that "widespread dissatisfaction among the East German population is likely to lead to hardly controllable mass demonstrations within a relatively short time -- next spring at the latest."  Mr. Falin based his assessment on the fact that East German leaders flatly refuse to entertain any idea of reform.  Their reason was convincingly explained by Professor Otto Reinhold, chief propagandist of East Germany's Communist party.  Other states, Mr. Reinhold said, have a national tradition.  East Germany, the so-called GDR, has nothing of the sort.  "What right to existence would a capitalist GDR have next to a capitalist Federal Republic of Germany?"  He asked, and answered: "None at all, of course."  But things are moving fast.  Erich Honecker is gravely sick.  Among the bunch of faceless party hacks at the top, no one offers serious hope for change.  Yet no West German politician realizes that the only way to avert the catastrophe Mr. Falin foresees is to take up the cause of the oppressed, to demand freedom for them without ifs or buts, to show them that they are not alone -- vide the Social Democrats just making fools of themselves.  If the East Germans feel left alone, if they do take to the streets, what will happen?  Will they meet the time-tested response of tanks and guns, as East Germans did in the great uprising of June 17, 1953, as Beijing's students did in May 1989?  We soon will know.  Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev's alleged rival Yegor Ligachev visited East Berlin last week to assure Erich Honecker that the Soviets stand by him according to their common "treaty of friendship and support."  "Support" against whom?  Mr. Ligachev expressly cited West German "chauvinists" who are "dreaming of swallowing up the GDR."  He also announced that Mr. Gorbachev will himself attend the 40th anniversary of the GDR on October 7.  Will he call for reforms?  Or rather will he promise to "support" the East German system as Brezhnev "supported" the Prague hardliners in August 1968?  We have been told that "the Brezhnev doctrine is dead."  How dead is it?  The world should stand ready to take measure of Mikhail Gorbachev within three weeks.  ---  Mr. von Loewenstern is editorial page editor of the German daily, Die Welt.  The narrowing in the nation's merchandise trade deficit in July to the smallest level since December 1984 reflects the slowing demand for imports as the growth of the U.S. economy tapers off.  The Commerce Department put the July deficit at $7.58 billion, compared with $8.01 billion in June.  Imports dropped 2.5%.  Exports, which surged in June, fell 1.8% in July, a sign that the boom in U.S. exports may be coming to an end.  The export boom has helped reduce the trade deficit substantially in the past year.  Further improvements will depend more and more on curbing the U.S. appetite for imports, economists say.  "Exports are still going to grow, but increasingly the credit for shrinkage of the trade deficit is going to be given to imports," said Lawrence Krohn of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  The government report shows significant softening of demand for imported industrial supplies and capital goods in July.  Mr. Krohn said this is a clear reflection of the slowing U.S. economy.  Among other factors, the strength of the U.S. dollar is bound to make life tougher for U.S. exporters.  The dollar was strong on world currency markets Friday as traders responded to a decline in the trade deficit that was greater than many of them anticipated.  The trade figures fluctuate from one month to the next, but the trend remains favorable.  "The first seven months of 1989 clearly continue the progress shown in reducing the deficit since 1987," said Commerce Undersecretary Michael Darby.  For the first seven months of the year, the U.S. ran a trade deficit of $61.72 billion compared with $68.62 billion in the 1988 period.  Exports have climbed 15.3% so far this year while imports have risen 8.4%.  All the figures are adjusted to remove usual seasonal patterns.  The $7.58 billion July trade deficit was the smallest since a $6.8 billion deficit recorded in December 1984, the Commerce Department said.  The Commerce Department said the U.S. imported $38.32 billion of goods in July, down from $39.29 billion the month before but substantially above the $34.07 billion reported for July 1988.  Imports of industrial supplies dropped 2.7%.  Imports of capital goods, other than cars, were down 5.8%.  Imports of food and autos also fell, but imports of other consumer goods rose.  The value of petroleum imports, which aren't adjusted for seasonal fluctuations, also rose in July even though the price of oil fell.  The U.S. imported $4.32 billion of oil in July, up from $4.2 billion the month before.  That represents imports of 252.5 million barrels, up from 237.9 million in June and 214.7 million in July 1988.  Exports amounted to $30.74 billion in July, down from $31.29 billion in June, but well ahead of the $26.61 billion reported for July 1988.  Declining exports of food, consumer goods, autos and other goods overwhelmed an increase in exports of capital goods and industrial supplies.  Economists were encouraged by the improvement in the trade balance in capital goods, a sign that U.S. manufacturers are regaining some of the competitiveness they lost in recent years.  Exports of capital goods -- machinery, computers, airplanes and the like -- rose in July as imports fell.  In May, June and July, U.S. exports of capital goods exceeded imports by $2.9 billion compared with a surplus in the previous three months of $1.7 billion.  Exports of aircraft so far this year are running nearly 8% ahead of last year.  Exports of special industrialized machinery are up 19%.  The Commerce Department noted, however, that exports of manufactured goods of all kinds, before seasonal adjustments, totaled $21.97 billion in July, about $1 billion below the average for the previous six months.  Economists have been warning that the recent strength of the dollar eventually will hurt demand for U.S. goods by making them more expensive to foreigners.  The government said that the U.S. deficits with Japan, Western Europe, Taiwan, Korea, Mexico and the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries all widened in July.  The deficit with Canada narrowed.  The bilateral trade figures aren't seasonally adjusted.  ---  @ U.S. Merchandise Trade Deficits  @ (In billions of U.S. dollars, not seasonally adjusted)  @ July '89 June '89 July '88  @ Japan $4.04 $3.94 $4.05  @ Canada 0.45 0.55 1.00  @ Western Europe 0.85 0.23 1.83  @ NICs* 2.20 1.82 2.35  *Newly industrialized countries: Singapore, Hong Kong, Taiwan, South Korea Source: Commerce Department  Boeing Co., in an announcement that has the solar energy industry glowing, said it figured out how to trap the sun's rays and convert them to electricity at a level of efficiency never before achieved.  "It's a very exciting technological milestone," said Edgar DeMeo, manager of the solar-power program at the Electric Power Research Institute, a utility industry trade group.  "It's an indication of what might be possible in the future" commercially.  Experts cautioned, however, that Boeing's advance -- a solar cell made of two semiconductors sandwiched together -- has yet to prove itself outside the laboratory.  And they raised questions about whether the cost of a system originally intended for use on space-based satellites would ever be low enough for more earthly applications.  "Boeing has taken a giant leap, but the cost is critical," said Charles Gay, president of Atlantic Richfield Co.'s Arco Solar unit, the world leader in the fledgling $100 million solar-cell market.  Still, Boeing hasn't hesitated to dream.  Lewis Fraas, a research scientist at the Seattle-based aerospace company, maintained that the Boeing cell will eventually produce electricity for as little as 10 cents per kilowatt hour, making it competitive with conventionally derived power.  "I see it as a source for utilities in the Southwest," Mr. Fraas said.  He said one key to lowering the cost of the Boeing cell, which churns out electricity as efficiently as many coal, oil and nuclear operations, will be to mass-produce its special parts.  He predicted that the cell could find iself in space within three years and be employed terrestrially within a decade.  To be precise, the Boeing cell managed an efficiency rating of 37%.  That's the ratio of electricity generated to the solar energy received on the cell's surface.  The previous record, 31%, was set last year at the Sandia National Laboratory in Albuquerque, N.M., and officials there didn't expect their mark to fall so quickly.  "We likened it to breaking the four-minute mile in running," said Don Schueler, Sandia's manager of solar programs.  Boeing officials have compared the making of their cell to running a three-minute mile.  After all, it was a tough, 2 1/2-year task that depended on persistence, creativity and -- most of all perhaps -- serendipity.  "We made some mistakes as we went along," Mr. Fraas said, "but eventually we picked the right materials."  They are: gallium arsenide and gallium antimonide.  The visible part of sunshine passes onto a transparent layer made out of the first semiconductor where it's absorbed and converted into electricity.  The trick, though, is that infrared light passes through to the second layer, where it's also converted to electricity.  In most solar cells, made from silicon, the infrared energy gets lost.  Mr. Fraas said the Boeing scientists knew they could achieve a 28% efficiency with the layer of gallium arsenide and theoretically could get an additional 9% efficiency if only they could come up with a way to trap the lost infrared light.  Nonetheless, he said, "We were surprised when the numbers added up.  We impressed ourselves."  The solar-cell industry is still tiny, supplying just a fraction of the world's energy needs, mostly in remote locations where plugging into a commercial power grid is impractical.  But the market, in which global competition is escalating, has tremendous potential for growth.  Linda Ladas, director of programs at the Solar Energy Industries Association, a trade group representing 200 companies, said that in the Third World particularly, more and more countries are turning to solar energy as a staple of electric power.  Bonneville Pacific Corp. said its fiscal first-quarter loss widened to $1.3 million from a year-earlier loss of $906,000 as a result of a corporate repositioning.  Revenue for the quarter ended July 31 increased 51%, to $9.9 million from $6.6 million.  Bonneville, which develops and operates alternative-energy plants, said in Salt Lake City that it is repositioning itself from short-term construction and the sale of power projects to long-time ownership.  The company also said it is on target to meet its goal of generating 70% of its revenue from recurring power sales and owning 800,000 kilowatts of producing power projects by April 1992.  With regulators clamping down on the penny-stock industry, one of its largest and most controversial brokers, Blinder, Robinson & Co., is feeling the pressure.  Profits and revenue are sliding and the once-bustling underwriting business is dormant at the 20-year-old Denver company, long considered the nation's biggest broker of the low-priced, high-risk stocks.  In an interview, penny-stock mogul Meyer Blinder moans: "Right now, with the way the climate is, everyone is against the penny-stock market."  Blinder Robinson, a unit of Blinder International Enterprises Inc., reported a $14.8 million loss for the year ended Jan. 27 on revenue of $74.2 million.  That's a sharp reversal from the previous year, when Blinder Robinson earned $7.5 million on revenue of $136.2 million.  More recent quarterly results from the brokerage company aren't available, but Blinder's parent reported a $3.4 million loss on revenue of $25.4 million for the six months ended July 28.  Mr. Blinder, the tough-talking, 67-year-old president of the company that bears his name, complains that Blinder Robinson is under siege by regulators and the media.  Regulators are "burning down the house to get rid of some termites," he says.  It's all due to the intense scrutiny the $10 billion penny-stock business is getting these days from federal and state securities regulators.  They estimate that fraud and stock manipulation in that market cost investors $2 billion annually.  Investigations, enforcement actions and brokerage company closings are up sharply since 1987, when the penny-stock regulators began in earnest to crack down on abuses.  Both Blinder Robinson and its biggest competitor, Denver-based Stuart James Co., were hit with enforcement actions by securities regulators this year.  "People are starting to come out of the woodwork" to talk about fraudulent practices in the industry, says Frank Birgfeld, district director for the National Association of Securities Dealers in Denver.  The NASD oversees the over-the-counter market.  "That kind of publicity could hardly help the situation" at penny-stock companies, Mr. Birgfeld adds.  There are some 325 penny-stock brokerage companies in 29 states.  Penny stocks are generally priced below $3 a share.  They include many of the 13,000 issues that trade on the over-the-counter market -- but outside the computerized Nasdaq system.  Price quotes for the issues appear daily in the "pink sheets" published by the National Quotation Bureau.  Certainly, many of the stocks aren't worthless and are issued by legitimate companies.  Blinder Robinson, once the penny-stock industry's most prominent member with 1,100 brokers in 35 states, has had repeated run-ins with the Securities and Exchange Commission over the past 11 years.  The agency has brought a series of enforcement actions against Blinder Robinson with mixed results.  Last year, federal agents raided the company's offices.  These are tough times for Mr. Blinder and his firm.  After winning dismissal of a six-year-old SEC action against it, Blinder Robinson became the target in May of a sweeping enforcement action by the state of Florida that could result in more than $5 million in penalties and put the company out of business in the state.  The company also has been hauled into court by former customers, who have filed class-action lawsuits charging it with securities fraud, excessive markups on stocks and racketeering.  The cases are pending in federal court in Philadelphia.  Blinder Robinson has denied any wrongdoing and vowed to vigorously defend itself against the legal actions.  But the mounting pressure is clearly taking a toll.  Blinder Robinson was once known as the king of penny-stock initial public offerings, averaging about a dozen a year.  So far in 1989, the company has underwritten only one IPO, Bonso Electronics, according to the IPO Reporter, a newsletter on new issues.  Mr. Blinder blames the regulatory clampdown for the dearth of underwritings.  "I don't know if we'll be able to do any more," he says.  Things have gotten so bad that the brokerage company's parent, headed by Mr. Blinder, has asked shareholders to change the company's name to Intercontinental Enterprises Inc. to distinguish it from the brokerage unit.  According to Mr. Blinder, "Everybody thinks Blinder International is the broker-dealer."  The issue will be voted on at the company's annual meeting scheduled for Oct. 16.  Mr. Blinder last month told Denver newspapers he was selling his headquarters building and moving his operations out of the state to escape harassment from reporters and regulators.  Now, Mr. Blinder says he isn't planning to move, though he says he would sell his building for the right price.  Some penny-stock brokers say that Stuart-James, which has about 1,500 employees and 50 offices nationwide, has eclipsed Blinder Robinson as the industry's biggest broker.  The company was founded in 1983 by Stuart Graff and James Padgett, two former employees of Blinder Robinson.  Mr. Graff, who was named in the pending SEC action against Stuart-James, resigned as the company's chairman two weeks ago, but will serve as a consultant to Stuart-James.  Marc Geman, the company's general counsel, says the resignation was prompted by Mr. Graff's desire to devote less time to the company's operations, rather than by the concern's run-ins with regulators.  Stuart-James has denied the charges brought by the SEC.  "We aren't feeling any heat," Mr. Geman maintains.  He quickly adds: "We recognize that there's a lot of focus on the industry at the moment, but the focus is mainly on pink sheets and on blind pools," which are securities issued for companies that don't yet have any business operations.  Stuart-James officials are working hard to shed their image as purveyors of speculative penny-stocks.  "We have taken ourselves out of penny deals," says Elizabeth Wills, vice president of compliance.  "There's a significant difference between most of our deals and those that come out under $1."  Stuart-James proudly notes that the average price of the five IPOs it has either managed or co-managed this year is $1.55 a share, up from an average of 24 cents a share for the six new issues it was involved in last year, and the 11-cent-a-share average on the eight IPOs it brought in 1987.  ---  CELEBRATIONS AND CIRCUIT BREAKERS: The National Association of Securities Dealers celebrated its 50th birthday Friday with a luncheon in Washington.  Among the speakers at the gathering were Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady, Hambrecht & Quist Chairman Gordon Macklin and MCI Chairman William McGowan.  Today, however, it's back to work.  The Board of Governors of the NASD, which runs the Nasdaq trading system in addition to other tasks, is scheduled to decide whether the agency will renew its pact with the Securities and Exchange Commission to shut down Nasdaq during steep drops in stock-market prices if the commission requests it.  The agreement, reached last year, removed a roadblock to a plan by the SEC and the major stock and futures exchanges to establish across-the-board trading suspensions, known as circuit breakers.  Joseph Hardiman, NASD president, said a decision probably will be announced tomorrow.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  The Nasdaq Composite Index lost 1.21 to 467.57 on 130.9 million shares.  For the week, the composite was down 0.8%.  The Nasdaq 100 Index of large nonfinancial stocks lost 0.90 to 443.92.  The Nasdaq Financial Index dropped 1.23 to 463.54.  The stocks of two companies that are in the midst of takeover talks were hurt.  Analysts say the weakness in the junk-bond market is reducing interest in many takeover stocks.  LIN Broadcasting, which has proposed merging with BellSouth and is also an acquisition target of McCaw Cellular Communications, slid 1 1/8 to 105.  Dunkin' Donuts, a company that is being pursued by a group including a unit of Unicorp Canada, saw its stock fall 1 to 45 1/4.  Lincoln Telecommunications plunged 5 to 60.  The stock has suffered since the company announced that it was lowering to 10% from 20% the threshold of ownership for triggering its shareholder rights plan.  Mail Boxes Etc. slid 3 1/4 to 27 after a federal jury ordered the company to pay millions of dollars in damages related to the sale of shares of its predecessor company.  Qintex jumped 1 1/8 to 7 3/8.  The company amended its agreement to acquire MGM/UA Communications, salvaging the merger.  First Executive's rights, which began trading on Tuesday, dropped another 1/4 to 1 1/2, a 14% decline.  On Thursday, the rights lost 30% when they fell 3/4 to 1 3/4.  Analysts have linked the drop to news that I.C.H., which holds 20% of First Executive, will sell its rights.  DDI Pharmaceuticals gained 5/8 to 5 1/2.  Traders say a favorable article on the company's Orgotein painkiller in the current issue of the American Journal of Medicine has spurred interest in the stock, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Orgotein is used in the treatment of a degenerative joint disease.  Whittle Communications Limited Partnership, under fire from educators for its Channel One TV news program for schools, said it has sold $150 million in advertising time on the planned satellite-delivered network.  Industry observers and critics of Channel One had expected controversy surrounding the commercially supported school program to cripple Whittle's sales effort to advertisers.  Educational groups have sharply criticized Whittle for the four 30-second commercials that will air on the daily 12-minute news program.  Christopher Whittle, chairman of the media company, said that after only three months of selling, he has received signed contracts from five national advertisers over eight different product categories.  The contracts with advertisers are all at least three years long and currently range in size from $13 million to $53 million.  Advertisers are paying $150,000 per 30-second spot per day.  Mr. Whittle said the advertising contracts contained $51 million in the first year of the program.  He said he estimates he'll sell $90 million in commercial time in the first year, "way over" the amount needed to break even in Channel One's first year.  Channel One will be launched in at least 1,000 schools in March 1990.  By December 1990, Mr. Whittle said he will have as many as 8,000 schools equipped to receive Channel One, which will reach an estimated six million students.  Mr. Whittle won't disclose the names of the advertisers, but they are expected to be makers of jeans, soft drinks, athletic shoes and other products targeted at high school students.  Bombardier Inc. agreed to acquire ANF-Industrie, a unit of the French industrial group, ANF, and the second-largest maker of railway equipment in France.  The Montreal aerospace and transportation concern said the purchase is valued at C$22 million (US$18.6 million), is subject to the approval of the French treasury and should be completed by year end.  Bombardier said the purchase will enable it to strengthen its position in the European rail-equipment market.  ANF-Industrie has about 1,150 employees.  Its annual sales averaged C$250 million during the past five years.  Bombardier, one of its units and ANF-Industrie are members of the Euroshuttle Consortium which will supply shuttle trains for the English Channel tunnel.  Pier 1 Imports Inc., Fort Worth, Texas, said net income was flat at $7.3 million in its second quarter ended Aug. 26.  The specialty retailer said in July that it expected the results to be flat because of discounting in some lines, particularly cotton apparel.  Per-share earnings fell to 20 cents from 24 cents.  Pier 1 had an average of 35.8 million shares outstanding in this year's second period, compared with 30.7 million a year earlier.  Sales rose 25% to $134.9 million from $107.8 million.  In the first six months, net was $14 million, or 39 cents a share, up 11% from $12.6 million, or 41 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 21% to $248.8 million from $204.9 million.  Small investors are bailing out of a few large junk bond mutual funds even as the big-money crowd is scouring the market, making low-ball bids for junk.  Fidelity Investments' $1.8 billion High Income Fund had a net outflow of nearly $13 million Friday.  That was narrower than Thursday's $20 million outflow, which was a one-day record for the fund.  Small investors also pulled out money at a slower pace Friday from the $1.2 billion Vanguard High Yield Bond Portfolio, which had seen $17 million flow out Thursday.  And the exodus slowed at the $1.1 billion T. Rowe Price High Yield Fund, which had shrunk $10 million on Thursday.  Fund groups said they didn't lose control of much of the outgoing money, as a large part of it was transferred into their own money-market funds.  Mutual funds are among the largest holders of junk, accounting for about a quarter of the whole high-yield, high-risk market.  Any more bad news could drive down prices further for junk debt securities, which were battered by last week's cash crunch at Campeau Corp., the big real estate and retailing company.  Most of the small investors' flight has been from the direct-marketed, "no load" mutual funds.  There has been considerably less shrinkage in the assets of funds sold through brokers, who are encouraging investors to stand pat.  And so far, fund managers said, they have had enough cash to pay off departing investors without being forced to sell much of the junk holdings at distressed prices.  But last week's frenetic activity raises questions about how investors might fare if portfolio managers, faced with persistently strong redemptions of fund shares, are forced to dump chunks of their holdings.  That is because liquidity -- the ability to buy and sell bonds in a market -- has eroded for many junk bond issues.  Any large-scale attempt to sell would compound the problem.  Moreover, heavy selling by funds would have to come from their larger, more liquid junk issues, analysts said, because these are the most actively traded.  Already, "quality" junk came under some selling pressure Thursday and Friday because these issues are the easiest for mutual funds to sell, traders said.  Among the so-called quality issues that tumbled:  -- R.H. Macy 14 1/2% bonds due 2001 were quoted at 98 7/8, down about two points Friday from recent levels.  One point is equal to $10 for each $1,000 face amount.  -- Kroger 12 7/8% bonds due 1999 were quoted at 103 1/4, down about 2 3/4 points on the day.  -- Safeway 11 3/4% bonds maturing 1996 fell one point to 101.  -- Ralph's Supermarkets 14% bonds due 2000 fell about four points to 101.  Ralph's is a Campeau unit.  The Merrill Lynch High Yield Index finished at 184 Thursday, a decline of three index points from Monday's level.  Generally, the junk bond market for the week fell four to five points.  As mutual funds facing redemptions sold some issues, traders said, a number of bargain hunters were trying to pick up these bonds.  "Some of these portfolio managers are like Jesse James -- they're trying to steal bonds," said Alan Schlesinger, head trader at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp., noting that most buyers were bidding below the market.  Investors continued to abandon the bonds of two Campeau units -- Allied Stores Corp. and Federated Department Stores Inc. Allied's 11 1/2% bonds maturing in 1997 were quoted late Friday at 27, down an additional point from the previous day's levels.  Federated's 16% bonds maturing 2000 were quoted at 60.  In approximately one month, the Allied debt has fallen 27 points.  Federated's 16% issues have tumbled about 22 points.  This week the selling is likely to continue, albeit on a more selective basis, analysts said.  "I think some of the lower tier credits like Allied, Federated, Interco and Wickes may continue to languish, but some of the higher quality credits that have been beaten down may rally," said Robert Lupo, managing director at Smith Barney.  About $1.5 billion in new junk debt is scheduled to be offered to investors this week.  Despite last week's debacle, most issues are expected to be sold.  Merrill Lynch officials said they still have a full order book for $100 million of debt of Bib Co., a maker of products including baby bibs.  "What the market wants to see are deals in non-recessionary businesses," said Brian Doyle, a senior analyst at Salomon Brothers.  "In recession-oriented businesses, you are going to see {investors demand} lower leverage."  "There have to be completely different criteria," said one money manager who declined to be identified.  "We are going to demand different covenants."  @ ---  Friday's Market Activity  U.S. Treasury securities ended unchanged to 1/2 point higher ($5 for each $1,000 face amount) after a session of wild, rumor-driven trading.  "The werewolves were out here today," said one financial market analyst.  Rumors varied from failing money center banks and special Federal Reserve meetings.  All were denied.  There also was a rumor that President Bush was shot.  The benchmark 30-year Treasury bond -- the 8 1/8% issue maturing 2019 -- dipped to a 7/32 loss at one point, and rebounded one point from there in afternoon trading.  The roller-coaster session started on firm footing.  Prices initially rallied in response to news of an unexpected 0.4% drop in August producer prices.  Bonds then slipped into losses when analysts saw that the so-called "core inflation" rate -- producer prices minus the volatile food and energy component -- rose 0.5%.  The rise in core inflation dashed hopes of a near-term easing by the Federal Reserve.  Prices again reversed direction around midday, as participants began to focus on the dollar's advance, which has been triggered by the slimmer-than-expected $7.58 billion July trade deficit, the smallest trade gap in nearly five years.  The strong dollar spurred rumors that a large Japanese insurance company bought about $1 billion of 30-year bonds early in the afternoon, as well as a large amount of December bond futures contracts.  As a result, bond prices soared to nearly a one-point gain from the day's nadir.  Outside of the junk market, most high-grade issues closed about unchanged.  On the new-issue front, a $200 million issue of Student Loan Marketing Association notes was priced to yield 8.29% through lead underwriter Goldman Sachs & Co.  The non-callable three-year notes were priced one fifth of a percentage point above the comparable Treasury note.  According to figures provided by Securities Data Co., corporate new issuance last week almost tripled from the prior week, with about $3.5 billion in debt coming to market through Thursday.  The previous week, about $1.3 billion in new corporate debt was issued.  The World Bank and its affiliate, the International Development Association, approved $275.3 million in loans to India, Kenya and Somalia.  India will get $145 million from the World Bank and $55 million from the IDA to help finance technological research centers and imports of capital goods and foreign technology for use by about 1,200 industrial companies.  Kenya will receive $46.8 million from the IDA to expand coffee production and processing facilities, and Somalia will receive $28.5 million from the IDA for agricultural irrigation projects.  The World Bank loan to India will be at a variable interest rate, currently 7.74% a year.  The IDA credits will be interest-free except for administrative fees.  Harlin Holdings Pty.  Ltd. raised its stake in Elders IXL Ltd., an Australian brewing, agribusiness, resources and financial-services company, to 39% on an undiluted basis, or 47% fully diluted.  Harlin is a closely held concern controlled by Elders executives.  It owned about 18% of Elders.  AFP Group PLC and Goodman Fielder Wattie Ltd., which jointly owned 17% of Elders, in May proposed to sell their stake to other Elders shareholders on a pro-rata basis at 3 Australian dollars (US$2.32) a share.  Harlin agreed to take up any Elders shares that other holders didn't buy.  In a statement Sunday, Harlin said it acquired 285.1 million additional Elders shares through this underwriting agreement, or 15.5% of Elders.  Harlin also is offering to buy on the stock market any Elders shares that holders want to sell at A$3 each.  That offer, which opened Aug. 28 and expires Sept. 27, so far has attracted 85 million Elders shares, bringing Harlin's beneficial ownership of Elders up to 39% on an undiluted basis and 47% fully diluted.  Corestates Financial Corp. turned up the heat in the bidding war for First Pennsylvania Corp. by offering to acquire this bank-holding company for stock valued at $18.50 a share, or $721.5 million.  The battle for control of First Pennsylvania is a complex one.  First Pennsylvania already has an offer on the table from Reading, Pa.-based Meridian Bancorp Inc. for stock valued at $18 a share, or $704 million.  Also, in 1986, First Pennsylvania had agreed to be acquired by Marine Midland, the New York-based unit of Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp. of Hong Kong.  But Marine Midland agreed to step aside after Meridian offered to pay it $30 million to acquire its 24.9% voting stake in First Pennsylvania, plus another $100 million for the First Pennsylvania preferred stock it holds.  Corestates didn't emerge as a suitor for First Pennsylvania until Meridian, an aggressive, out-of-town competitor, came forward with an offer for First Pennsylvania.  Corestates, a stalwart in the Philadelphia banking community, had to contend previously with out-of-town competition when Pittsburgh's PNC Financial Corp. took over Provident National Bank and when Mellon Corp., also of Pittsburgh, acquired Girard Bank.  Under the terms of the Corestates offer, First Pennsylvania shareholders would receive Corestates stock valued at $18.50.  The Corestates offer expires at noon EDT today.  Meridian said it would like to top Corestates's bid for First Pennsylvania, but it failed to meet a deadline of 5 p.m. Saturday for submitting a higher offer.  It couldn't be learned which bank insisted on the tight deadline.  Meridian said it learned of the Corestates offer after the market closed Friday.  Meridian disclosed details of the Corestates bid over the weekend.  A spokesperson for Meridian said it still planned to submit a higher bid for First Pennsylvania.  Corestates said it hadn't intended to disclose its bid until today.  A Corestates spokesman said "we have made a complete offer" for First Pennsylvania.  He declined to comment on whether Corestates was negotiating with Marine Midland.  Officials of First Pennsylvania couldn't be reached to comment on the Corestates bid.  Democrats and civil-rights groups scored a victory earlier this year when they rejected President Bush's choice to be civil-rights chief.  Now, the Republicans see a chance to settle the score.  As Congress gears up to consider reversing the effect of a series of Supreme Court decisions this June covering job bias, GOP lawmakers are lying in wait.  They hope to use the debate not only to preserve the essence of the court decisions but to paint Democrats into a political corner by forcing them to defend such controversial positions as race-based quotas.  Those who oppose the court's decisions, charges Sen. Orrin Hatch (R., Utah), a senior member of the Senate Judiciary Committee, support "equality of results and reverse discrimination instead of equality of opportunity and color blindness."  These political divisions make it "difficult to reach an early revision," says House Speaker Thomas Foley (D., Wash.).  Civil-rights groups, such as the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People, have made passage of the legislation a top priority, but, says NAACP Executive Director Benjamin Hooks, "This may be a long-term fight, so we are digging in."  The pending partisan struggle comes at a time when civil-rights advocates in Congress, having withstood the Reagan administration's assault on affirmative action, had hoped to be able to set their sights on the next generation of legislation.  Instead, "the Supreme Court is making the country refight the civil-rights battles that were won in the 1960s and 1970s," charges Ralph Neas, executive director of the Leadership Conference on Civil Rights.  The Democrats drafting the bills are trying to tiptoe around an explicit debate over affirmative action.  They are, for instance, unlikely to include provisions aimed at reversing the effect of a ruling that struck down state and local government programs setting aside a certain number of contracts for minority-owned and women-owned businesses.  But Republicans are already labeling their efforts an endorsement of fixed percentages for minority hiring.  "The only alternative is to embrace quotas," says Wisconsin Rep. James Sensenbrenner, the ranking GOP member of the House Judiciary subcommittee on civil and constitutional rights.  The Supreme Court's decisions, while not directly addressing the core of the controversy over affirmative action, sharply narrowed civil-rights laws covering employment discrimination and made the methods of proving violations much more difficult.  Republicans, including President Bush and Attorney General Dick Thornburgh, have made clear that they don't believe remedial legislation is necessary.  But when William Lucas, the former Michigan sheriff who was Mr. Bush's nominee to be assistant attorney general for civil rights, agreed with the president's assessment, his rejection by the Senate Judiciary Committee along party lines was virtually guaranteed.  Republicans were infuriated by Mr. Lucas's defeat -- Senate GOP Leader Robert Dole of Kansas slammed it as "crass political partisanship" -- and have since redoubled their attacks on the Democratic plans.  Sen. Hatch calls the Supreme Court decisions "sound, reasonable and genuinely moderate" and warns that if Democrats insist on trying to reverse them with legislation, he may do the same to cases from the 1970s that upheld affirmative-action plans.  Other Republicans believe they can use the debate over the civil-rights legislation to advance the cause of racially neutral, tax-based programs designed to foster economic growth among the poor, including enterprise zones and special venture-capital tax breaks for investments in poor areas.  "Quotas don't produce any meaningful results," says Sen. Phil Gramm (R., Texas).  "We need more jobs, more growth, more opportunity."  "This is an opportunity for Republicans to change the emphasis in civil-rights policy to one that is more constructive, emphasizing economic opportunities," says Alan Slobodin, a former GOP lawyer on the House Judiciary Committee now with the conservative Washington Legal Foundation.  But Democrats are proceeding with plans to introduce their comprehensive bill later this month in both the House and Senate.  "We are going to have to respond to these assaults," says Rep. Don Edwards (D., Calif.), chairman of the House Judiciary subcommittee on civil and constitutional rights.  "We shouldn't be going around narrowing in a mean-spirited way these civil-rights laws that have worked for so many years."  The legislation, which is still being drafted, is expected to require employers to justify their hiring practices when workers challenge them as discriminatory.  That's the way the Supreme Court had interpreted the law from 1971 until last June, when it ruled in a case involving Alaska salmon canneries that workers bear the burden of discrediting the employer's justification for hiring practices.  To undo a Supreme Court decision that allowed white firefighters in Birmingham, Ala., to challenge an eight-year-old, court-approved affirmative-action plan, the bill would also set a statute of limitations on bringing such challenges.  In addition, it would write into law previous Supreme Court rulings barring employment practices that are unintentionally discriminatory and  barring discriminatory terms and conditions of contracts between private parties.  If enacted, the legislation would be the first substantial new law aimed at battling race-based job discrimination since the Equal Employment Opportunity Act of 1972, which extended the landmark 1964 Civil Rights Act to public and private employers.  Besides the opposition from its GOP critics in Congress and the administration, the Democrats' bill will also likely be opposed by business interests, who fear it may go further than just overturning the effect of the Supreme Court rulings.  "The hue and cry that resulted after those decisions was overblown," says Frederick Krebs, a U.S. Chamber of Commerce lobbyist.  "Those cases were a fine-tuning.  Once you dip into it legislatively, you'll probably create more problems for us."  ---  @ Three Weeks in June  Major Job-Bias Decisions of 1988-89 Supreme Court term:  Martin vs.  Wilks: Allowed, 5-4, workers to file new lawsuits claiming reverse discrimination under court-approved affirmative-action plans.  Wards Cove Packing Co. vs.  Atonio: Imposed, 5-4, tougher standards on employees trying to use statistics to prove discrimination.  Patterson vs.  McLean Credit Union: Ruled, 5-4, that an 1866 civil-rights law, giving all citizens equal rights to make contracts, doesn't allow lawsuits involving harassment on the job or other conditions of employment.  Amoco Corp., Chicago, said it may sell its refining and marketing operations in the United Kingdom, where it holds only about 2% of the gasoline market.  The oil company said its Amoco (U.K.) Ltd. subsidiary has hired Morgan Stanley & Co.'s international unit to assist it in divesting the operations.  The company said the possible sale is part of a long-term strategy to shed refining and marketing operations outside the U.S. Amoco already has shed such operations in Italy, Australia and India.  "Several parties" interested in acquiring the facilities have already approached the company, Amoco said, although it didn't identify or characterize the parties.  The facilities include a 70% interest in the Milford Haven refinery, 250 service stations and interests in an oil pipeline and five product terminals.  The refinery has a capacity of about 108,000 barrels a day, a relatively modest output.  Ciba-Geigy Ltd. and Chiron Corp. began their previously announced $591 million, or $25.23-a-share, offer for the shares of Connaught BioSciences Inc. that they don't already own.  As previously reported, the offer for the Toronto-based vaccine and pharmaceutical company is contingent upon the tender of at least 11 million Connaught shares and the rejection by Connaught shareholders of a rival stock-swap offer from Institut Merieux S.A. of France, 50.3% controlled by Rhone-Poulenc S.A., France.  Ciba-Geigy, the Basel, Switzerland-based pharmaceutical concern, and Chiron, an Emeryville, Calif., biotechnology concern, already own 8%, or 2,045,640 shares, of Connaught's 25.5 million shares on a fully diluted basis.  If the minimum 11 million shares are tendered, Ciba-Geigy and Chiron, through a unit created for the acquisition, would gain control of 51% of the Canadian firm.  Ciba-Geigy and Chiron said the offer will remain open through midnight Toronto time Oct. 17, unless it's withdrawn or extended.  Punitive Award Allowed  In Arbitration Cases  THE FIRST Circuit Court of Appeals has issued a decision that may change the way small-business owners write contracts.  The ruling allows arbitrators in disputes to award punitive damages.  Small-business owners often include an arbitration clause in contracts to avoid costly litigation if a disagreement arises.  An arbitrator usually awards compensatory damages if the other party is declared guilty, for example, of malicious or fraudulent conduct.  But the court said that just because the parties agreed to resolve their dispute through arbitration "does not mean they should be required to surrender a legitimate claim to damages."  Many attorneys believe the new ruling will encourage companies to seek punitive damages when they otherwise may have been satisfied with a settlement.  Thomas Elkind, a Boston attorney with Gaston & Snow, recommends that businesses now make sure they stipulate in contracts that punitive damages would be excluded from any arbitration judgment.  The First Circuit Court of Appeals covers Puerto Rico and all of New England, except Connecticut.  Unless the Supreme Court rules otherwise, Mr. Elkind says he expects circuit courts in all 50 states to follow the First Circuit Court's ruling.  Little Guys Win One  In Beverly Hills  BEVERLY HILLS hardly seems the place for the little guy to get an even break, but some small-business owners recently struck a blow for equality in this ghetto of glitz.  The arena for this victory was the Beverly Hills Chamber of Commerce.  For decades, the chamber allocated voting power on a perfectly plutocratic basis: the more the company paid in dues, the more votes it got.  As a result, a single large company had as many as 52 votes.  This situation didn't sit well with some small-business owners, particularly ones whose operations were located in the less tony parts of Beverly Hills. (Yes, there are less tony parts of Beverly Hills.) Some of these businesspeople felt their areas were being slighted by city government on such matters as police protection, street maintenance and public parking for customers.  "And the city was greatly influenced by the chamber" on such matters, says Russ Levi, a local businessman who led the effort to change the voting rules.  The reformers' campaign included mass mailings to local residents, businesses and government officials.  As a result, the chamber recently changed its rules so that any single company can have a maximum of 10 votes.  This brings Beverly Hills in line with many of the other 3,500 chambers of commerce around the country, which in the past decade or so have put a cap on voting power.  But Beverly Hills and the others still have a way to go to meet the U.S. Chamber of Commerce's suggestion for business democracy: One firm gets one vote.  Advisory Group  Gets Sexism Complaints  THE SERVICE Corps of Retired Executives, whose members are mostly men, wants to get savvier in advising women entrepreneurs.  The volunteer group of retirees, which is funded by the federal Small Business Administration, has gotten complaints from women, says John Daniels, SCORE's executive director.  Women starting companies say that certain SCORE volunteers have asked such non-business questions as: "What does your husband think of this?  Who will watch the kids while you're working?"  Mr. Daniels says he's heard from one woman who appreciated business advice from a male volunteer, but disliked his addressing her as "dear" and "honey."  SCORE's older volunteers tend to make these gaffes, Mr. Daniels says, because they retired in the 1960s when women managers were scarce.  But SCORE's younger members are attempting to enlighten their elders in various ways.  SCORE is making a videotape to train members on do's and don't's of advising women.  It also has prepared a checklist on interviewing skills and is trying to recruit more retired women executives.  New Magazine Targets  Family Businesses  THE CROWDED magazine field will get yet another entry this November, with the debut of Family Business.  Philadelphia-based MLR Enterprises hopes for 100,000 initial circulation, and says it is prepared to put several million dollars into the venture.  The monthly magazine has hired former Psychology Today editor in chief Jack Nessel as editor.  "It's high risk," concedes Leonard Zweig, publisher.  One problem has been to convince potential advertisers that family business means more than mom-and-pop stores.  And the recent problems of Venture magazine underscore how hard it can be to identify and exploit a niche that involves small-business readers.  Mr. Zweig counters that family business is a big niche, with at least 1.5 million companies between $1 million and $100 million in annual revenue.  And he says Family Business will capitalize on feelings of isolation felt by family business owners, whose problems include lack of a successor, estate taxes and family feuds.  The new publication comes at a time of increased interest in family business among major accounting firms and investment houses.  And at least one new publication has already appeared.  Last October, McGraw-Hill began publishing a newsletter called Business Week Newsletter for Family Owned Business.  CMI Corp. said it is cutting its Oklahoma City work force by 100 people, in part because of losses related to a waste disposal contract with the city.  The maker of road-building equipment has about 800 employees in Oklahoma City.  It said it also is trying to reduce corporate expenses to strengthen its financial position.  The company said benefits from the work-force reduction won't be evident until early next year.  CMI operates a waste-disposal facility that converts solid waste to energy, which is then sold.  The company said Oklahoma City officials are considering making an offer for the contracts and assets associated with the facility on the basis of an appraisal scheduled for next month.  In the first half of 1989, CMI had net income of $335,000, or one cent a share, on sales of $53.3 million.  SPORTS: Dominique Wilkins, All-Star forward with the Atlanta Hawks, signed a four-year personal endorsement contract with Reebok International.  He'll wear Reebok's Jam Series basketball shoes.  Vitro S.A. said it extended for a second time its unsolicited, $20-a-share tender offer for Anchor Glass Container Corp., Tampa, Fla.  The offer, valued at about $251.4 million for the 89% stake Vitro doesn't already own, is now set to expire Thursday at 5 p.m. EDT.  Vitro, a Monterrey, Mexico-based conglomerate, had previously extended until last Thursday its offer for Anchor Glass, a maker of bottles and other glass containers.  The offer is considered the first unsolicited bid by a Mexican company for a U.S. concern.  Anchor's board unanimously rejected the offer last month and adopted a poison pill, or takeover-defense plan, to thwart Vitro's bid.  An Anchor spokesman said the company believes Vitro's offer is too low.  Vitro said about 7.7 million shares of Anchor's 13.9 million shares outstanding have already been tendered to Vitro.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Anchor Glass closed at $18.50, down 87.5 cents.  Cash-strapped Lone Star Technologies Inc., Dallas, said it made an annual interest payment due Aug. 28 on its $50 million in 8% convertible subordinated debentures due 2002, preventing a default on its debt.  A company spokeswoman said there wasn't a particular reason why the interest was paid last week.  Lone Star said it would postpone the payment in August because of a liquidity bind.  The payment had to be made by Sept. 26 to prevent a default.  Separately, the company said a federal bankruptcy judge refused to let its Lone Star Steel Co. unit make $4.5 million in pension contributions for 1988 and before.  As a result, liens could be placed on the parent company's and other units' assets if the payment isn't made in 60 days.  DeTomaso Industries Inc., Red Bank, N.J., said the National Association of Securities Dealers delisted its stock because of the company's negative net tangible asset position that arose from operating losses.  DeTomaso Chairman Alejandro DeTomaso said the company will appeal the decision to NASD's Board of Governors.  The stock will continue to trade on the national over-the-counter market, but it no longer will be quoted on NASD's automated quotation system.  The company had been operating since October 1988 with an exemption from NASD's listing requirements.  Mr. DeTomaso also said negotiations over long-term production with "certain automobile companies" are "proceeding satisfactorily."  He declined to name the auto makers, but Fiat S.p.A. recently announced it is negotiating to use some of DeTomaso's excess manufacturing capacity.  A spokesman for the company said Mr. DeTomaso expects to conclude the negotiations within the next 60 days.  DeTomaso Industries, which makes Maserati automobiles, Innocenti mini-cars and Moto Guzzi and Benelli motorcycles through its Italian units, had a loss of $29.4 million last year and another $3.8 million through the first six months of this year.  The dollar could inch higher after Friday's whipsaw movement, but bullish sentiment about the currency is clearly flagging, many traders say.  Any gains are seen as likely to be limited despite the healthy state of the U.S. economy and the nation's relative political calm, as the dollar can't gather momentum to top crucial resistance levels and central banks remain intent sellers.  Trying to push the dollar up sharply from current levels "will be tough," said Kevin Logan, chief economist at Swiss Bank Corp.  Dollar bulls had to run for cover Friday when the currency's roller-coaster action took the market by surprise.  The dollar initially soared on news that the U.S. merchandise trade deficit shrank to an unexpectedly narrow $7.58 billion in July from $8.01 billion in June.  The currency sustained those gains despite a barrage of sales by central banks of the U.S., Western Europe and Canada.  But at mid-afternoon, the dollar dived on massive profit taking and apparently groundless rumors that a major U.S. bank was in financial trouble because of junk-bond losses.  The rumor mill also produced false talk that President Bush had been shot, exacerbating the fall, traders said.  In late afternoon New York trading Friday, the dollar was at 1.9660 marks, down from 1.9755 marks late Thursday, and at 146.43 yen, down from 146.86 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5650, up from $1.5535.  In Tokyo Monday, the dollar opened at 145.90 yen, up 0.05 from Thursday's close.  Markets were closed there Friday for a holiday.  The dollar's broad trading ranges Friday took it to three-month highs of 2.0040 marks and 149.00 yen and then to intraday lows of 1.9350 marks and 144.40 yen.  Friday's dealings could best be described as "a massacre," said Walter Simon, a trader at Bank Julius Baer & Co.  "Between 1.96 and 1.9350 {marks} there were basically no prices and no bids," he said.  He added that dealings were reminiscent of June 15, when the dollar was propelled by favorable trade data and hit the year's highs of 2.0475 marks and 151.85 yen only to tumble on profit-taking.  As for this week, "I would guess that the first move is back up for a technical correction," said Mr. Simon.  But even so, he said the dollar may have problems rising far above resistance at 1.9675 marks.  While it may be too soon to say this year's dollar rise is drawing to an end, the mood about the U.S. currency has changed, many currency analysts say.  Earlier this year, the superstrong dollar withstood the Federal Reserve's easing of monetary policy, a round of interest-rate increases overseas, massive intervention and bearish statements by a number of major monetary officials.  But, as on Friday, even highly questionable rumors can cause a substantial retreat.  The dollar's vulnerability stems from the Federal Reserve's easing of credit during the summer, which produced lower rates that have diminished the attractiveness of dollar-denominated securities, some analysts say.  Lower U.S. rates didn't destroy the dollar's climb, but they have "taken out one of the most important props for the dollar's rise," said Mr. Logan of Swiss Bank.  "The momentum doesn't seem to be enough to take it above two . . . marks" now that interest rate differentials have narrowed.  The improbability of further Fed easing in the near future, while buoying the dollar, isn't enough to fuel a sustained rally, many currency traders said.  The U.S. producer-price index rose 0.5% in August excluding the volatile food and energy category, suggesting that underlying inflation is still high enough to prevent imminent interest-rate reductions.  Interest rates aside, central banks remain a primary obstacle to a stronger dollar.  "Intervention remains a major block to significant appreciation," said Diego Giurleo, senior manager of treasury services at the Royal Bank of Canada.  Central banks, he said, "showed the guns" Friday when they zapped the dollar with sales after the trade data were released.  But although worries prevail about more intervention and interest-rate boosts in Europe and Japan, the dollar isn't likely to dive below support at 1.95 marks anytime soon, Mr. Giurleo said.  Hints about the central banks' dollar views will be sought when officials from the Group of Seven major monetary nations gather in Washington Sept. 23 for the semiannual International Monetary Fund/ World Bank meetings.  G-7 nations include the U.S., Japan, West Germany, Britain, France, Canada and Italy.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York Friday, gold for current delivery jumped $3.40 to $363.90 an ounce.  The close was the highest since Aug. 24.  Estimated volume was a heavy six million ounces.  Properties of America Inc., Williamstown, Mass., said it "does not appear likely it will be able to continue operating" without filing under Chapter 11 bankruptcy law or seeking other relief.  While discussions with its creditors are continuing, the land marketer said, it "does not presently have sufficient financial resources to satisfy its obligations."  The company also said it expects to report a loss of more than $6.5 million for the year ended June 30, based on preliminary results.  Net income for the previous year was $1 million on sales of $26.4 million.  The company also said John O'Brien, director, president and chief operating officer, resigned because of a disagreement in management policies.  Three other directors resigned "for personal reasons," the company said, reducing the size of the board to four members.  The company won't elect additional directors at this time.  One of the directors will assume Mr. O'Brien's duties on an interim basis, the company said.  Cascade Corp. posted a 6% gain in net income for the second quarter ended July 31 on a 13% sales rise.  The Portland, Ore., maker of materials-handling attachments and hydraulic cylinders attributed the strong results to continued demand for its products in world markets and solid operating results in all but one of its subsidiaries.  The company posted net of $3 million, or 50 cents a share, up from year-earlier net of $2.8 million, or 47 cents a share.  Sales increased to $39.2 million from $34.6 million.  In the first six months, net was $5.7 million, or 95 cents a share, a slight drop from $5.8 million, or 97 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 14% to $79.5 million from $69.7 million.  Di Giorgio Corp., San Francisco, said "a number of third parties" have expressed interest in acquiring part or all of the food products and building materials marketing and distribution firm.  As previously reported, the company last month rejected as inadequate an unsolicited $32-a-share tender offer by DIG Acquisition Corp., a unit of Rose Partners Limited Partnership and its sole general partner, Arthur Goldberg.  But Di Giorgio directors left open the door for a suitor with a better offer.  Di Giorgio said the most recent expressions of interest are preliminary, but it said the board authorized management and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., the firm's financial adviser, to continue to explore alternatives to DIG's offer and to seek formal proposals for the sale of the entire company or some of its business units.  Di Giorgio, which has 5.1 million shares outstanding, closed at $33.75 a share, up $1, in composite trading Friday on the New York Stock Exchange.  "We're going to ask the board to live up to their fiduciary duty," said Mr. Goldberg.  He added, "We're the only bid out there" with financing.  He said he expected to respond formally to the Di Giorgio announcement today.  The decline this month in natural gas prices highlights the role of weather as the driving force in price movements as winter approaches.  Temperatures have been cooler than normal across much of the U.S. this summer, reducing the demand for air conditioning.  As a result, utilities that burn natural gas to make electricity have been able to force prices down.  Spot prices for natural gas now range from $1.10 to $1.55 for each 1,000 cubic feet, sharply below the $1.40-$1.80 range of a year ago, according to the Houston-based Natural Gas Clearing House.  Gas from the Gulf Coast, for instance, sold at around $1.64 per 1,000 cubic feet in June but fell throughout the summer to around $1.45 now, pipeline companies say.  Industry officials and analysts agree that prices will bounce back in October and rise further in the winter, but they don't agree on how much.  In the longer term, the rising costs of imported oil and clean-air efforts by federal and state governments bode well for gas, a relatively clean-burning fuel.  And gas production and exploration have languished in recent years, meaning the supply could tighten if demand strengthens markedly.  There also are short-term developments that promise to focus new attention on U.S. gas.  Among these is the approach of long-delayed futures trading in the commodity.  The New York Mercantile Exchange plans to begin trading in gas futures early next year.  Architects of the plan say they are aiming for a March or April start, which should be enough past the volatile midwinter period to allow trading to begin in relative calm.  The New York Merc announced late last week it was finally proceeding with the futures contract after a ruling by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission that the agency doesn't need to approve the delivery mechanism.  The ruling was a response to a 1987 application to the federal agency by three pipeline companies and Access Energy Corp., a gas marketer, to establish a Katy, Texas, interchange service for futures trading.  The ruling suggests that the gas pipeline system is deregulated enough that the New York Merc can choose any feasible delivery point for a gas contract without permission from the federal commission.  Some planners are lobbying to establish the interchange in Sabine, La., where there is access to a larger number of interstate pipelines.  Meanwhile, though, natural gas prices have even been lagging behind oil prices, on an energy-adjusted basis.  But there are indications -- or there is a spreading perception, at least -- that the gas supply "bubble" finally is shrinking and could be blown away by the winds of a cold winter.  "You give me normal weather, and I'll give you a good gas market," said John Olson, analyst at First Boston Corp.  He forecast that gas prices will rise to $2.10 per 1,000 cubic feet in January and February before falling again in March.  Colder winter weather would create a sharper price spike.  "If you get zero degrees for 10 days in New York, you'll see prices really rise," Mr. Olson said.  Few energy analysts are as confident of an end to the surplus gas-producing capacity of the past several years as is Dale Steffes, a Houston energy consultant.  He still holds to a prediction he made in a January 1986 report for his clients that the U.S. gas surplus would end Oct. 19, 1989.  Mr. Steffes plans a "eulogy for the gas bubble" party -- or wake -- for Oct. 19.  What's more, he predicts that gas prices will be at least 25% higher next year, possibly averaging $2 per 1,000 cubic feet, as demand begins to outstrip domestic supplies.  Many others are less bullish on the market.  "I don't see a lot of gas demand until 1991 or '92," says Oscar S. Wyatt Jr., chairman of Coastal Corp., a large Houston-based gas producer and pipeline operator.  "It's hard to predict when the turnaround comes," says a spokesman for Anadarko Petroleum Corp., a large gas producer.  "There is no predictable pattern to prices except they go up in the winter."  But over the long term, Anadarko is bullish.  "We have refused to sell gas long-term at spot prices," the spokesman says.  Nowadays, "long-term" means one year; it used to mean as long as 20 years.  Like a lot of gas producers, Anadarko sells much of its gas under 30-day contracts -- in effect, the spot market -- and is making a few commitments for as long as six months as gas consumers become concerned about possible shortages this winter.  Looking ahead to other commodity markets this week:  Precious Metals  Traders will be watching to see whether gold can shake the domination of the dollar, but they may be in for a long wait.  On Friday, for a time, it appeared that the unexpectedly narrower July trade deficit and third consecutive monthly drop in the producer price index might be another force to contend with.  These factors helped strengthen the dollar and influenced the lowest London gold fixing in three years, at $355 an ounce.  But later in the day, the dollar weakened and gold prices jumped.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery rose $3.40 to $363.90 an ounce, its highest close since Aug. 24.  The dollar dropped on "rumblings of problems in the U.S. financial industry," said Dinsa Mehta, chief bullion trader at Chase Manhattan Bank, New York.  "It showed how vulnerable precious metals are to short-term dollar movements."  According to William O'Neill, vice president, research, for Elders Futures Inc., New York, there were rumors that as many as six major U.S. banks were in trouble as a result of the financial problems in the department-store empire of Robert Campeau, chairman of Campeau Corp.  "There were also reports of heavy Asian dollar sales and a report that appeared to be true that there had been aggressive dollar sales by foreign central banks," he said.  Precious metals futures trading ended before the dollar began to regain strength late Friday.  "It's going to be interesting on Monday if the rumors prove untrue and the dollar continues to gain," Mr. O'Neill said.  Overall, the dollar will remain the dominating factor in the gold price, and "until it shows signs of definitely topping out, gold traders are going to be on the defensive for the most part," he said.  Livestock and Meats  Traders are waiting for the release of monthly figures on cattle on feed lots after the close of trading today to set the tone for the next several days.  The figure to watch, analysts said, is "marketings," or the number of cattle moved off feed lots to market.  Cattle shipped to market last month in the seven states covered by the government survey should total about 1,720,000 head, or 2% below the record number sent to market in August 1988, said Thomas Morgan, president of Sterling Research Corp., Arlington Heights, Ill.  If the figure is 3% to 4% lower than a year earlier, cattle futures prices might drop, said Charles Levitt, senior livestock analyst for Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. in Chicago.  That's because traders may conclude that a glut is building up on feed lots that could eventually flood the market and depress prices, Mr. Levitt said.  Conversely, a decline of only 1% would indicate less of a buildup and would be bullish for futures prices.  Inventory figures for cattle on feed lots as of Sept. 1 are likely to show little change from a month earlier, analysts said.  The number of cattle being placed on feed lots in August is expected to be lower than a year earlier and the lowest since 1985, analysts said, because of the high cost of the cattle coming off pastures compared with prices being paid for cattle sent to market.  "The Famous Teddy Z," a sitcom premiering tonight, is expected to be one of the hottest new shows on CBS this season.  The pilot is funny and well-written, but there's another reason "Teddy Z" got on the air: CBS wanted Hugh Wilson, and Columbia Pictures had him.  Two seasons ago, CBS canceled Mr. Wilson's critical hit "Frank's Place" because of anemic viewership.  But the CBS Inc. unit didn't want to lose the talent of Mr. Wilson, a writer and producer who had created such hits as "WKRP in Cincinnati," so it gave him a "commitment," or a promise to air another of his efforts in the future.  In the meantime, Columbia Pictures Television wooed Mr. Wilson away from another studio with an exclusive multimillion-dollar contract.  That meant CBS had to make a deal with Columbia to get a show for the fall that would be produced and written by Mr. Wilson.  In the next several weeks, 25 new shows will premiere on the three major networks and News Corp.'s Fox network.  Many came to fruition because producers were able to fit a complicated mix of trendy concepts (comedy is hot this year), network-writer relationships and favors into the holes each network needed to plug.  Columbia Pictures Television is this season's big-league studio with the most new series, a total of five.  To bring in those winners, it vied with a half-dozen major studios and a few strong independent producers to anticipate the networks' needs.  A look at the genesis of Columbia's five winners provides a peek at the process by which programs get on the air and how a studio can rise to the top in television.  In recent years, the television unit of Columbia Pictures Entertainment Inc. has followed a strategy of emphasizing comedy over drama and pursuing veteran hit-making writer/producers, like Hugh Wilson, with juicy contracts.  Just as importantly, Columbia never loses sight of the fact that the big money in TV production comes from selling reruns for syndication.  As a result, it avoids presenting a series concept to a network that is topical or gimmicky and thus might have too short a shelf-life, regardless of whether critics would applaud its freshness.  Columbia's winners this season demonstrate how it was able to mobilize its stable of writers, producers and actors to serve the networks' very specific needs.  Take "Living Dolls," an ABC series about four teen-age girls modeling in New York, the kind of low-concept show critics get sniffy about.  ABC had decided that first-place NBC was winning Saturday nights "by default," getting no competition for its successful comedies, says Ted Harbert, executive vice president, prime time, for the ABC Entertainment unit of Capital Cities/ABC Inc. Specifically, ABC wanted comedies that would appeal to the kind of people who stay home Saturdays, and hoped for that rarity, a show that appeals to both young viewers and mature ones.  Columbia had attracted such a "bi-modal audience" with the long-running "Facts of Life."  Knowing that ABC liked the idea of young models, the studio turned to Ross Brown, a writer under contract who had worked on "Facts of Life" as well as ABC's popular "Who's the Boss?"  Mr. Brown was made head writer and executive producer on "Living Dolls" and told to make the show a "planted spinoff" of "Who's the Boss?"  Spinoffs are created when a sidekick from a hot show becomes a central character for a new show, as "The Mary Tyler Moore Show" begat "Rhoda."  In this case, ABC and Columbia decided to run a special episode of "Boss," now in its sixth season, in which the daughter of character Tony Micelli (Tony Danza) befriends another girl who is about to become a model.  That hastily planted character will turn up four nights later on "Living Dolls," and ABC can always have Tony and daughter visit her in future episodes.  This may seem uncreative, but ABC's statistics-keepers know that fewer viewers than ever bother to try new shows and such a ploy may help.  "Free Spirit," a show about a pretty witch who plays housekeeper to a divorced attorney and his kids, is another frothy comedy.  ABC liked the idea but rejected the first script, written by a playwright under contract to Columbia.  Columbia ordered a quick rewrite from a writer with another studio, and once the pilot was accepted, assembled a staff of writers from within Columbia's ranks.  One key was the right actress to play Winnie, the witch, and Columbia went for Corinne Bohrer, whom ABC happened to have in a "holding deal."  "There is no guarantee a network will put on a show just because you use an actor they're holding," says Scott Siegler, president of Columbia Pictures Television.  "But they liked the pilot, and I think Corinne is the perfect cross between Elizabeth Montgomery {of "Bewitched"} and Goldie Hawn."  "Peaceable Kingdom," about a gutsy woman zookeeper who lives right on the zoo grounds with her kids and pet seal, is another one of those warm-hearted family shows that make critics cringe.  But, says Kim LeMasters, head CBS programmer: "We needed a lot of new programs at 8, and we thought this show could really help us out.  We liked the concept when it was developed, but we were afraid it could be a little soft.  We told Columbia it needed marquee value, somebody like Lindsay Wagner with whom they had a holding deal, and that's exactly who they got."  Finally, Columbia is on the air with "Hardball," a joint production with NBC, which wanted the kind of male, action/adventure show that would attract young men on Friday nights the way "Miami Vice" once did.  A script was written by an NBC Productions staffer, but NBC wasn't satisfied and thought of Frank Lupo, whose many successes included one that helped change NBC's fortunes, "The A-Team," and who had moved to Columbia.  "Hardball" is a buddy show about undercover cops that teams a cocky, longhaired younger man with a bull-headed, paunchy older guy.  Columbia had long been trying to corner actor John Ashton after such films as "Beverly Hills Cop," and he got the part of the older cop.  NBC, a unit of General Electric Co., was keen on hiring a strong-jawed young actor named Richard Tyson, who is already being promoted as the season's new sex symbol.  Getting all these shows on the air, though, doesn't mean money in the bank for Columbia.  The amount networks pay toward production costs has stayed flat in recent years while the costs have escalated, so a studio can be out millions of dollars with no payback if a show doesn't last long enough to be syndicated -- and only about 9% survive that long.  Gary Lieberthal, chairman and chief executive of Columbia Pictures Television, says that a popular sitcom starting now could pile up $25 million in deficits over four years, which is how long Columbia waits before it tries to sell a series to TV stations.  However, he says, the syndication revenue for that show could exceed $100 million over four more years, the kind of bonanza that keeps studios going.  He also claims that Columbia is so good at nursing shows along, keeping plot lines and characters fresh, that it manages to keep more than 30% of its shows on long enough to syndicate.  In fact, says Mr. Lieberthal, one of the main reasons Columbia wanted to do "Living Dolls" is that it's "the kind of show local stations would want to run at 5 p.m. in reruns.  If we're right and it lasts, it's very good business."  ---  @ Columbia Pictures' Network Series  New for 1989-90  The Famous Teddy Z (CBS)  Free Spirit (ABC)  Peaceable Kingdom (CBS)  Living Dolls (ABC)  Hardball (NBC)  Returning Series  Married . . .  With Children (Fox)  Who's the Boss? (ABC)  Designing Women (CBS)  227 (NBC) My Two Dads (NBC)  Source: Columbia Pictures Television  Thyssen AG's group pretax income soared at a double-digit rate in the year ending Sept. 30, 1989, a company spokesman said Friday.  A spokesman for the Frankfurt, West Germany, steel and engineering group, also said group sales rose 14% to about 33 billion marks ($16.8 billion) in fiscal 1989 from 29 billion marks in fiscal 1988.  He couldn't provide more detailed data on earnings but said a "very positive" trend recorded in earnings in the first half of fiscal 1989 continued in the second half.  Thyssen's first-half group pretax profit more than doubled to 892 million marks from 431 million marks in the year-earlier period, while net over the same period gained 29%.  GENERAL MOTORS Corp. will continue to make and sell the Buick Estate station wagon, although the production site hasn't yet been announced.  In Friday's edition, it was incorrectly reported that the model would be discontinued next spring, due to an error by the company.  (See: "GM Will Shut Lakewood, Ga., Assembly Plant" -- WSJ Sept. 15, 1989)  LSI Logic Corp. said it expects to report a $2 million to $3 million net loss for the third quarter ending Oct. 1, stemming primarily from underutilized capacity.  Revenue for the quarter is expected to be $135 million.  For the 1988 third quarter, the company had net income of $19.4 million, or 47 cents a share, on revenue of $259.5 million.  The semiconductor concern said in June it had excess capacity, which was exacerbated by a slowdown in bookings and billings during the summer that has spilled into September.  In addition, LSI's Headland Technology affiliate had pricing pressures and lower-than-expected revenue.  As a result of the slowdown, the company said it is freezing capital spending and operating expenses for the rest of the year.  The company, whose stock was halted from trading briefly Friday pending news of the earnings projection, said it expects factory utilization to improve in the fourth quarter because for the first time it will produce semiconductors for other electronics companies under their own label.  In national over-the-counter trading Friday, LSI fell $1.375 to $7.375.  London stock prices fell sharply Friday in relatively active volume ignited by large early sell programs and an uncertain opening on Wall Street.  But the market rallied from intraday lows on the back of limited new account buying.  The Tokyo Stock Exchange was closed for a holiday.  In early trading in Tokyo Monday, the Nikkei index of 225 stocks rose 38.21 points to 34440.09 just after the market opened.  In London Friday, the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index closed down 15.5 at 2366.5, its lowest close since the 2360 on Aug. 17.  The FT-SE 100 showed some resilience after it rebounded from a session low of 2352.7, down 29.3.  But dealers noted renewed pressure in late dealings as Wall Street lost early gains.  The FT-SE 100 never recovered to again test an early high of 2388.1.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index settled at 1949.7, down 16.1.  Volume was among the highest in recent weeks at 725.9 million shares, up from 515.5 million Thursday.  B.A.T Industries paced London to early gains after news that the U.K. Panel on Takeover and Mergers decided to allow Hoylake Investments Ltd. time to clear regulatory proceedings in the U.S. before completing its #13.4 billion ($20.8 billion) offer for B.A.T. Later Friday, B.A.T said it will appeal the decision.  B.A.T closed at 819 pence ($12.71), up 18 pence (28 cents), although it had been bid as high as 830 during the session.  Ranks Hovis McDougall, the food-products concern that often reacts counter to B.A.T price action because of a large stake held by Hoylake principals, closed at 448, down 15.  Dealers said London showed signs of extreme nervousness, particularly in the later stages of the session, when Wall Street reversed early gains.  The reversal in New York prompted a spurt of profit-taking in London and some extremely choppy price action.  Light new account buying helped rally some shares late in the day, but overall the lack of aggressive buying at the start of the two-week trading account lent some credence to expectations that the market is poised for further declines.  British Plaster Board closed at 255, up 15, on new account buying and talk of possible takeover interest in the company.  The talk, however, hasn't been pinpointed even though the company's shares have been firming in recent sessions.  Cadbury Schweppes closed at 399, up 10, on some fresh account buying, but also on talk of position-building by a possible suitor.  Dealers also noted rumors that a large shareholder moved to sell its shares to an outside party.  Neither rumor was confirmed.  Other takeover rumors also boosted selected shares counter to the market's overall decline.  United Biscuits closed up 6 at 393.  Midland Bank, which has been rumored as a possible target for weeks, settled 4 higher at 379.  Storehouse, a U.K. retailer, finished unchanged at 145.  The company disclosed U.S. investor Asher Edelman boosted his stake to 9% from 8.13%.  Dealers said the news helped support Storehouse, but they added that U.K. retailers have been receiving a lot of attention recently in takeover speculation, which muted chances for big gains in the company's shares.  "There's still a lot of corporate activity," a dealer said.  "We seem to be getting a bid a day, either rumor or fact.  But what the market needs is some confirmation.  It may be getting tired of talk."  Elsewhere, stock prices closed higher in Zurich, Brussels, Stockholm and Milan; lower in Frankfurt; mixed in Amsterdam and little changed in Paris.  South African gold stocks closed lower.  Share prices closed higher in Taipei and Manila, were lower in Wellington, and little changed in Sydney and Singapore.  Markets were closed in Hong Kong and Seoul.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Sep 14 Sep 13 Year  @ U.S. ................... 315.8 317.9 + 23.3  @ Britain ................ 713.5 718.9 + 30.6  @ Canada ................. 423.8 426.8 + 15.4  @ Japan .................. 1531.9 1520.7 + 7.8  @ France ................. 545.8 549.0 + 23.3  @ Germany ................ 254.7 254.9 + 22.5  @ Hong Kong .............. 1966.1 1948.1 - 3.1  @ Switzerland ............ 227.6 230.0 + 31.6  @ Australia .............. 344.7 345.2 + 18.7  @ World index ............ 527.2 526.7 + 6.6  CAMPEAU AGREED to terms of a $250 million loan from Olympia & York that would give the Reichmann-controlled company greater influence over the cash-starved Toronto concern.  Campeau Chairman Robert Campeau "is no longer calling the shots on his own," an executive said.  Meanwhile, more factoring firms told manufacturers to stop shipping goods to Federated and Allied stores.  ---  Economic growth and inflation remain moderate, latest statistics show.  Producer prices fell 0.4% in August, led by a 7.3% drop in energy costs.  Industrial output climbed 0.3%, the fastest pace since April, though mainly due to special factors.  The U.S. trade deficit shrank further in July, to $7.58 billion, the smallest level in 4 1/2 years.  Imports declined 2.5%, reflecting the slowing economy, though exports fell 1.8%.  ---  U.S. auto makers plan to build fewer cars in the fourth quarter than in any three-month period since the recessionary final quarter of 1982.  Their caution contrasts with the aggressive output earlier this year.  ---  UAL suitor Marvin Davis said he won't fight the company's agreement to be acquired by a pilot-management group for $6.75 billion.  But the investor offered to buy the carrier at the same price if the buy-out collapses.  ---  Kirk Kerkorian agreed to sell MGM/UA to Qintex for $25 a share, or $1.5 billion.  The pact appears to end a last-minute bidding war between Australian moguls Christopher Skase and Rupert Murdoch.  ---  Thrift regulators filed a $1.1 billion civil suit against American Continental Chairman Charles Keating and several others, saying they profited through insider dealing and other illegal transactions at Lincoln S&L.  ---  First Pennsylvania received a takeover proposal from Corestates Financial valued at $18.50 a share, or $721.5 million, heating up the bidding war for the bank-holding company.  --- PS of New Hampshire drew four competing Chapter 11 reorganization plans, setting the stage for hard bargaining over the utility's future.  ---  Ralston Purina agreed to buy Nestle's Beech-Nut unit for an estimated $85 million, gambling it can overcome the baby-food maker's problems.  ---  Panhandle Eastern agreed to sell its Houston real-estate to JMB Realty for about $400 million, capping over $2.4 billion of asset disposals.  ---  Nynex's New York Telephone unit is seeking rate increases of $880 million, pricing flexibility and more opportunities to boost profits.  ---  Computer Associates fired about 900 people at its recently acquired Cullinet Software subsidiary.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 234,870,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2674.58, up 9.69; transportation 1439.72, off 3.56; utilities 215.54, up 1.76.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3337.61, up 14.14.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 130.69, up 0.08; spot index 129.48, off 0.32.  Dollar: 146.43 yen, off 0.43; 1.9660 marks, off 0.0095.  Inmac Corp., a catalog seller of computer-accessory products, posted losses for its fiscal fourth quarter and the year, largely as a result of the company's restructuring efforts.  For the fourth quarter, ended July 29, Inmac's loss totaled $9.2 million compared with year-earlier net of $2.4 million, or 25 cents a share.  Sales rose 9.7% to $59.7 million from $54.4 million.  The company said the quarter included a $12.3 million charge as a result of restructuring costs associated with its international distribution network as well as other one-time expenses.  Inmac said that as a result of its restructuring efforts it expects to see a decline in its operating expenses toward the end of this fiscal year.  For the year, the company had a loss of $6.4 million compared with year-earlier net of $9.7 million, or $1.02 a share.  Sales increase 12% to a record $249.5 million from fiscal 1988 sales of $222.8 million.  The federal appeals court in New York will decide whether obtaining inside information through a breach of confidence among family members constitutes insider trading.  The ruling, which would be the first on the issue by a federal appeals court, is expected to help define the scope of insider trading, a murky area of securities law.  Defining insider trading is especially difficult when the investor isn't a corporate insider but has simply heard the information by accident.  In the case, information was inadvertently leaked through a chain of communications within a family.  The case involves Robert Chestman, a former broker and vice president of the New York brokerage firm Gruntal & Co. Mr. Chestman was convicted in March on 30 counts of securities and mail fraud and one count of perjury in relation to the 1986 sale of Waldbaum Inc. to Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Co.  He was sentenced to two years in prison and to pay approximately $250,000 in restitution to people who sold Waldbaum stock on Nov. 26, 1986.  The government's star witness was Keith Loeb, the nephew by marriage of Waldbaum President Ira Waldbaum.  Mr. Loeb testified that he passed material nonpublic information to his broker, Mr. Chestman, before the public announcement of the $50-a-share sale to A&P.  The government said Mr. Chestman then bought 11,000 Waldbaum shares for himself, Mr. Loeb and other clients.  Mr. Loeb learned of A&P's takeover plans through a family grapevine initiated by Mr. Waldbaum.  During the trial it was disclosed that Mr. Waldbaum told his sister to gather her shares in anticipation of the sale.  The sister was an older woman in frail health who asked her daughter to give her a lift to the bank to pick up the stock certificates.  The daughter, in turn, asked her sister -- who was married to Mr. Loeb -- to pick up her children from school so she could take their mother to the bank.  That sister told her husband about the plans, and he passed them on to Mr. Chestman.  No member of the Waldbaum family was accused of wrongdoing.  Elkan Abramowitz, a New York lawyer representing Mr. Chestman, said his isn't an insider-trading case because "the information came from a non-insider, a distant relative of Ira Waldbaum who did not get the information in a corporate capacity."  The appeals court will hear arguments the week of Oct. 9.  Harvey Pitt, an insider-trading expert and a partner at Fried, Frank, Harris, Shriver & Jacobson in Washington, D.C., said a critical point is the reliability of the source of information.  If someone acts on information overheard in a conversation between people who aren't identified, there is no wrongdoing, he said.  However "Mr.  Chestman knew that the information emanated from the family who owned the business.  That it was reliable, and that he acted on it, is critical here," said Mr. Pitt.  ---  JIM BEAM SUES its insurer over legal fees in fetal-alcohol suit.  Jim Beam Brands Co. won a key legal victory in May when a jury in Seattle ruled the company couldn't be held liable for a child's birth defects.  The child's parents claimed the company failed to warn consumers of the risks of drinking alcoholic beverages during pregnancy.  The Deerfield, Ill., distiller is back in court, claiming Travelers Indemnity Co., a unit of Travelers Corp. of Hartford, Conn., balked at reimbursing Beam for legal fees incurred during that successful defense.  The New York law firm of Chadbourne & Parke and the Seattle law firm of Stafford, Frey, Cooper & Stewart, which both represented Jim Beam, were selected with Travelers' consent, the complaint said.  According to the complaint, filed last week in federal court in New York, Travelers encouraged the distiller to "defend the litigation with particular and thorough diligence in light of the novel issues involved."  Beam says Travelers was breaching its insurance contract by refusing to pay the legal fees.  The fetal-alcohol case was viewed as having national significance.  If Jim Beam, a unit of American Brands Inc. of New York, had lost, lawyers said, many other such cases might have been filed against liquor companies.  William Tribou, second vice president of Travelers, said he couldn't comment on the suit because he hadn't seen the papers.  He said Travelers already paid Jim Beam in excess of $500,000 for legal fees and had "strong legal and factual reasons" for not paying the additional fees in dispute.  Mr. Tribou said continuing discussions were held with Jim Beam and American Brands over the disputed fees, which he said totaled several million dollars.  --- FSLIC SEEKS criminal restitution in Sunrise Savings case.  The Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp. asked a federal court in Miami to order two former officers of the defunct Sunrise Savings & Loan Association to repay $2.9 million in "misapplied funds."  The two are Robert C. Jacoby -- former chairman, president and chief executive officer of the thrift -- and Thomas Skubal, who was vice president of the savings and loan's mortgage unit.  They were recently convicted on various charges, including fraud and misapplication of funds, in connection with real-estate loans to developers.  Sentencing, which had been scheduled for last week, has been set for Oct. 24.  In recent years, the FSLIC has become increasingly aggressive in seeking restitution in criminal cases involving wrongdoing in the thrift industry.  Although prosecutors concede the chance of collecting much money is slim, they say they are under considerable pressure from the Bush administration to make the effort.  "There are going to be a lot of these cases coming up," says Howard Feinstein, special counsel for the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, which oversees the FSLIC.  In October, the FSLIC will come under the jurisdiction of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  In the Sunrise case, the amount being sought includes $1.3 million, the price of a 26-carat diamond ring purchased by a real-estate developer.  Mr. Jacoby was convicted of misallocating the thrift's funds by letting the developer cover the purchase with a construction loan.  Lawyers for Messrs.  Jacoby and Skubal say they will fight the FSLIC, arguing that neither man received any of the money in question.  ---  NEW JERSEY'S HIGHEST COURT will be a defendant in a suit by two lawyers.  Filed by Mark Guralnick and Joel Wayne Gerber, of Mount Laurel, N.J., the suit challenges the state's system of arbitrating fee disputes between lawyers and clients rather than letting such conflicts go to court.  The arbitration panels, comprising both lawyers and lay people, are arms of the New Jersey Supreme Court.  Their mission is to hear both sides and then come up with a fair -- and binding -- settlement.  The lawyers say the system is unconstitutional because it deprives them of a right to a trial before a jury in such fee disputes.  The federal suit names the New Jersey high court, an arbitration panel and a former client in a divorce case who the lawyers claim still owes them $1,000.  "I feel entitled to have the same redress in court that other citizens have,' said Mr. Guralnick.  ---  JURY REJECTS religious defense to sex-for-hire charges.  When the Los Angeles City Attorney's office accused the leaders of the Church of the Most High Goddess of running a brothel, the defendants countered that the sexual practices in question were an integral part of their religion.  High Priest Wilbur Tracy and High Priestess Mary Ellen Tracy said at their trial last month that rites for would-be members include sexual relations with Ms. Tracy, as well as donations to the church.  The Tracys' lawyers argued that to construe the rites as prostitution would deny the Tracys their First Amendment right to practice religion according to their beliefs, regardless of how unconventional the beliefs may be.  "The question became whether they honestly were practicing their beliefs or using the beliefs as a front for illegal activities," said Jonni Hoffman, deputy city attorney.  Rendering their decision earlier this month, the jury rejected the defense and convicted the High Priest and Priestess.  But, with the help of First Amendment advocates who took up their cause, the Tracys are planning to appeal.  Southmark Corp., as expected, said it replaced National Heritage Inc.'s board through shareholder consents and elected Hugh C. Shurtleff as chairman.  The move ends a bitter battle for control of National Heritage, which is 62.5% owned by Southmark and a Southmark unit.  Previously, only one Southmark director served on National Heritage's board.  However, National Heritage, an operator of nursing homes and retirement centers, hasn't acknowledged the change.  A spokeswoman said late Friday that the company's agent still is counting and verifying the consents.  Southmark said that at the first meeting of National Heritage's new board late Wednesday, Robert Galecke, a Southmark executive, was elected vice chairman of National Heritage.  Southmark, a troubled real-estate and thrift concern, said it hasn't made any other management changes yet.  In addition to Mr. Shurtleff, a former executive of Valhi Inc. and a Southmark director, Southmark-supported National Heritage board members are George Brown IV, Arthur L. Crowe Jr., James A. Colquitt, John R. McDonough, T. Leigh Sanders Jr. and James A. Verbrugge.  All but Messrs.  Sanders and McDonough currently are Southmark board members.  Mr. Shurtleff said the new board will review National Heritage's management and operations and try to improve its financial performance.  National Heritage's management had tried to distance itself from Southmark and spin off its two main businesses into two new companies as part of a restructuring.  Southmark, which has said it plans to sell its health-care interests as part of its reorganization under federal bankruptcy laws, opposed the spinoffs and began a fight to gain control of National Heritage's board.  It had to have consents representing 66% of National Heritage's shares to change the method for electing directors and replace the board.  Kerr-McGee Corp. said it created an Employee Stock Ownership Plan to be funded by a $125 million loan guaranteed by the company.  At current market prices, the new ESOP would be able to purchase about 2.5 million Kerr-McGee shares, or 5.2% of the 48.3 million shares now outstanding.  According to Kerr-McGee's May proxy statement, officers and directors own only 4.4% of the company, so the projected combined ownership of management and the ESOP still would be less than 10%.  A spokesman for the energy and chemical company said the move wasn't intended as a defensive measure.  "This is intended for employee benefit reasons," he said.  The company has long been viewed as a potentially attractive takeover candidate, and Elders IXL Ltd., an Australian concern, disclosed in July that it owned 4.7% of the company.  Just a few days before that disclosure, Kerr-McGee strengthened provisions of its anti-takeover measure.  The company said that beginning Jan. 1, the company will match employee contributions to the ESOP instead of matching contributions to the company's current savings investment plan.  Salomon Inc.'s Salomon Brothers Inc., in a move affirming its growing emphasis on investment-banking activities, named Denis A. Bovin as head of the firm's corporate-coverage group based in New York.  The group comprises about 200 investment bankers.  Mr. Bovin, 41 years old, is responsible for all of Salomon's corporate-related investment-banking business in the U.S.  His appointment is further evidence of Salomon's commitment to elevate its senior bankers in a firm once dominated entirely by salespeople and traders.  Salomon has struggled to shore up its investment-banking prowess as its profitability from trading, the dominant part of the firm, became erratic the past several years.  "I like to spend most of my time working with clients," said Mr. Bovin, who joined Salomon in 1971.  "In the 1990s, corporations are going to do business with investment bankers who provide creative financial and strategic advice," he said.  In a related move earlier this month, Ronald M. Freeman was named head of Salomon's European investment-banking operations in London.  The 50-year-old Mr. Freeman had led international mergers and acquisitions in New York.  At Salomon, Mr. Bovin, who gained prominence in advising technology and communications companies during the past decade, helped arrange Xerox Corp.s $1.6 billion acquisition of Crum Foster; Sperry Corp.'s $4.7 billion merger in the mid-1980s with Burroughs Co. (now Unisys); and the $2.5 billion acquisition of Ross Perot's Electronic Data System Corp. for General Motors Corp., among other transactions.  Rockwell International Corp. threatened to close the Rocky Flats nuclear-weapons factory if the company doesn't receive assurances that it won't be prosecuted for violating federal waste-disposal laws, according to officials familiar with the situation.  Meanwhile, the Environmental Protection Agency and the state of Colorado have signed an agreement designed to bring the Energy Department facility into compliance with the waste-disposal regulations, according to an EPA spokeswoman in Denver.  The Energy Department, which has been part of the discussions, is expected to sign shortly.  Rockwell didn't participate in the negotiations, however, and the pact doesn't give it immunity from prosecution.  "For now, the plant remains open," a Rockwell spokesman said yesterday.  But in a terse statement issued late Friday, the El Segundo, Calif., aerospace company said it has told the Energy Department it would shut down the 6,550-acre site if it fails to reach an accord the company believes protects it and its employees "against civil and criminal actions for ongoing operations."  This spring, employees of the Army's Aberdeen Proving Ground in Maryland were convicted for improperly handling chemical wastes.  Rocky Flats, located 16 miles from Denver, is the only plant that makes the plutonium triggers for the U.S. nuclear arsenal.  The basic problem at Rocky Flats is that there's no place to legally store the waste, and there's no disposal facility to which it can be shipped.  The waste is a mix of low-level radioactive and hazardous material governed by the Resources Conservation and Recovery Act.  It once was going to be burned in a special incinerator at Rocky Flats, but the apparatus caught on fire and hasn't been restarted.  Rockwell, thus, seems to be in a bind: It can keep running the plant and break the law, or it can shutter it and probably come under fire for endangering national security.  For years, the Energy Department wasn't so worried about complying with waste-disposal laws.  But since June, when federal agents raided Rocky Flats and alleged that Rockwell and the department had violated a range of pollution-control statutes, it has become more stringent.  The agreement reached by the state and the EPA provides for the safe storage of the waste.  It also requires the Energy Department to give the state and the EPA a plan for reducing the volume of waste created at Rocky Flats and to find a safe, legal way to dispose of it over the long term.  The department could develop technology to dispose of the waste at Rocky Flats or modify another facility to be able to accept it.  In addition, the department will prepare a study of how to deal with similar waste created at other Energy Department plants nationwide.  Rockwell said it has met with representatives from three federal agencies -- the Energy Department, the EPA and the Justice Department -- and was "evaluating their response" on the immunity issue.  The company spokesman declined to comment further and couldn't say whether more meetings were scheduled with those agencies.  The governor of the National Bank of Hungary, Ferenc Bartha, said he expects the Hungarian forint to become a fully convertible currency by 1995 at the latest.  "I expect full convertibility of the forint between 1992 and 1995, including for capital transactions and internal convertibility," Mr. Bartha said at a news conference here.  Mr. Bartha, who was in Brussels to sign Hungary's first borrowing denominated in European currency units, said Hungary is preparing the second phase of a reform program aimed at making its economy more market-oriented and at reducing the country's $18 billion foreign debt.  In the past year, Hungary has passed legislation to encourage foreign investment and turn some state-owned companies over to private investors; it has cut subsidies to various economic sectors; and it has lifted many price controls and started to develop its own capital market.  Mr. Bartha said the Hungarian government is negotiating with the International Monetary Fund for "structural funds" to help it with the next phase of its economic liberalization.  He said legislation is in the pipeline that would make the central bank independent of the state and would decentralize commercial banking.  Since legislation was passed at the end of last year allowing the creation of private companies and encouraging foreign investment, Mr. Bartha said, a total of 1,000 such companies have been set up, involving total investment of $400 million.  The rapid pace of economic and political change in Hungary has brought with it problems such as a large external deficit and rising inflation.  Mr. Bartha said the deficit has been aggravated by Hungary's relaxation of travel restrictions.  But he said the government is confident conditions will "become normal" again in a couple of years.  He said the rise in inflation to its current level of about 15% was due mainly to large cuts in subsidies and easing of price controls.  "Given the situation, we regard this as a good result," he said.  Talks between cocoa producing and consuming countries on a plan to support the depressed world price of cocoa collapsed Saturday when a compromise package failed to win sufficient backing.  "We haven't achieved a package.  We are where we stood on Monday when the talks began," said the consumers' spokesman at the end of the meeting of the 41-nation International Cocoa Organization.  The deal would have opened the way to introduction of a stockpiling scheme to tighten supplies and raise prices.  Producing countries would have received financial help from the cocoa organization to hold back from the glutted market as much as 120,000 metric tons of surplus beans.  A metric ton is 2,204.62 pounds.  Traders said the price of cocoa -- mainstay of the economies of Ghana and the Ivory Coast -- is already close to a 14-year low and is likely to slump when world markets reopen Monday.  The producers' spokesman blamed the 12-nation European Economic Community -- the world's biggest importing bloc with a 50% share -- for the failure of the talks.  He said the package of measures wasn't voted on because the EC said it would abstain.  The two sides are scheduled to meet again in December when informal discussions are likely to take place on the future of producer-consumer cooperation.  The price of cocoa has been depressed by five seasons of overproduction.  HURRICANE HUGO LASHED Caribbean islands, causing widespread damage.  The storm, considered the region's most powerful in a decade, battered resort islands in the northeastern part of the sea with 140 mph winds, damaging homes, severing communications and leaving at least six people reported dead.  Hardest hit was Guadeloupe, the most southerly of the Leeward Islands, where 80 people were hurt and about 4,000 left homeless.  Damage also was reported on Martinique, Antigua and Dominica.  The hurricane swept toward the U.S. Virgin Islands and Puerto Rico.  National Guard troops were mobilized and residents rushed for last-minute supplies.  ---  UKRAINIANS STAGED a rally to demand recognition for their church.  Tens of thousands of Ukrainian Catholics joined what was considered the Uniate Church's biggest service since World War II, urging Kremlin leader Gorbachev to restore its legal status and end decades of repression.  The protesters also marched through the city of Lvov, near the border with Poland.  The demonstrations came on the 50th anniversary of Stalin's annexation of the western Ukraine from Poland.  Poles demanded the withdrawal of Soviet troops at rallies and memorial services across the country to mark Moscow's invasion of Poland.  ---  Israel's Rabin will visit Cairo today to discuss Egyptian President Mubarak's plan for ending the 21-month-old Palestinian uprising in the occupied territories, the defense minister's office said.  But Prime Minister Shamir's right-wing Likud bloc of the Israeli cabinet issued a statement Sunday rejecting Mubarak's peace proposal.  ---  East German emigres in Budapest said East Germany and Czechoslovak authorities have begun seizing passports in an effort to stop the flood of refugees fleeing to the West.  More than 15,500 refugees have arrived in West Germany since Hungary opened its borders last weekend.  ---  Moslem leaders expressed support for a new Arab League peace plan aimed at ending Lebanon's civil war, but warring factions battled sporadically as Arab mediators sought to implement a cease-fire.  While Lebanon's Christian patriarch voiced backing for the plan, Christian Gen. Aoun apparently remained undecided about the truce call.  ---  Apartheid foes in South Africa plan to press a seven-week-old anti-government defiance campaign this week with demonstrations, boycotts and marches.  The government has ordered police to refrain from disrupting peaceful demonstrations, and anti-apartheid rallies were held last week in Cape Town, Pretoria and Johannesburg.  ---  China's Deng appeared in public for the first time in more than three months, and indicated that Beijing would continue its "opening to the outside."  The senior Chinese leader, who had been reported in failing health, made his remarks Saturday during a meeting in Beijing with a Nobel Prize-winning Chinese-American physicist.  ---  Sri Lanka offered a unilateral cease-fire to Sinhalese extremists if they participate in an interparty peace conference.  The talks began last week.  The move by Colombo's government followed a week of violence in the Indian Ocean island nation, in which as many as 350 people were killed.  ---  McDonnell Douglas Corp. recommended that airlines add several parts to the DC-10 that could prevent an accident like the July crash in Sioux City, Iowa, that killed 112 people.  The rear engine had exploded, severing hydraulic lines.  The FAA is expected to soon make the alteration mandatory on DC-10s.  ---  Walesa told a rally of about 250,000 workers in the city of Czestochwa that Poland's new Solidarity-led government needed firm support from the work force to make a country "of our dreams."  In Warsaw, Communist Party leaders prepared to decide today whether to abandon communism and create a new leftist party.  ---  Iran's President Rafsanjani called for Iraq to relinquish Iranian territory seized in the last days of the Persian Gulf war, or Tehran "will make it retreat by force."  The statement was considered the toughest by an Iranian leader since a truce in the eight-year conflict took effect in August 1988.  ---  Three bombs exploded in the Colombian city of Cali, about 185 miles southwest of Bogota, killing at least one person.  A newspaper that has crusaded against the country's cocaine traffickers said one of its reporters was slain by thugs.  Meanwhile, a leading presidential contender urged against extraditing more drug suspects to the U.S.  Prudential Insurance Co. of America completed its acquisition of Merrill Lynch & Co.'s 75% interest in Fine Homes International L.P. for more than $300 million.  The acquisition included Merrill Lynch Realty, Merrill Lynch Relocation Management and related businesses operating within the Fine Homes master limited partnership.  At the same time, Merrill Lynch said its Merrill Lynch Mortgage Corp. unit had closed the cash tender offer for all Fine Homes preference units outstanding.  Merrill Lynch said that based on a preliminary count, about 6.4 million Fine Homes units were tendered, or 82% of those outstanding.  In conjunction with the offer's closing, Fine Homes directors declared a cash distribution on the partnership's subordinated units of 91 cents a unit, or about $19.6 million.  Those units were beneficially owned by Merrill Lynch, which has distributed them to holders of preference units.  Merrill Lynch began its offer to purchase all of the preference units of Fine Homes last month.  Investor Asher B. Edelman, who bought 30% of Datapoint Corp.'s stock last week to try to head off a battle for control, purchased most of the shares with funds from another company he controls.  According to filings made with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Intelogic Trace Inc., San Antonio, spent almost $15.5 million from working capital and other funds to purchase more than 2.5 million Datapoint shares, or about a 25% stake.  Mr. Edelman is chairman of both Datapoint, a maker of computer products, and Intelogic Trace, a computer services company that was spun off to Datapoint holders in 1985.  Previously, Intelogic owned less than 3% of Datapoint.  In the SEC filings, Mr. Edelman said he purchased the shares because New York investor Martin S. Ackerman has begun a consent solicitation to replace Mr. Edelman and the rest of the Datapoint board with Mr. Ackerman and his nominees.  Because of the purchases, Mr. Edelman and companies he controls now own about 40% of Datapoint.  To succeed in his consent solicitation, Mr. Ackerman would have to gather votes of holders of more than 50% of Datapoint's shares.  Mr. Ackerman has said he is considering a legal challenge to Mr. Edelman's purchases, among other options.  Mr. Edelman couldn't be reached for comment.  An Intelogic spokesman said the company doesn't have any comment beyond the filings.  Mr. Edelman and other Intelogic officers and directors own 14.5% of the company's stock.  The ABC network, which has been locked out of the financially lucrative late-night market, is studying program proposals, ranging from comedy to news shows, to air in the time slot after its highly rated "Nightline."  Late-night success has eluded the Capital Cities/ABC Inc. subsidiary for the last five years.  A one-hour "Nightline" quickly bombed, as did talk shows with Greg Jackson, Jimmy Breslin and Dick Cavett.  The most recent attempt, "Day's End," which offered a review of the day's news and highlights from the network's "Good Morning America" talk show, was dropped last spring after 13 weeks of market testing in 28 cities.  Currently, ABC ceases programming at midnight and the network's 200-plus affiliates program the late-night period themselves, generally with syndicated shows or movies.  By contrast, CBS Inc.'s affiliates air "The Pat Sajak Show" and affiliates of General Electric Co.'s National Broadcasting Co. get "The Tonight Show" and "Late Night With David Letterman."  ABC hopes to have a project ready to show stations at January's National Association of Television Programming Executives convention in New Orleans, where syndicators hawk their new shows.  Among the proposals ABC is studying are four comedy-oriented shows, which are typically a hit with men aged 18-34, the demographic group most desired by advertisers.  "Products like soft drinks, shampoo, sneakers, beer and beauty-care products are all looking for late-night shows to reach their audience," said Bill Croasdale, senior vice president and director of network sales at the ad agency Backer Spielvogel Bates, a subsidiary of Saatchi & Saatchi Co. "ABC has yet to get a foothold in that door and it must.  It's just too valuable a time period to keep ignoring."  Last year, programs airing after 11:30 p.m. accounted for $429 million in total advertising revenues for the three networks, although ABC earned only about $61 million.  Late-night competition for young adults has increased recently, especially with the addition of "The Arsenio Hall Show," syndicated by Paramount Television, a unit of Paramount Communications Inc. CBS may cut the 90-minute "Pat Sajak Show" to one-hour and air a comedy-oriented show at 12:30 a.m.  Among the hosts ABC is looking at for comedy projects are Rick Dees, a popular Los Angeles disk jockey, Jeff MacGregor, a former host of the canceled syndicated show "The New Dating Game," and standup comedian Kevin Meaney.  Another possible show involves Merrill Markoe, who was once head writer at NBC's "Late Night With David Letterman."  In addition, Koppel Communications Inc., an independent production company headed by "Nightline" anchor Ted Koppel, has offered a proposal for a one-hour, news-oriented program, a spokeswoman for Mr. Koppel said.  Mr. Croasdale of Backer Spielvogel said ABC would face a tough task if it tried to follow a news broadcast with an entertainment show because of the different audiences the shows attract.  Michael Brockman, president of late-night, daytime and children's programming at ABC, acknowledged the juxtaposition could pose a problem.  "The dilemma we face in creating a midnight show is one created by the success of 'Nightline,' " Mr. Brockman said.  "There isn't really enough advertiser support for another news show.  And there isn't any intelligent way to extend 'Nightline,' so I've decided to create a program in which I'll have to recruit almost an entirely new audience."  ABC won't produce "a talk show per se with a desk and sofa," said Mr. Brockman, who, prior to joining ABC, launched "The Pat Sajak Show" on CBS.  "We're tapping the strengths of the personalities involved with each project."  Some affiliates said they were skeptical about ABC's potential for success.  One reason is that the affiliates have purchased syndicated programs and movie packages and are unwilling to move those shows for an untested ABC project.  "I just spent millions of dollars last year on a movie package that would last me five years," said an ABC affiliate general manager, who asked not be identified.  "I don't think I would initially take something offered by the network."  Mr. Brockman admitted that support among ABC affiliates would be an "uphill battle," mostly because the network in the past has failed to demonstrate long-term support for any program that followed "Nightline."  "Because of the past inconsistency, {the affiliates} have a 'show me' attitude and I don't blame them," Mr. Brockman said.  ABC can't even count on the eight stations it owns, since they are allowed to run autonomously.  For example, WABC in New York didn't run the programs hosted by Messrs.  Breslin and Cavett when the network aired them, and ran a syndicated talk show, since canceled, with comedian David Brenner instead.  CFM International Inc., a consortium of General Electric Co. and France's Snecma, received a $497.7 million Air Force contract for replacing engines on KC-135 tanker aircraft.  United Technologies Corp. got $319.2 million in Air Force contracts for the Advanced Tactical Fighter engine, other aircraft parts and Navy submarine research.  Hughes Aircraft Co., a unit of General Motors Corp., received $174.6 million in contracts for air-defense tests and battlefield-electronic equipment for the Army, and missiles and aircraft radars for the Air Force.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. won $105.9 million in contracts for Navy drone aircraft and Harpoon missile improvements, and Air Force KC-10 aircraft support.  Other contracts announced by the Pentagon went to:  -- Martin Marietta Corp., $36.5 million from the Air force for Titan missile parts and manufacturing technology.  -- General Dynamics Corp., $33.9 million from the Air Force for F-16 electronics and advanced fighter research.  -- Honeywell Inc., $30.4 million from the Air Force for missile and aircraft guidance sets.  -- Rockwell International Corp., $23.8 million from the Air Force for mobile MX missile studies.  -- Ford Aerospace Corp., a unit of Ford Motor Co., $22.9 million from the Air Force for support of the Space Defense Operations Center.  -- Unisys Corp., $18 million from the Navy for Trident missile navigation systems.  -- Serv-Air Inc., $17.4 million from the Army for operating an ammunition plant.  -- Dyncorp., $17 million from the Air Force for NATO jet pilot training. -- Boeing Co., $16.8 million from the Air Force for missile and aircraft research.  -- TGS Technology Inc., $15.4 million from the Air Force for support of the Eastern Test Range.  -- Todd Pacific Shipyards Corp., $12.5 million from the Navy for ship overhaul.  -- Abbott Products Inc., $12 million from the Army for practice bombs.  -- Harris Corp., $11.2 million from the Air Force for meteorological satellite support.  -- FMC Corp., $11.1 million from the Army for Bradley Fighting Vehicle improvements.  For the president of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Paul E. Gray was amazingly unscientific in his Aug. 17 editorial-page article, "Nuclear Reactors Everyone Will Love."  New is not synonymous with successful.  It is synonymous with untried.  His premise is fundamentally unsound.  He criticizes water-cooled reactor technology -- which is the standard throughout the non-communist world -- for the size and complexity of plants designed 15 and 20 years ago.  And he praises gas-cooled technology -- which has been abandoned by virtually the entire world, after decades of development and billions of dollars -- for advanced safety characteristics that they could incorporate at some indefinite time in the future.  Virtually every theoretical advantage that he attributes to gas-cooled reactors already is being applied to advanced water-reactor technology.  The next water-cooled power plants will incorporate a number of major improvements over those of the past -- they most likely will be much smaller, modular, simpler, and they will have passive safety systems that do not require skilled operators.  Gas-cooled reactors could well have these features when they are designed, tested, developed, prototyped, licensed and ready for commercial use in three or four decades.  Advanced water-cooled reactors, based on successful operating experience around the world for more than a quarter of a century, will offer these advances in the mid-1990s.  Gas-reactor technology could become an efficient and effective source of electricity in the 21st century.  But we can't wait for decades to tackle such pressing problems as finding substitutes for imported oil, cutting back on the burning of fossil fuels to reduce environmental problems, and meeting the growing demand for electricity.  We need water-cooled reactors that incorporate all these advances -- and that will exist in the near future when we need them.  Walter Meyer  Director  Institute for Energy Research  Syracuse University  Syracuse, N.Y. ---  Based on more than 40 years of experience operating utility power plants, I question the economics of Mr. Gray's modular reactors.  A good large plant will overwhelm the good small plant of similar technology every time.  The economics of big nuclear plants has not been destroyed by their large scale nor by their safety record but by unconscionable delays.  The utility must be confident that unexpected regulatory delays are improbable unless a real safety threat is established.  Until then no prudent utility is likely to propose any nuclear project.  The physical size of the gas-cooled reactor module can only be very large, since the graphite core alone will probably be larger than the core and pressure vessel of the "big" conventional nuclear plant.  Since it will take 10 gas-cooled reactor modules to match the output of a single conventional nuclear plant, that means 10 control systems, 10 construction projects, and staffs to maintain and run 10 units.  Process engineering using conventional scaling factors would indicate that the total project costs of the 10 small gas-cooled plants would be roughly twice those of the large conventional plant.  Robert M. Lundberg  Los Altos, Calif.  Consumer price growth in the 24 leading Western industrial nations eased to a monthly rate of 0.2% in July from 0.3% in June, the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development said.  The OECD said the latest result, which is an average of price-growth figures supplied by its 24 member countries, left the year-on-year inflation rate unchanged at 5.3% for the third consecutive month.  The slowdown in monthly price growth for July was marked by a 0.2% contraction of energy prices, the first absolute decline since last November.  Energy prices were up 0.4% in June.  Food-price growth slowed to 0.4% in July from 0.5% in June, while the growth rate for non-food, non-energy prices was unchanged at 0.2%.  On a year-on-year basis, energy prices were up 5.2% in July, food prices were ahead 5.6% and non-food, non-energy prices showed a 4.4% increase.  Southern National Corp. said it agreed to acquire Western Carolina Savings & Loan Association in a stock swap valued at $17.5 million.  Under the agreement, which is subject to regulatory approval, Southern National would pay 1,188,690 of its shares for all Western Carolina stock and stock options outstanding.  Southern National currently has 19,043,380 common shares outstanding.  Southern National, a bank holding company, has about $2.87 billion in assets.  Western Carolina, Valdese, N.C., has $76 million in assets.  The agreement represents the first purchase of a savings and loan company by Southern National.  personalized advertising in its weekly magazines -- is expected to pull in an extra $20 million to $25 million in ad revenue in its first year alone, says Donald M. Elliman Jr., the magazine group's executive vice president of marketing.  The figure is surprisingly large for a start-up program, and shows just how important the new plan will be in generating ad revenue for the magazine group in the 1990s.  Indeed, Time magazine group officials are already planning to expand the program, which premieres in January, to include more magazines and types of ads.  The plan, known as Target Select, initially includes Time, People and Sports Illustrated, as well as Money and Entertainment Weekly on a more limited basis.  Target Select uses a computerized process known as selective binding to place different ads in different subscribers' magazine copies.  The process can also personalize ads, greeting subscribers by name or listing a local store address.  In effect, it allows Time's national magazines to compete head-to-head with local newspapers and with direct mail.  "Subscribers can receive Time publications whose ads have information geared specifically towards them," says Bruce Judson, the magazine group's director of marketing, who spearheaded the program under Mr. Elliman.  "The possibilities are tremendous."  Target Select won't be announced officially until Friday, but it's already jolting other publishers into action, and could well transform the magazine ad business.  While selective binding has been around for about 15 years, it had been used only by a handful of smaller magazines like Farm Journal.  But Time's titles account for about 20% of all U.S. magazine ad revenue, and any splash Time makes tends to turn into a tidal wave.  Hearst and Diamandis Communications are among the magazine publishers now exploring selective binding.  Ziff-Davis's PC Magazine is testing the process.  And industry executives say Washington Post Co.'s Newsweek is scrambling to be able to offer its own program early next year to compete with Time.  No other magazine companies, though, have the reach of Time; its three weeklies alone have combined circulation of almost 10.5 million and had ad revenue of $942 million in 1988.  Still, Time is making an expensive gamble.  It has invested millions in a new technology that could well turn out to be a very expensive gimmick.  Time declines to quantify its investment, but says the program will be profitable in its first year.  Other magazine publishers are watching carefully: "Selective binding has been around for 15 years, and no one has really been able to make it work right," says Claeys Bahrenburg, group publishing director at Hearst magazines, publisher of Cosmopolitan and Redbook.  Mr. Bahrenburg says Hearst has created a task force to look into selective binding, and says it is considering using the technology not just for advertisers, but to tailor articles to subscribers.  Sports Afield, for example, could give fishing buffs a heavier dose of angling articles.  But Mr. Bahrenburg adds that magazines using selective binding to personalize ads may risk undermining their national ad base and hurting their overall cachet.  "This raises some major issues on how we sell our product: You're selling demographic slices" rather than a national magazine, he says.  Mr. Judson, however, counters that Target Select "enhances the franchise of Time magazines."  In any case, Target Select is expensive enough that it doesn't seem likely to spark an immediate stampede away from national ads.  The plan, in part, will allow marketers to advertise specifically to three groups of subscribers: catalog shoppers, people who have recently moved and affluent readers over 50 years old.  A furniture company, for example, could advertise only in magazine copies going to subscribers who just moved.  But that kind of pinpointing, derived largely from reader surveys, doesn't come cheap.  Time magazine currently charges about $28 to reach each 1,000 subscribers.  But advertisers who want to target high income older people -- and Time promises to reach 700,000 of them via the three weeklies and Money -- will pay more than double that rate, or about $68 for each 1,000, according to the 1990 rate card.  Reaching recent movers will cost $51 for each 1,000.  Target Select also will use a process called ink-jet printing to allow national advertisers to personalize their ads.  An auto maker's ad could list the nearest dealership, or even offer a discount to selected subscribers.  Depending on complexity, industry executives say ink-jet printing can add 35% to the cost of an ad, and could even double the price.  Even more costly, Time is offering customized programs for advertisers.  American Express, for example, could place personalized ads only in magazine copies going to gold-card-carrying subscribers.  "The day is here when magazine advertisers can be as personalized as direct mail," Mr. Judson says.  Indeed, the ink-jet capability is sure to make a lot of direct marketers angry, and it's certain to scare newspapers, which are already facing a bleak retail ad market.  It swipes especially hard at cooperative ads, in which a retail outlet and a brand share a single ad; the ink-jetting program can tailor a national ad right down to the zip-code level, listing the nearest retail outlet where a nationally advertised brand is sold.  "It's better targeting than anything available in local newspapers," Mr. Judson says.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNTS: Times Mirror Co., Los Angeles, awarded the $5 million ad account for its Newsday and New York Newsday newspapers to Margeotes Fertitta & Weiss, New York.  The account had been handled by Holland & Callaway Advertising, New York. . . .  Glenbrook Laboratories, a unit of Sterling Drug, said Lintas New York and Dugan/Farley Communications Associates, Upper Saddle River, N.J., will handle advertising for Therapy Bayer Aspirin, a new analgesic.  Lintas, a unit of the Interpublic Group, will handle consumer ads; Dugan/Farley will create a trade campaign.  Billings haven't been determined.  Ex-smokers, beware: You run an increased chance of suffering a stroke for at least 10 years after you stop smoking.  That's a lot longer than the two to five years shown in previous research.  The sobering conclusion, based on an Australian study of 422 stroke victims, may discourage some smokers from quitting and crimp increasingly popular anti-smoking drives in the U.S. and Europe.  "There is the danger of people saying, 'Why stop smoking?  Is it worth it?'" said Dr. Godfrey Fowler, a physician at Oxford University's Radcliffe Infirmary in Oxford, England, who studies smoking.  For just this reason, "researchers have been very nervous about publishing such a result.  From a public-health point of view, it might be counterproductive," agreed Dr. Roger Shinton, an epidemiologist and stroke specialist at Dudley Road Hospital in Birmingham, England.  But Dr. Shinton saw a larger significance in the Australian study, reported in this week's issue of the Lancet, a leading British medical journal.  Public-health officials no longer can "say it's all right to smoke as long as you stop before you get into trouble.  That's an out-of-date message."  The new message should be "never smoke, because if you smoke at all for any given length of time, the risk you get . . . never leaves you."  The latest research, led by a University of Melbourne team, also found much stronger links between current smokers and stroke -- plus indications that smokers' spouses also may be more likely to suffer strokes.  "The persistent nature of the risk even after cessation of smoking and the possible risk associated with passive exposure strengthens public-health arguments against smoking," wrote Dr. Geoffrey A. Donnan, the lead researcher, in the Lancet report.  Compared with nonsmokers, smokers in the Australian study experienced a three to four times greater risk of developing the most common type of stroke.  Earlier investigations found smokers' risk was two to three times greater.  The new findings back the long-suspected relationship between stroke and smoking, said Dr. John Bamford, a neurologist at St. James University Hospital in Leeds, England.  "This goes along with what has been established in coronary disease for several years."  Strokes, the result of interference with the brain's blood supply, are the third leading cause of death in both the U.S. and Europe.  Many victims survive their first stroke only to die from subsequent ones.  The Australian scientists compared the stroke patients' smoking patterns, other personal habits and health history against those of a similar-sized control group from the Melbourne area.  Ex-smokers showed a lower risk of developing strokes than current smokers, and this hazard diminished over time.  But "this trend was not significant, and an appreciable risk was still apparent after 10 years," the Lancet article reported.  The Australian researchers said their surprising observation differed from two prior studies because those involved fewer ex-smokers.  Any smokers discouraged by the latest research should remember that "by changing from a current to an ex-(smoker), you are still dropping your (stroke) risk considerably," Dr. Shinton noted.  Nonsmokers in the Australian study ran a 60% greater chance of developing a stroke if their spouses smoked.  While the observation wasn't statistically significant, it marks the first time scientists have detected a potential link between so-called passive smoking and stroke.  Charles Gardner, a former Unisys Corp. vice president who pleaded guilty to charges of bribery and making illegal campaign contributions in the Pentagon procurement scandal, was sentenced to 32 months in jail and fined $40,000.  Mr. Gardner ran the Unisys surveillance and fire-control unit in Great Neck, N.Y. Investigators have described him as the most important defendant charged so far in the three-year investigation and say he is an important link to the central targets of the inquiry.  Mr. Gardner, who has been cooperating with prosecutors, was accused of systematically using funds from sham consulting contracts and other corrupt practices to set up a secret web of foreign and domestic bank accounts intended for bribes, illegal campaign contributions and for personal use.  In March, Mr. Gardner pleaded guilty to bribing former Navy research chief Melvyn Paisley by helping to arrange the purchase of an Idaho condominium from Mr. Paisley at an inflated price.  Through his lawyers, Mr. Paisley has denied any wrongdoing.  James Neal, a former Unisys consultant and close associate of Mr. Gardner who also pleaded guilty to bribery-related charges, was sentenced to 27 months in jail and fined $30,000.  Mr. Neal has admitted conspiring with Mr. Gardner to bribe Mr. Paisley and to participating in a bribery scheme to funnel $400,000 to a Bahamas company owned by Garland Tomlin, a Navy acquisition official awaiting sentencing for his activities.  Southdown Inc., Houston, said Public Service Enterprise Group Inc. agreed to buy Southdown's Pelto Oil Co. operation for about $320 million.  Earlier this month, Southdown announced it had hired Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. to help it sell Pelto and that it planned to use the proceeds to pay down long-term debt.  Pelto assets last Dec. 31 included proved reserves of 169.8 billion cubic feet of natural gas and 7.2 million barrels of crude oil and condensate.  Southdown, a producer of cement and concrete products, said the final sale price is subject to adjustment based on working capital figures and certain other conditions.  It said it expects to close the transaction by November 15.  Newark, N.J.-based Public Service Enterprise Group is a public utility holding company.  The World Bank, with its capital recently boosted, actually reduced its net lending to the developing world in its latest financial year.  In its annual report to be released today, the international agency said lending minus repayments at its main unit, the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, fell 44% to $1.9 billion from $3.4 billion the year earlier.  Gross lending at the IBRD in the year ended June 30 fell slightly to $11.3 billion from $11.6 billion.  However, this lending contraction probably won't last long.  The World Bank's IBRD unit, which has 151 nation members, approved loans totaling $16.4 billion, an increase of 11% from $14.8 billion for the previous year, indicating disbursements will soon pick up.  The bank also said it expects to lend between $20 billion and $25 billion in its current year.  There is considerable frustration in the developing world that the World Bank hasn't lent more actively, especially when some other lenders are pulling back from these nations.  The World Bank, its critics say, has just had a capital increase and is awash with funds that it could lend to the developing world.  But supporters of the World Bank contend it is constrained by the lack of economic management in the countries themselves.  The bank links an increasing proportion of its lending to broad economic programs in developing countries.  World Bank supporters say that if developing countries don't have credible economic programs, the bank must hold back its lending.  For example, in the fiscal year just ended, the World Bank approved loans of only $700 million for projects in Brazil, while it approved $2.23 billion of credits for projects in Mexico, which has followed more rigorous and orthodox economic policies.  Like many other lenders to the developing world, both the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund are having growing problems with late payments on their loans.  The World Bank and its International Development Association unit, which makes loans and grants to the poorest countries, have overdue principal and interest payments on almost $4 billion of loans, an increase from about $3.4 billion of such troubled loans the year before.  The list of bad borrowers remains virtually the same, with Peru, Zambia, Panama, Syria, Honduras and Nicaragua holding the largest outstanding arrears as of June 30.  Meanwhile, one of the World Bank's sister institutions, the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, forecast that recent robust growth in world trade will be sustained this year.  The Geneva-based international trade treaty organization said in its annual review of international trade that it expects growth of about 7% in the volume of world merchandise trade this year, following estimated growth of about 8.5% in 1988.  Among other things, GATT attributes the predicted continued growth in world trade to technological innovation, lower oil prices, the growing importance of manufactured exports, the growth of international joint ventures and mergers, and the greater integration of national financial markets.  A federal jury decided against awarding any punitive damages to the daughter of the founder of Mail Boxes Etc., who claimed that the company and its top official fraudulently induced her to sell her 23% stake.  Thursday, the jury had awarded plaintiff Nancy Tash, daughter of the company's late founder, Gerald Aul, $2.5 million in compensatory damages to be paid by the company.  The jury further found that Anthony DeSio, Mail Boxes' president and chief executive officer, should pay more than $1.5 million in compensatory damages.  Herbert Goffstein, a defendant and a former company official, wasn't found liable for any damages.  In her lawsuit, Ms. Tash alleged that the company and Mr. DeSio defrauded her in 1983 by inducing her to sell 700,000 shares of the company's stock for $50,000 and a $300,000 note to a new company controlled by Mr. DeSio.  Ms. Tash alleged that Mr. DeSio had devised a scheme to make her believe that the company was performing poorly, when it was in fact posting higher sales.  The company said it plans to appeal the verdict.  Mail Boxes Etc. is a franchiser of postal-business and communication-service centers.  It said its insurance carriers have reserved rights to deny liability for actual coverage of the award and maintain that the company's policy limit is $1 million.  Gary Smith, a Mail Boxes official, said the company will have to meet with the insurers to determine how the verdict will be handled.  The New York Stock Exchange announced the listing of two foreign banking firms.  Mitsubishi Bank Ltd., Tokyo, will list American depository shares with the symbol MBK.  It will continue to trade on the Tokyo Stock Exchange.  Allied Irish Banks PLC, Dublin, has started trading with the symbol AIB.PR, representing non-cumulative preference shares.  It is an initial public offering.  The American Stock Exchange and the Chicago Board Options Exchange said they began trading put and call options on the American depositary receipts of Reuters Holdings PLC, a London news and information services company.  Most people hereabout have forgotten this banner headline from the Roswell Daily Record of July 8, 1947: "RAAF Captures Flying Saucer on Ranch in Roswell Region."  But a group of local men with fresh crew cuts has agreed to help NBC-TV's "Unsolved Mysteries" jog a few memories.  On a blistering day in this desert town, they dress up as members of the Roswell Army Air Force and stand around an abandoned hangar in exchange for $50, a free lunch and the chance to be a part of history as only television can tell it.  A dry-ice fog hangs thick inside the hangar, enshrouding a cluster of actors who, posing as MPs, guard the saucer wreckage.  At the building's far end, two men in white lab coats unload four stretchers from an Army ambulance.  The victims, clad in silver Lycra jumpsuits, are a sight: Their flesh is orange.  Their oversize heads are bald and shaped like eggplants.  Their long, bony hands have only four digits.  The story "has to be true," says Carol Renee Modrall, who runs the Granny's Opera House theater at nearby Carlsbad Caverns and who was hired by the show's producers to assist with everything from costuming to catering.  "If you think about it, we had several atomic blasts around that time.  If I were an alien, I'd want to come here and see what was going on."  NBC is hoping that more segments like this will exert a similar pull on earthlings.  In the show's first full season last year, "Unsolved Mysteries" captured 16th place in the prime-time ratings with its special brand of "docutainment" -- re-enactments of puzzling crimes and other unexplained events, all somberly narrated by Robert Stack.  Although the show did air segments on Bigfoot and on people who have revived after dying, more typical was the story of Rose Hoffman, a San Jose, Calif., mother who went undercover as a biker seeking information about her teenage son, missing since his abduction by motorcycle roughnecks in 1977.  "These are stories that could happen to my family or your family," says Rick Ludwin, NBC's vice president of specials and variety programs.  Critics, however, have attacked "Unsolved Mysteries" and other "reality" programs, such as Fox's "America's Most Wanted," arguing that they exploit victims and their families.  Questions have also been raised about the legal implications of some re-enactments.  In part because of such concerns, "Unsolved Mysteries" has decided to give added attention this season to the wiggier stories -- reality TV's answer to Fox's "Alien Nation" and ABC's witchy "Free Spirit," both new this year.  Mr. Ludwin says NBC has asked the executive producers of "Unsolved Mysteries," John Cosgrove and Terry Dunn Meurer, for more "high-profile" pieces like the one about Roswell, which is scheduled to run on the season premiere Wednesday.  "It's taken TV a long time to realize that a lot of people read tabloid newspapers in the U.S.," says David Gritten, television critic for the Los Angeles Herald Examiner.  The segments are filmed where the original events occurred, using either local actors or the actual people involved.  Since the show doesn't pay subjects to appear in re-enactments of their own stories, the latter approach saves money.  It also heightens believability, Mr. Cosgrove and Ms. Meurer contend.  Consider the case of the blinking statue.  For a future show, "Unsolved Mysteries" asked some 300 parishioners of Holy Trinity Catholic Church in Ambridge, Pa., to help re-create a much-publicized event: Earlier this year, they had seen a life-size figure of Jesus on a crucifix blink its eyes during the church's Good Friday service.  As the segment was being filmed, a state trooper appearing in the re-enactment began shouting that the eyes were moving.  It was no act.  "The entire congregation started having this full-on religious experience in front of us," recalls David Rajter, who produced the segment.  "They were praying.  They were crying.  They were falling on the floor."  A videotape of the crucifix doesn't show any eye movement, Mr. Rajter says, and a Church inquiry concluded that no miracle occurred at Holy Trinity either time.  Still, the trooper, Christopher Joseph Marion, stands by his story.  "With God as my judge, these eyes were opening in front of me," he says.  For his part, the Rev. Ronald P. Lengwin, a spokesman for the Catholic Diocese of Pittsburgh, worries that the show's pilgrimage to the parish will stir up unwanted interest in the crucifix again.  "I can't believe this story won't go away," he says.  "The story got a life of its own because of the media."  NBC maintains that the sleuthing done on "Unsolved Mysteries" is a public service.  Each week, operators at a telemarketing center in Los Angeles field several thousand calls from viewers who claim to know something about the incidents dramatized.  Of the 128 "solvable" cases featured so far, the network says, 34 have been explained.  And of the 43 fugitives profiled, 29 have been apprehended.  Among them was Geraldine Elizabeth Carmichael, a Los Angeles resident who disappeared in 1980 after being convicted of bilking investors out of $3 million with a scheme to build a gas-saving car.  A viewer recognized Ms. Carmichael -- who is in fact a man undergoing treatments pending a sex-change operation -- as a flower vendor in Texas.  Obviously, leads about such things as Bigfoot are even more elusive than clues to a kidnapping or killing.  But viewers feel compelled to offer their advice nonetheless.  "Some of the calls are just hilarious," says Greg Churpek, a college student who works as an "Unsolved Mysteries" operator.  Recently, Mr. Churpek had to listen patiently as a self-professed psychic rambled on about his knowledge of "intimate phenomena" and his telepathic ability to find missing persons.  As for what drives people to participate in the show, the desire for an answer is usually foremost.  And with real crimes, the process is often cathartic.  "They break down, and they thank you later," says Dan Gomez, who directed a segment about a former California policeman named Doyle Wheeler.  Mr. Wheeler supervised a wrenching re-enactment of an attack last year at his home in Spokane, Wash., during which he says two men broke in, tied him up, beat and tortured him, and then shot him and left him for dead.  "Talk about group therapy," Mr. Gomez adds.  "This is sharing emotions with 20 million people."  With the more bizarre stories, the possibility of swaying a wider audience is also a big draw.  Mr. Marion, the state trooper, says he chose to participate in the episode about the statue because he believes the day of judgment is near.  "That's why God picked me for this," he explains.  "He's trying to warn us that these are the end times."  Walter G. Haut, public-relations officer at the Roswell Army Air Force base at the time of the UFO incident, says he went on the show because he thinks it's time Americans know the truth.  "I could see covering this up in 1947," he concedes.  "You would have had panic. . . .  But the population in the U.S. is intelligent enough to handle this now." (When the wreckage was found, Mr. Haut wrote a press release informing the local media that a flying saucer was in their midst, but it was superseded by a second official announcement saying that a weather balloon had crashed.)  Mr. Haut says he hopes his interview with "Unsolved Mysteries" will prod the government to come clean about the alien encounter.  His only concern, he adds, is that the editing process could make him and the others "appear like a bunch of absolute idiots."  Sappho Henderson says she doesn't care much whether viewers believe her story about how her late husband, Capt. Oliver Wendell Henderson, flew the saucer wreckage in an Air Force plane to another base in Dayton, Ohio.  "When 'Unsolved Mysteries' first contacted me, I hadn't thought I'd participate," says Mrs. Henderson, who now lives in West Hills, Calif.  "But then I thought, Why not?  It's been all this time.  Even though there may be doubters, I'm too old to worry about that."  Of course, skeptics abound, even here in Roswell.  Ruth May, an administrative assistant in City Hall who moved here in 1948, laughs when asked about television's interest in the alien landing.  "It rears its head every so often," she says of the story.  But who's to rule out strange doings here after learning that "Unsolved Mysteries" couldn't film in the hangar it wanted because the Central Intelligence Agency was using it that day?  "Funny, they wouldn't tell us what they were doing," jokes cameraman Bob Wise.  "But we suspect it has something to do with aliens."  Paris-based Eurocom hopes to conclude by late this week its negotiations with WCRS to buy a majority of WCRS's advertising business, according to executives close to the discussions.  The executives said Eurocom will likely raise its 20% stake in the advertising business to 60% to 70%.  They said among the points being negotiated is a major international role in Eurocom's advertising business for WCRS's most visible ad man, Jerry Della Femina, chairman of Della Femina McNamee WCRS. Mr. Della Femina declined comment, and WCRS and Eurocom officials couldn't be reached.  Eurocom has been attempting to raise its minority stake in WCRS's ad business to a majority.  At the same time, London-based WCRS is negotiating to increase its own stake in its 50%-owned Carat media-buying company in France.  Executives familiar with the discussions said WCRS will likely buy 100% of Carat, transforming WCRS from an advertising concern into a major media-buying firm.  Financial problems at Campeau Corp. prompted more factoring companies to tell manufacturers to stop shipping merchandise to Campeau's Federated Department Stores and Allied Stores units.  In a related development, some off-price retailers said they have been approached by apparel makers trying to unload merchandise originally intended for sale to Federated and Allied.  New York-based Congress Talcott Corp., a major factoring company that does business with many Seventh Avenue apparel companies, said Friday it had instructed vendors not to ship to stores owned by Federated and Allied.  Congress President Jerome Kenyon said Federated and Allied aren't behind in their bills, but he said Congress was "concerned that Campeau wouldn't be able to meet their interest payments."  Campeau officials didn't return calls for comment.  As reported, Federated and Allied are facing a liquidity crunch caused by high debt levels resulting from their acquisition by Campeau, a Toronto-based real-estate developer and retailer.  Federated and Allied operate nine department-store chains, including Bloomingdale's, Stern's, Jordan Marsh, Abraham & Straus and Lazarus.  Factoring companies buy retail receivables from apparel makers and, in many cases, act as their credit managers.  As such, they exert considerable influence in the way apparel companies conduct their business.  Last week, another big factoring company, Heller Financial Inc., also told its vendors to halt shipments to the Campeau-owned stores.  Mr. Kenyon said Congress substantially cut its credit lines to Federated and Allied in mid-August because of concern about Campeau's financial situation.  "We have had meetings with them trying to get better information, but we weren't satisfied," he said.  The credit lines were suspended last week.  If Campeau receives the $250 million loan it is hoping to get from Olympia & York Developments Ltd., Mr. Kenyon said Congress would probably allow vendors to make October shipments to Federated and Allied.  But he said Campeau's credit lines won't be increased "until they can show us more" financial data.  As concern about Campeau spread through New York's garment district, most apparel makers simply refused to discuss their business relationships with the Campeau stores.  But judging by the comments from a few apparel makers, many companies apparently have halted shipments to the Allied and Federated stores.  MBI Merchandise Industries, a New York maker of photo albums, said it stopped shipping to Campeau clients on Friday after receiving a stop-shipment order from its factor, Barclays American Corp., according to an MBI vice president.  "When I called to break the news to the Stern's buyer, he told me that he had received a lot of {cancellation} calls from other manufacturers," the MBI executive said.  A spokesman for Charlotte, N.C.-based Barclays American declined to comment.  Stern's officials referred calls seeking comment to Campeau.  It was also evident last Friday that some manufacturers weren't waiting to hear good news from Campeau and were seeking to sell goods to other retailers.  Burlington Coat Factory, a big off-price apparel retailer based in Burlington, N.J., was "flooded with calls" within the last week from manufacturers looking to sell goods, said Monroe Millstein, Burlington chairman.  "Our buyers have been besieged with offers for all types of clothing across the board," Mr. Millstein said.  Off-price retailers specialize in the sale of brand-name and designer apparel at discount prices.  Apparel makers typically turn to them when they have excess inventory or merchandise they need to sell late in the season.  Most department stores have already ordered most of their fall and winter merchandise.  J&C Properties, Nashville, Tenn., said it holds a 10.36% stake in First Federal Savings & Loan Association's common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, the partnership said it holds 61,674 shares bought for $222,187, including 1,000 shares bought on Aug. 15 for $10 each.  The stock was bought as an investment.  In Columbia, Tenn., the bank's president and chief executive officer, John Oakes, said he wasn't familiar with J&C Properties.  But he described First Federal Savings and Loan as "one of the strongest and safest thrifts in the country," and thus likely to attract investors.  Entrepreneurs rejoiced as a key congressional committee switched gears and voted to repeal one of small business's biggest bugaboos: Section 89 of the tax code dealing with employee benefits.  But lobbyists fretted that small business still doesn't know what substitute legislation may demand.  Some worried that the new law could still shackle business owners with burdensome requirements.  While the House Ways and Means Committee late last week voted to repeal the complex employee-benefits legislation, it also voted to replace it with a simpler provision.  "This may be a significant new reform, but it doesn't look like any repeal I've ever seen," says John Motley, chief lobbyist for the National Federation of Independent Business, the largest small-business association, which has aggressively pushed for total repeal.  Section 89 of the tax code requires companies to distribute fringe benefits fairly among top employees and rank-and-file workers.  The once little-noticed provision of the 1986 tax-revision law has stirred an outcry from both business and labor groups complaining that the provisions are too confusing, and that compliance is too costly.  Small businesses especially have attacked the law as too burdensome to administer, claiming that companies have to pay large sums to consultants just to figure out the law.  In recent months, both the House and Senate have moved to curtail provisions of the law, but small-business groups have pressed for repeal.  While most political experts say the Ways and Means Committee turnaround on the Section 89 issue is an important victory for entrepreneurs, business owners still face uncertainties.  For one, it's still unclear how the Senate will reconcile its bill to curtail provisions of the law with the new House approach.  Moreover, business needs to have Congress act formally on Section 89 as soon as possible so owners can decide whether to cancel or keep any new insurance plans.  The latest confusion began when Ways and Means Chairman Dan Rostenkowski last week told three small-business groups that he had decided to reverse positions and support repeal.  Earlier, the Illinois Democrat had supported curtailing the law but opposed eliminating it.  In place of Section 89, Rep. Rostenkowski is proposing rules setting anti-discrimination requirements.  These are designed to make compliance simple to determine without hiring outside help.  The rules would cover what Mr. Rostenkowski calls "executive-only" health plans and the health plans of professional service organizations, such as law firms.  Small companies would have to match each executive's benefit plan with one for lower-paid staffers.  Larger companies would have to match the plans on a ratio of one executive to 25 other employees.  Not everyone is happy.  "It took one tax committee four pages and seven examples to explain {the proposal}," says the NFIB's Mr. Motley.  "They're saying either you offer the same plan to everybody or look ridiculous by choosing among your employees," he complains.  He also says if the Senate tries to combine those rules with the current Senate version of Section 89, a much tougher law than the one the Ways and Means Committee proposes could result.  Under the Senate bill, for example, a company could be required to offer any benefits to 90% of employees and pay at least 60% of the costs.  A Senate aide familiar with Section 89 says Rep. Rostenkowski "has moved the line with this new proposal, but he hasn't abandoned the principle.  My gut feeling is the Senate will say if it's a better way to go, let's go with it."  The Rostenkowski plan, he says, would remove a tax deduction for benefit plans that the government believes blatantly discriminate between higher-paid and lower-paid employees, but wouldn't try to get businesses to expand coverage.  Some small-business groups say the worries about the Rostenkowski action are misplaced.  The new proposal is cause for rejoicing and "removes a major stress factor for small businesses around the country," says John Paul Galles, executive vice president of National Small Business United, based here.  "I feel very confident Rep. Rostenkowski will keep his promise and repeal Section 89," he says.  Dirk Van Dongen, president of the National Association of Wholesaler-Distributors, calls Rep. Rostenkowski's new provisions safe harbors that are better for businesses than no rules at all.  "They're like a high jump that's six inches off the ground.  They're easy to administer and tame in what they require," he said.  "By having them, you avoid any contention as to whether your plan discriminates or not."  Rep. Rostenkowski, in another reversal, also said he will support extending the 25% tax deduction for personal and family health insurance for self-employed business owners, which was scheduled to expire.  Earlier, he had opposed the measure, a stance the NFIB has termed "Rosty's revenge," or a way of punishing the group for its stand for repeal of Section 89.  A key to the action on Section 89 was the fact that a repeal bill, put forward by Rep. John LaFalce, (D., N.Y.), chairman of the House Small Business Committee, has 317 co-sponsors, enough to win full House approval.  Congressional aides say the House Democratic leadership wasn't willing to prevent the bill from coming to a vote in order to support a powerful committee chairman.  Since it was clear that Section 89 would be repealed in the House, the aides say, Rep. Rostenkowski apparently decided to do it in committee, perhaps using it as a bargaining chip on other issues.  U.S. steel imports fell 9.7% in July to 1,458,000 tons from year-earlier levels, according to the American Iron and Steel Institute.  The trade group's compilation of Commerce Department data showed July imports were down 5.9% from June's 1,549,000 tons and below last year's high of 1,979,000 tons in June 1988.  Imports claimed 19.3% of the U.S. market, which is in line with the Voluntary Restraint Arrangement Program, according to the American Institute for Imported Steel Inc. Excluding semi-finished steel imports, the percentage for July was 15.2%, below the U.S. goal of 18.5%.  Rep. Lee Hamilton, the chairman of the Joint Economic Committee, wants to do a little remodeling of the Federal Reserve System.  His timing may seem strange, since the Fed now is generally well regarded.  Bert Lance, President Carter's budget chief, once said, "If it ain't broke, don't fix it."  That theory of government, however, has often led to crash programs amid chaos.  Maybe now would be a good time to take a look at the Fed.  Mr. Hamilton's proposals are something less than revolutionary.  But they could provide an occasion for a thorough examination of an important government institution, now marking its 75th year, that has often been shaped largely by happenstance.  The proposal that may attract the most attention would put the Treasury secretary on the Reserve Board and thus on the policy-making Open Market Committee.  This would be nothing new; before passage of the 1935 Banking Act, both the Treasury secretary and the comptroller of the currency were ex-officio board members.  Congress eliminated the ex-officio members as part of the desperate effort to fix a financial system that was, indeed, broke.  It's unclear just how much of a role the secretary had ever played at the Fed.  In arguing for removing the ex-officio members, Sen. Carter Glass said, "When I was secretary of the Treasury, I had considerable influence with the action of the board, and I have suspected that frequently since the secretary of the Treasury has had too much influence upon the board, and I do not think he ought to be there."  The argument for having the secretary on the board is that it might diminish intragovernment warfare.  "There's a lot to be said for it," says William Poole, a Brown University economist and former presidential economic adviser.  "It would promote clear lines of responsibility."  Mr. Poole also supports the Hamilton plan to require the Open Market Committee to announce immediately the decisions of its policy-making sessions, instead of about six weeks later.  "Nearly all economists," says Mr. Poole, "would favor the freest possible flow of information."  Under congressional pressure, the committee's decisions have been announced earlier and earlier, and the Fed has often expressed fear of market disruptions.  The trouble hasn't occurred, and few non-Fed economists see any chance that immediate disclosure would be damaging.  Another Hamilton proposal is to allow each incoming president to pick his own Federal Reserve chairman.  Chairmen, like presidents, serve four-year terms but the terms in recent decades have not coincided.  Jerry L. Jordan, chief economist of First Interstate Bancorp in Los Angeles, says, "It would be a better idea to allow a year between the arrival of a new president and the choice of a chairman.  That might separate the action a little from the politicking that surrounds the inauguration."  Yet another Hamilton provision would require publication of the Fed's budget.  Congress has always been a little nervous about the Federal Reserve's ability to create funds through its open market operations.  The late Rep. Wright Patman frequently hounded the regional Federal Reserve Banks for data, often on minor expenditures.  It's hard to see, however, how publishing budgets could do any damage.  But published budgets alone wouldn't satisfy Mr. Hamilton.  He also wants the General Accounting Office to audit Fed procedures much more closely.  Mr. Jordan, however, suggests that the GAO already is a pretty busy outfit.  "An agency already exists," he says, "that could do the audits."  This agency is the Federal Advisory Council.  The council was established by the original Federal Reserve Act in 1913.  There was considerable controversy over which was to run the system -- the banks or the government -- and the council was set up to monitor the system.  Each district had a member, and the council was empowered to get any information it wanted.  Until the 1930s the council was quite powerful, but it has been allowed to dwindle to a sort of public relations agency, meeting four times a year in Washington but doing very little.  Mr. Jordan suggests reviving the FAC to do any necessary auditing.  There are a number of other issues that could profitably be examined in the current non-crisis atmosphere.  Benjamin Friedman, a Harvard economist, argues that appointments of Reserve Bank presidents, who make government policy as members of the Open Market Committee, should require Senate confirmation; at present, they are named by the banks' directors with the approval of the Reserve Board.  There are arguments against such a change; some analysts fear it would unduly politicize the Fed.  But it's an issue well worth study.  Other issues: Rep. Stephen L. Neal has submitted a joint resolution that would instruct the Fed to stabilize prices -- and keep them stable.  Allan H. Meltzer, a Carnegie-Mellon University economist, proposes that the Federal Reserve be required to announce its plans for a coming year.  If it failed to achieve its aims, it would explain why.  The president could accept the explanation -- or accept the Fed officials' resignations.  Mr. Hamilton may be starting something.  Greece is set to introduce over-the-counter trading in a move to expand financial services before the European Community frees the movement of capital by the end of 1992.  The president of the Athens Stock Exchange, Nikitas Niarchos, said government authorization to start OTC trading is expected later this week.  Companies eligible to trade OTC will be relatively small, high-growth ventures with share capital of more than 100 million drachmas ($590,000).  Greece has 40,000 firms registered as small or medium-sized enterprises, but no estimate has been made of how many will be eligible for OTC trading.  The companies which opt to be traded OTC will raise funds directly from the capital market, bypassing high-interest bank loans, as well as red tape.  "Companies in Greece are currently paying 25% in interest rates and bank charges as opposed to around 6% abroad," said Dimitris Economidis, president of Economdis Electro-Optics, whose company will be among those trading OTC.  "Although share capital of 100 million drachmas is high for many businesses, OTC trading will definitely spur growth," Mr. Economidis predicted.  The new secondary market will also act as a testing ground for companies that may eventually raise the 170 million drachmas capital needed for a listing on the main exchange.  "OTC trading means small and medium-sized enterprises can become living cells in the economy," said Giorgios Pervanas, vice president of the Athens Stock Exchange.  "Those companies will have a real chance to develop," he added.  Companies that do apply to trade OTC will have to prove they are sound.  They must show healthy profits over a three-year period before trading approval is given.  Out of three published balance sheets submitted for stock exchange endorsement, the two most recent will have to be certified by an accountant.  Once a company gets approval to trade its shares in the OTC market, it is required to submit biannual balance sheets.  Companies that have been operating for less than three years will be approved for listing on a case-by-case basis.  Mr. Pervanas said other innovations planned by the stock exchange include the introduction of brokerage firms and fully automated trading.  He said two brokerage firms had been approved and would begin operating shortly.  The stock exchange, supervised by the National Economy Ministry, has a listing of 119 companies.  Trading volume in 1988 totaled 49.13 billion drachmas, down from 61.5 billion drachmas in 1987.  Trading at the Athens Stock Exchange is conducted by open outcry and transactions are in cash with a 24-hour settlement.  Foreign investors may buy and sell freely on the exchange.  Orders for securities are placed directly with an official broker or through a bank operating in Greece.  There is no capital gains tax in Greece.  Microsoft Corp. said its board authorized the repurchase of as many as one million common shares from time to time in fiscal 1990 ending June 30.  The software manufacturer said it planned to buy the shares on the open market to reduce the dilutive effect to shareholders of stock issuances for the company's stock option and employee-stock purchase plans.  The company had 56.2 million average shares outstanding on June 30.  Canadian manufacturers operated at 82.2% of capacity in the second quarter, down from 82.7% in the first quarter, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  It was the third consecutive quarterly decline in the capacity utilization rate.  Statistics Canada attributed the decline partly to "exceptional growth" in productive capacity as a result of plant expansions.  Air Wisconsin, a unit of Air Wis Services Inc., said its August traffic rose 1.6% to 41.3 million revenue passenger miles from 40.7 million a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  Load factor for the month, or the percentage of available seats filled, fell to 50.4% from 53.5%.  Canadian steel ingot production totaled 300,809 metric tons in the week ended last Saturday, up 4.6% from 287,669 tons a week earlier, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  The week's total was up 28% from 235,730 tons a year earlier.  The cumulative total in 1989 was 10,962,921 tons, up 8.9% from 10,062,730 a year earlier.  LONDON - Britain's current account was in deficit by a revised #4.86 billion ($7.59 billion) in the second quarter, the U.K. Central Statistical Office said.  The revision reflects a slight widening of Britain's trade surplus in services, particularly in tourism, and a narrowing of the surplus in interest, profits and dividends.  The Italian government expects inflation to ease to a year-on-year rate of 5.5% by December, down from 6.8% in August, and reach an average of 4.5% in 1990, according to a senior official.  The projection is part of the annual Economic Forecast and Planning Report, which the government will present to Parliament by the end of this month with next year's budget proposal.  According to the draft report, gross domestic product (GDP) will grow a real, or inflation-adjusted 3.5% in 1989 and slow marginally to a 3.2% growth rate in 1990.  "The economy is no longer showing the signs of overheating it did at the beginning of the year," the official said.  The economy expanded by 3.9% in 1988.  Unemployment in Britain fell to a seasonally adjusted 6.1% of the work force in August from 6.3% in July, according to provisional estimates by the British Department of Employment.  The department said unemployment has fallen for 37 consecutive months and now stands at its lowest since October 1980, when it was 5.9%.  The government's foreign exchange office said gross foreign exchange trading volume in Italy averaged an estimated $15 billion a day in April.  The office was issuing results of a survey of 22 major Italian banks about their activities in the foreign exchange market.  A comparison with other surveys showed that the Italian foreign exchange market was equal in size to the one in Canada and just behind the Dutch market, which had daily volume of $16 billion.  The British foreign exchange market, with a daily turnover of $187 billion, was by far the world's largest.  Canada's merchandise trade surplus widened to 1.03 billion Canadian dollars (US$869 million) in July, partly as a result of a drop in imports of automotive products, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  The July surplus was the largest since a surplus of C$1.10 billion in January.  The June surplus was C$222 million.  The July decline in automotive-product imports was attributed to a 3.9% drop in new motor vehicle sales in Canada during the first seven months of the year.  Japan's wholesale prices in August rose 3% from a year earlier but were unchanged from July, the Bank of Japan said.  Export prices declined 0.4% from July, which the central bank attributed to the yen's 0.2% depreciation against the dollar since July.  Import prices slipped 0.3%.  Cooper Industries Inc. said its Deutsche Gardner-Denver division received contracts totaling about $12.5 million to supply automated engine-assembly transfer lines for Volkswagen and Audi engine plants in West Germany.  Vestar Inc. said it received a patent covering the freeze-drying of certain liposomes.  The process lengthens the shelf life of liposomes -- microscopic spheres made up of fat molecules -- that can be used to reduce the toxicity of certain drugs administered intravenously to treat cancer and acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  Vestar develops drug delivery systems for diagnosis and treatment of cancer and AIDS.  It said its products are being tested in Europe but not yet marketed.  HCC Industries Inc. said a special committee of its board retained Bear, Stearns & Co. as its financial adviser in connection with a leveraged buy-out proposal from an investor group headed by some of the company's officers, and any other acquisition proposals that may surface.  The management-led investor group is proposing to buy the 1.2 million common shares of HCC it doesn't already own for $8.50 each, or an indicated $10.2 million.  The maker of precision electronic parts has about 1.7 million common shares outstanding.  Yesterday, in national over-the-counter trading, HCC common closed at $7.50 a share, off 25 cents on volume of 12,900 shares.  Last month, HCC shareholders filed a lawsuit seeking to block the proposed buyout.  The suit is pending.  Toyota Motor Corp. officials said they expect the company's Toyota division to sell about 950,000 cars and light trucks in the U.S. in 1990.  Officials with the Japanese auto maker's U.S. sales and marketing arm said they are projecting Toyota's U.S. car sales to exceed 750,000 units next year with its truck sales reaching 190,000 to 200,000 units.  Toyota officials also said they expect to sell 930,000 cars and trucks in the U.S. this year.  In his Aug. 23 letter, Robert Russell concludes that a decline in college-completion rates is due to exorbitant increases in higher-education costs in the past 10 years.  Price increases at many institutions have topped the inflation rate for the past six years, but the increases are economically justified.  Our largest cost component is labor.  According to the Education Department's 1988 Education Indicators, faculty salaries have actually eroded relative to inflation over the past 20 years.  Faculty salary increases were minimal or nonexistent during the 1970s, when inflation was rampant.  We are attempting to right this wrong now.  There are several other expense items that have outpaced inflation, including employee-benefits costs and technological changes.  We also find that talented faculty and potential faculty are looking to business careers for the "hefty" salaries Mr. Russell claims exist in higher education.  More ominous are the forecasts of a diminishing number of faculty members.  The time may arrive -- and justifiably so -- when significantly higher faculty salaries will be required just to continue operating.  The cost of a degree has escalated, but so has university-funded financial aid.  At Transylvania, 70% of the students receive some form of financial aid.  Finally, noneconomic factors also play a major role in why students drop out.  Our annual surveys of students who don't return cite reasons ranging from illness to boredom to broken hearts.  And yes, some do indicate financial problems are to blame -- but not in sufficient numbers to support the claim that we lose scholars to dollars.  Jerry Ray  Chief Financial Officer  Transylvania University  Lexington, Ky.  Thank you for your page-one story on groundless child-abuse charges as a growing national problem (Aug. 23).  Recently, when it was known that I would be a candidate for governor of Florida, I became the victim of a fraudulent child-abuse complaint.  I thus have firsthand knowledge of the ridiculous state of child-abuse investigations in Florida.  Anyone can make an anonymous phone call, and this call serves as a pretext to invade your home, even if the complaint is flagrantly frivolous and groundless, or motivated by malice as was the situation in my case.  You are not allowed to know who filed the complaint, or what the factual basis of the complaint is.  Rather than knuckle under to these Gestapo-style perversions of the law by Florida officials, I chose to fight, and we are joined in battle.  As a retaliation, Florida officials appeared before a judge secretly, and procured a bogus arrest warrant to seize my small children (ages 3 1/2 and 5 1/2).  Obviously, as a candidate, I have significant resources to throw against the child-protection mafia, but what of parents without my resources?  As documented in your article, the average parent is at the mercy of the state.  The great tragedy in all of this is that because of the fact that Florida officials pursue ridiculous complaints, legitimate complaints are underinvestigated.  There were more than 150,000 "hot line" calls last year.  The morning children's cartoon programs are full of "public service" ads agitating children to believe they may be victims of child abuse.  We are creating our own monster and, in the process, spreading resources too thinly that need to be focused on genuine crisis situations.  Anthony R. Martin  Fort Lauderdale, Fla.  Southwest Marine Inc. won a $27.8 million Navy contract for the overhaul of a cruiser.  Westinghouse Electric Corp. was given a $19.7 million Air Force contract for MX missile support.  Hughes Aircraft Co., a unit of General Motors Corp., was given a $19.6 million Air Force contract for space-based laser radar research.  United Technologies Corp. was awarded a $16.2 million Air Force contract for jet engine spare parts.  FMC Corp. got a $13.6 million Army contract for tank tracks.  General Electric Co. won an $11.5 million Navy contract for Aegis engineering services.  Thomas H. Wyman, former chairman and chief executive officer of CBS Inc., was named a director of this investment banking firm.  The board rises to 30.  Mr. Wyman is one of seven outside directors.  The Pacific Stock Exchange said it will suspend trading in De Laurentiis Entertainment Group Inc. and American Continental Corp. Sept. 29.  Neither has provided the exchange with financial filings for at least six months, a violation of exchange rules.  Shares of De Laurentiis, a Beverly Hills, Calif., movie producer, and American Continental, an Irvine, Calif., savings and loan operator and real estate company, are traded exclusively on the exchange.  Barton P. Ferris Jr., managing director of investment banking at Advest Inc., and Gary N. Shultis, president and chief executive of industrial materials distributor Gerard Daniel & Co., were elected directors of this maker of consumer products, hydraulics and pneumatic components.  The move expands the board to seven members.  Joseph L. Downey was elected a director of this chemicals, plastics, pharmaceuticals and consumer products manufacturer in an expansion of the board to 19 members.  Mr. Downey is a Dow vice president and chairman of the company's DowBrands Inc. subsidiary.  He also has responsibility for Dow's information systems and is a member of the company's operating and corporate management committees.  France unveiled reductions in the expensive charges that companies here must pay to cover their employees' government-provided social benefits.  But the cuts, which take place next year, are even shallower than the limited cuts their architects had initially planned.  The goal had been to cut the 10% unemployment rate by reducing the cost to companies of hiring people.  The government's so-called "social charges," for health care, retirement and other programs, cost companies more than 40% on top of each salary, greatly increasing the expense of each new hire.  On top of that, employees must pay 18% of their salaries in social charges.  But while the Socialist-led government would like to cut those charges, it concluded this year that it simply can't afford a significant across-the-board cut.  The social charges represent 40% of French government revenue, by far its largest single revenue source, much larger than income and value-added taxes.  "People realized that a significant reduction in hiring costs would cost the government 15 billion francs $2.24 billion to 20 billion francs," explains one official.  "We would have had to finance it out of the budget, and there were just too many other things we needed to finance this year.  We hope to do it next year."  The result is that the government is rejiggering some of the assessment methods for social charges and adopting some new tax credits, but avoiding a major shift in policy.  It will streamline an unwieldy system that assessed different industries at different rates for a family subsidy program.  That will save companies 3.7 billion francs.  In 1991, it intends to do something similar for its on-the-job accident fund.  It will offer tax credits to companies that reduce their work weeks, meaning they hire more employees to maintain production levels.  On the spending side, the government is boosting subsidies for programs to encourage part-time work and the hiring of long-term unemployed people.  Officials reiterated plans to boost corporate tax credits for research, and to cut corporate income-tax rates on re-invested profit to 37% from 39%. (The tax rate on profit that isn't re-invested remains at 42%.) These measures are mainly intended to boost business investment, but to make them more palatable to its Socialist supporters the government is billing them as job-boosters too.  Synbiotics Corp. said it received approval to market nationally a vaccine against feline leukemia virus.  The vaccine, called VacSYN/FeLV, has been marketed in California under an intrastate license for a year by its owner, closely held Bio-Trends International Inc., West Sacramento, Calif.  The action by the U.S. Department of Agriculture will allow Synbiotics to market the vaccine to veterinarians in the rest of the country under a licensing agreement with Bio-Trends.  Synbiotics also has a licensing agreement to market the vaccine world-wide, except in Latin America, when it receives approval.  Synbiotics develops and makes antibody-based products that prevent, treat and diagnose diseases.  Donald E. Panoz thinks drug research and development is risky business.  He ought to know.  Mr. Panoz has spent 20 years building Elan Corp. PLC into a top pharmaceutical research company.  Its specialty is adapting medications to make them more effective when administered to patients.  While Elan has been profitable with its research work, Mr. Panoz was dissatisfied with its potential for revenue growth and its ability to project revenue from year to year.  "Research and development companies . . . have no solid source of revenue" because they have no control over bringing products to market, says Mr. Panoz, who is Elan's chairman, chief executive officer and its largest individual stockholder.  So for the past two years he has been working in the Irish midlands town of Athlone to transform the company into a full-fledged international drug manufacturer, especially for niche markets.  It's too soon to tell whether the move will pay off, and a decision to develop an anti-AIDS drug has brought an unknown quantity to the mix.  The biggest ingredient in the company's favor is a twice-a-day formula of Cardizem, one of the U.S.'s best-selling cardiovascular drugs.  Elan developed a more efficient version, Cardizem SR, for Marion Laboratories and struck a deal with Marion to manufacture the drug for the U.S. market.  Elan also has developed an antismoking nicotine patch.  But Elan has departed from its normally cautious strategy by deciding to gamble on developing an anti-AIDS drug.  Mr. Panoz estimates that the company is spending more than 10% of total revenue on the drug.  While involvement in the anti-AIDS race gives the company new potential, analysts wonder whether it might do Elan more harm than good.  Some worry that Elan could end up looking too much like the pharmacuetical industry pariah, a one-drug company.  Nevertheless, Terry Devitt, equities analyst with NCB Stockbrokers, calls the plan to become a manufacturer a "heroic move."  Elan, he says, is "the most sophisticated" indigenous company in Ireland's burgeoning pharmaceutical industry.  "There is no other company that has perfected the same range of delivery systems," he says.  But, he adds, "the bottom line is the kind of challenge they have taken on, and it's very, very different from anything they have taken on in the past."  How difficult the transition from drug researcher to manufacturer can be was demonstrated in the first full fiscal year of the company's new strategy, which ended March 31, l988.  Because of research costs and manufacturing delays, Elan posted a loss of 2.3 million Irish pounds ($3.1 million) on revenue of 6.9 million Irish pounds.  But figures for the latest fiscal year show a return to profitability, with earnings of 1.6 million Irish pounds on revenue of 16.2 million Irish pounds.  The U.S. Food and Drug Administration granted permission for Elan to begin human trials of the anti-AIDS drug, called EL-10, last November.  EL-10, based on a hormone secreted by the adrenal gland, was developed in 1987 by a County Kildare microbiologist, Pat Prendergast.  The drug's FDA-approved human tests now under way in San Francisco mark the second time acquired immune deficiency syndrome patients in the U.S. have encountered the drug.  In early 1987, Mr. Prendergast took 10 San Francisco AIDS patients to Paris and carried out six months of tests in association with doctors at the Louis Pasteur Institute.  All but one of that group of patients have remained on EL-10.  Mr. Prendergast says the disease's progress in those patients appears to have been arrested by EL-10.  But Mr. Panoz is careful not to forecast great success for the drug or to project the idea that the company's future is totally dependent upon it.  "The pure fact is there is no, there is zero, clinical evidence that shows that EL-10 works.  At this juncture, there are indications," he says.  It has taken Mr. Panoz more than a decade to establish Elan as a company with a niche technology to sell.  In 1987, with about 50 license arrangements and 30 clients, the company decided to set an independent course, using contract research as "the engine."  Cardizem SR was ready for approval as a treatment for hypertension as well as angina, and Elan had worked out the arrangement to manufacture it for Marion, which is in the process of merging with Dow Chemical Co.'s Merrell Dow Pharmaceuticals subsidiary.  Elan also had developed a new liquid-drug delivery system for the pediatric and geriatric markets.  Work on its nicotine patch was complete, and it had EL-10.  But the strategy meant a 176% increase in spending on research and the fiscal 1988 losses.  NCB's Mr. Devitt thinks the company will need another year before it can prove it can handle the challenges of marketing and large-scale production.  Neil Buckley, Director-General of the Irish Federation of Chemical Industries, agrees that it may be "too early to say how well they have done."  But, he says, "they are still in there, and they have every prospect of doing well.  But it is a niche market they are in, in my view."  Mr. Panoz, however, is happy with a niche-market approach.  A company, he says, can grow from niche to niche.  A lot of niches can equal a pretty big market, he adds.  Kroger Co. said it has reached agreements or is in discussions to sell 11 food manufacturing businesses which it expects will result in an after-tax gain of about $260 million.  The businesses were earmarked for sale in January as part of the company's restructuring program.  A letter of intent has been signed to sell eight of the businesses to a corporation to be formed by Eli S. Jacobs, New York City, and Engles Capital Corp., Dallas.  Included in the sale are North Coast Bakery, Delight Products, Kenlake Foods, Pontiac Foods, State Avenue, Tara Foods, K.B. Specialty Foods and Pace Dairy.  Under terms of the agreement, expected to be completed by mid-November, the new owners will continue to provide Kroger with private-label products.  Kroger also said it reached an agreement to sell its Meadowland Creamery in Conroe, Texas to Borden Inc. Negotiations are underway with Alpha Baking Co., Chicago, for the sale of Kroger's Gateway Bakery in St. Louis, as well as with an unidentified prospective buyer for its Heartland Farms Dairy in St. Louis.  Scientists at the University of Washington and at the Oncogen division of Bristol-Myers Co. said they developed a live genetically engineered vaccine that protected macaque monkeys against infection by simian AIDS virus.  Four animals immunized with the vaccine were exposed to the simian AIDS virus, and all four have remained healthy and virus-free throughout a 32-week follow-up period.  Three of the study's four non-vaccinated control animals became infected within two weeks.  A fourth control animal remained uninfected.  While other scientists, notably polio pioneer Jonas Salk and Ronald DesRosiers of Harvard University, have recently reported strides in animal vaccine development, Oncogen said its work represents another kind of first.  "We believe that this is the first live, recombinant vaccine that protects primates against a retrovirus that causes AIDS-like diseases," said Shiu-Lok Hu, who is director of vaccine research at Oncogen and the senior author of a report on the work published in the current issue of the Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences.  He cautioned that the findings aren't directly transferrable to human AIDS, but said the methodology offers promise for further research.  The study animals were innoculated with two doses of vaccine spaced 16 weeks apart, and then exposed to live simian AIDS virus 12 weeks after the second innoculation.  The vaccine, called v-senv5 splices together part of the virus's protein coat to the vaccinia or cowpox virus, long used in smallpox immunization.  Scientists said the advantage of a live, recombinant virus vaccine is that it continues to offer protection even when exposure to the virus occurs long after immunization.  Jordan/Zalaznick Capital Co., an affiliate of Jordan Co., a New York investment firm, and Mezzanine Capital & Income Trust PLC, have acquired all shares outstanding of Custom Chrome Inc.  The price wasn't disclosed.  Ty Cruze, Custom Chrome's founder and chief executive officer, and other senior managers also have a stake in the company and will continue in their current roles.  Custom Chrome, based in Morgan Hill, Calif., supplies motorcycle parts and accessories to the Harley-Davidson aftermarket.  Mezzanine Capital is a British investment trust company.  Jordan said it has investments in more than 40 companies throughout the U.S.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  CSS Industries Inc., offering of 1.3 million common shares, of which 1,060,000 are being sold by the company and 240,000 are being sold by holders.  First Fidelity Bancorp., offering of 1,000 shares, or $100 million, of exchangeable extendible auction preferred stock, via Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Morgan Stanley & Co.  Parker Drilling Co., proposed offering of four million shares of common stock; via Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  Putnam Investment Grade Municipal Trust, offering of 10 million common shares, via Prudential-Bache Capital Funding.  Nissan Motor Co., Japan's second largest car manufacturer, said it plans to build a major production plant in southwestern Japan.  Nissan officials said the plant in Kyushu, the country's southernmost main island, will be equipped with a "flexible manufacturing system" capable of producing a variety of models.  They declined to provide details, but a local news report said the plant will have a capacity of 240,000 cars a year.  Construction, at a cost of 50 billion yen ($341.7 million), will start before the end of this year, and the plant will go into operation in the autumn of 1991, it said.  Officials said Nissan decided to build the facility to prevent a possible decline in output as the company upgrades aging production lines.  Nissan has five production plants in Japan, but the lines in some of those near Tokyo are becoming outdated, they said.  "Though domestic demand is strong, this isn't designed to boost production," one Nissan official said.  Car sales in the Japanese market are continuing to climb rapidly, though exports have become sluggish since many Japanese auto makers have started building cars overseas.  Bio-Response Inc. said it filed for protection under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  The filing wasn't a surprise as the company said last week that it believed a Chapter 11 filing was imminent because of an inability to meet financial obligations to debenture holders.  Under Chapter 11, a company is protected from creditors while it works out a plan to pay its debt.  More than 95% of its debentures outstanding were tendered for redemption by the company on Sept. 1 at an aggregate redemption price of about $22.4 million.  The biotechnology concern said it attempted to seek an arrangement with debenture holders that would permit the company to operate outside bankruptcy proceedings, but the firm said those efforts were unsuccessful.  Bio-Response, which develops commercial applications of products derived from mamalian cells, said the filing wouldn't interfere with existing projects.  The company said it has a backlog of orders amounting to nearly $1 million.  It also said it intensified its efforts to find a buyer for the company, but wasn't more specific.  Conder Group PLC said it received clearance to proceed with its merger with Beaman Corp.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Conder said the Federal Trade Commission notified it on Sept. 6 that its request for early termination of a required waiting period had been granted.  As previously reported, Beaman agreed to be acquired by Conder, of Winchester, England, for $7 a share.  Beaman is based in Greensboro, N.C.  Corvus Systems Inc., citing losses from its overseas subsidiaries, reported a net loss of $1.4 million for the fiscal-fourth quarter.  The troubled maker of computer products, operating under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankrupty Code, had a net loss of $3.8 million in the year-earlier period.  Sales for the quarter ended May 31 fell 12% to $3 million from $3.4 million.  Timothy R. Larkin, president and chief executive officer, attributed the results primarily to losses incurred by its French subsidiary and to write-offs of investments in its French and Canadian units.  For the year, Corvus had a net loss of $2.8 million compared with year-earlier net income of $2.3 million, or eight cents a share.  The most recent year included an extraordinary credit of $179,000 resulting from early extinguishment of debt and tax-loss carry-forwards.  In 1988, net included an extraordinary credit $930,000, or three cents a share, from tax-loss carry-forwards.  Sales for the year declined 41% to $15 million from $25.4 million a year ago.  Corvus, which filed for Chapter 11 in June 1988, said year-end results were affected by lower customer sales resulting from uncertainty because of the filing.  Under Chapter 11, a company is protected from creditors while it works out a plan to pay its debt.  The company also said year-end results were affected by price reductions on products in response to increased competition.  Corvus said its stock was delisted from Nasdaq because it no longer satisfied capital requirements, although it said the stock would continue to be listed on the National Daily Quotation Service pink sheets published by the National Quotation Bureau.  Enthusiasm for the $32 billion European fighter aircraft program may be about to go into a tailspin.  Warming East-West relations and tight government budgets could jeopardize the final stages of development of what was to be the next generation of fighter planes for the North Atlantic Treaty Organization in Western Europe.  At the same time, a rift is growing between the partners of the European fighter consortium over the choice of radar, threatening to delay completion of the first planes beyond the 1996 target.  "The program is being pushed further and further behind," says Ian Wild, an analyst at Barclays de Zoete Wedd Ltd., a London brokerage firm.  The project grew out of a commitment by Britain, West Germany, Spain and Italy in April 1988 to develop a new fighter aircraft for the European NATO nations to replace the Tornado model by the late 1990s.  The fighter that results from the project will face competition on the export market from France's Rafale fighter and, later, from the U.S.'s advanced tactical fighter, which is planned to go into production in the next century.  But the European fighter is intended to be the aircraft of choice of the four nations developing it.  The project has drawn many of Europe's biggest aerospace companies together to develop the body and engine of the plane.  Among the participants are British Aerospace PLC and Rolls-Royce PLC of Britain; Fiat S.p.A.'s Fiat Aviazione unit and Aeritalia S.p.A. of Italy; Sener Ingeniera y Sistemas S.A. and Construcciones Aeronauticas S.A. of Spain; and Messerschmitt-Bolkow Blohm G.m.b.H. and MTU Motoren & Turbinen-Union Muenchen G.m.b.H. of West Germany.  Not all the pieces of the plane are fitting neatly together, however, and few decisions have been made on the most vital parts.  The most prominent battle is between Britain and West Germany over the choice of radar.  Bonn is backing a group led by AEG Aktiengesellschaft AG of West Germany.  This group includes General Motors Corp.'s Hughes Aircraft subsidiary and the Marconi unit of General Electric Co. PLC of Britain (not related to General Electric Co. of the U.S.).  Bonn favors this group's MSD-200 radar system, based on a Hughes design, on the grounds that it is tried and tested technology.  Britain, though, backs a radar system from a group led by Ferranti International Signal PLC of Britain.  Its partners are Siemens AG of West Germany, Inisel S.A. of Spain and Fiat.  The group's system is still on the drawing board, but some specialists say it would be easier to adapt for use in the West German air force's F-14 fighter aircraft.  A decision on the radar has been expected for several months, but the four governments haven't yet acted.  The West German defense ministry recently threatened to use the AEG group's system for its own models of the European fighter if the Ferranti group wins the radar contract.  The radar delays coincide with a growing feeling in the governments that they need to trim the wings of such defense projects to fit them inside tight budgets.  The mood to cut spending is further supported by thaws in NATO-Warsaw Pact relations.  At the current arms control talks in Vienna, NATO has already pledged to cut combat aircraft by 15% this year if an agreement can be signed with the Warsaw Pact.  The U.S., meanwhile, has postponed plans to proceed immediately with its successor to the F-16 because of proposed cuts in the U.S. budget.  "The issue comes down to money," says a defense industry analyst in London.  "Politicians would like to avoid spending it if they can."  The European fighter faces political obstacles in West Germany, where opposition Social Democrats have pledged to cancel the project if they win next year's general election.  Without the West Germans, analysts say, the fighter program loses some of its economies of scale.  Still, a decision to cancel or slash the program isn't likely because of the impact it would have on member countries' aerospace industries, many analysts say.  "This program can be postponed or prolonged, but it can't be eliminated," says Andrew Moravcsik, research fellow at Harvard University's Center for Science and International Affairs.  "If the {European fighter} isn't built, those participating nations are out of the aircraft market.  You can't skip a generation and expect to be a major player in the future."  France, once part of the European fighter group, left the program early.  Aviation specialists say the French withdrew because they weren't guaranteed a larger chunk of the work.  France is developing its own alternative to the joint fighter.  Dow Chemical Co. boosted its quarterly dividend 22% and approved its first stock split in 13 years to reflect the surge in its earnings since 1987.  The chemical, plastics, pharmaceutical and consumer products maker said it approved a 3-for-2 stock split and raised its quarterly dividend to 97.5 cents a share on a pre-split basis from 80 cents.  Dow said the quarterly dividend on split shares will be 65 cents a share.  Dow, which is based in Midland, Mich., last split its stock in May 1976.  The cash dividend and the split are payable Oct. 30 to stock of record Sept. 29.  "This stock split, combined with a second dividend increase this year, clearly illustrates management's confidence in the strength of Dow's long-term sustainable growth," said Enrique C. Falla, Dow financial vice president and chief financial officer.  Analysts expected Dow to boost its dividend because the company has indicated it will pursue an aggressive dividend policy in the wake of several strong quarters.  The 22% increase was higher than most analysts expected.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Dow common shares closed at $101, up 25 cents.  Dow has also taken steps recently to solidify its position in several industries through acquisitions or joint ventures.  Most recently, Dow agreed in July to acquire a majority stake in Marion Laboratories Inc., a Kansas City, Mo., pharmaceutical company.  Earlier this week, Dow signed an agreement to form a joint venture with United Technologies Corp. to develop plastic parts for the aerospace, automotive and defense industries.  Leonard Bogner, an analyst with Prudential Bache Research, said Dow is playing catch-up with dividend payments that increased little during the company's lean years in the early 1980s.  But last year, Dow's net income nearly doubled and jumped another 30% in the first six months of this year.  As a result of the aggressive dividend strategy, Mr. Bogner said he expects Dow's post-split annual dividend rate to increase twice in 1990 to $3.25 a share from an anticipated $2.60 a share by the end of this year.  Maxicare Health Plans Inc. said the U.S. Bankruptcy Court here granted a preliminary injunction to restrain health-care providers from billing consumers directly for medical services that are the financial responsibility of Maxicare.  "This will ease the concerns of our customers, the employers.  Further, it should accelerate our efforts toward reorganization," said Peter J. Ratican, Maxicare's chairman and chief executive officer.  Maxicare, a Los Angeles-based owner and operator of health maintenance organizations, has been operating under Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law protection since March.  Maxicare said it is prohibited by law from paying claims filed before the bankruptcy action until the court approves the company's reorganization plan, which Maxicare expects to make public within a month.  Under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code, a company is shielded from creditor lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay off its debts.  The injunction applies to all providers who render services to members of any of Maxicare's 33 health maintenance organizations, and it applies to those that don't have any formal contracts with Maxicare, the company said.  However, the ruling doesn't limit the right of providers to petition the bankruptcy court for relief from the injunction if they can show undue hardship.  Last December, when three paintings by Vincent van Gogh were stolen in a nighttime break-in at the Kroller-Muller National Museum in Otterlo, the Netherlands, observers wondered why thieves had taken them.  Van Gogh, who sold only one painting during his lifetime, left all his works to his devoted brother, Theo, with the result that the ownership history of virtually every oil is known.  The three pictures taken, "Weavers: Interior," "Dried Sunflowers," and a version of his early work, "The Potato Eaters," were considered unsaleable.  Everyone's favorite scenario -- theft for an amoral secretive collector -- was dusted off once more.  The museum's director was contacted through the mail in early April and then by telephone on April 10.  The thieves were demanding ransom of five million guilders ($2.2 million at current exchange rates), and the authorities asked for proof that they could produce the pictures.  In answer, a stolen vehicle appeared parked outside the home of the museum's director on April 13 with a slightly damaged "Weavers: Interior" in the trunk.  Dutch authorities said this was the first time in their experience ransom had been demanded for stolen art.  They refused to pay and encourage future thefts for ransom.  It seemed that the only clue was the voice on the telephone, which the police played on television, hoping some viewer could identify it.  On July 13, local police arrested two men in the village of Negmegan, near Arnhem, not far from the park that surrounds the museum.  They confessed and told the police where the other two paintings were hidden.  The investigation continues although both pictures were recovered, and both men are in jail.  ---  The San Francisco arrest of three men on charges of selling paintings and drawings fraudulently attributed to major masters may put an end to easy profits for Tony Barreiro, Ernest Parker Jr. and Jeff Jones.  Their patsy was a professor from Boise who discovered the deception with the help of his skeptical framer.  The professor paid a total of $9,600 for nine works purportedly by van Gogh, Rembrandt, Rubens, Chagall, Renoir and Degas, and brought them home to Boise.  The owner of the framing shop there was surprised, and asked an appraiser to have a look.  He thought they might be fakes.  With doubts put in his mind, the professor showed the works to a Sotheby's representative in Los Angeles, Sandra Kline, and she, backed by staff in New York, told him they were forged.  Now, the professor must have asked himself how he could have believed the story handed to him along with the bargain price.  Mr. Barreiro said he had bought a large collection from a wealthy Arab sheik.  He'd been able to acquire it for only $40,000 because of the sheik's frustration in trying to acquire authentication letters from experts and other documentation for his collection.  However, the seller went on, he had sold a Pissarro from the collection that later became a focal point in a museum exhibition in Fresno.  The professor called the FBI.  In March IFAR got several calls from law enforcement agents looking for a criminal reason that works by such great artists had been sold so cheaply.  IFAR grew suspicious when the measurements of several drawings were identical, despite their attributions to artists from different centuries.  We suggested that the art might be forged rather than stolen and asked for photos.  Then the FBI in Idaho called Virgilia Pancoast, director of IFAR's Authentication Service, with questions about a similar-sounding group of drawings and sent photographs of them to us.  The "Rubens" was signed with two b's.  The "Degas" was a wretched imitation of an outstanding late pastel "Bather," recently seen in the Degas exhibition at the Metropolitan Museum of Art.  The professor had one more telephone conversation with Mr. Barreiro, a call in which he introduced an art dealer and his associate who might be interested in buying other works from the sheik's collection.  The "dealers" were FBI agents working undercover, and they managed to tape conversations complete with the entire incriminating sales pitch given by Messrs.  Barreiro, Parker and Jones.  The asking price was $200,000 for a collection of 67 works, including a "Picasso" sketchbook, "van Gogh" and "Rembrandt" drawings in brown ink, and a drawing by "Gauguin" offered in its "original frame with the original gallery sticker typed 'Tahiti' on the back."  The purchase was followed by the arrests and seizure of more art supposedly by Dali, Toulouse-Lautrec, Matisse, Kandinsky, Leger, Corot, Schiele, and Howard Chandler Christy, whose murals grace New York's Cafe des Artistes.  Mr. Barreiro boasted of 400 works of art, many of which are not yet accounted for.  The investigation continues.  What is the source of the forged art?  Are there other victims?  FBI Special Agent Thomas McShane would like to know, at (415) 533-7400.  ---  Security at American museums generally is excellent, and there is a better than average chance of recovery in these cases.  A major theft of 81 works of Asian art at the Walters Art Gallery in Baltimore in the summer of 1988 turned out to be the work of a night security supervisor there.  Almost everything he had taken over a period of weeks was recovered in his basement.  Now a security guard at the Houston Museum of Fine Arts has confessed to the theft of 63 pieces of African gold jewelry belonging to Alfred C. Glassell and valued at $3.5 million.  Discovered missing on May 30 from a locked storage area, the items were to have formed part of a summer exhibition called "The Private Eye: Selected Works from the Collections of Friends of the Museum of Fine Arts, Houston."  Museum officials hoped that news of the $25,000 reward -- which exceeded the value of the melted down gold -- would reach the thief before the jewelry was destroyed.  Within two days, Mr. Glassell received a call from a man who had the "stuff," and they made an appointment to meet outside a bank.  FBI agents arrested Cipriano Garcia Aguirre, father of five and a museum guard for three months.  Although Mr. Aguirre had another explanation of how he had come to safeguard the African treasure, he later confessed to taking the jewelry and was charged with the theft.  The recovery was announced four days after the exhibition opened, and the jewelry was promptly installed as planned.  ---  Ms. Lowenthal is executive director of the International Foundation for Art Research (IFAR).  Alpine Group Inc., aiming to cut interest costs, will offer a package of cash and securities for its $43.7 million debt outstanding.  Alpine, a maker of specialty coatings and developer of information-display technologies, said that for each $1,000 face amount of its 13.5% senior subordinated debentures, due October 1996, it will offer $400 face amount of notes due March 1996, 10 shares of common and $175 in cash.  The offer will be subject to holders' tendering at least 80% of the debentures; a total of $50 million of them was issued in October 1986.  Alpine would save some $2 million a year in interest costs if 80% of debentures are exchanged and $2.5 million if 100% are exchanged, said Steven S. Elbaum, chairman and chief executive officer.  If all the debentures outstanding are tendered, Alpine will lay out $7.6 million of cash, $17.5 million of new notes and 436,000 new shares, resulting in a 9% total stake in the shares by the debenture holders.  Mr. Elbaum said the swap would expand the company's equity base by increasing the number of shares outstanding and by retiring the debentures below face amount, with the difference recorded as equity, Mr. Elbaum said.  The new notes to be issued would be senior to any of the debentures that aren't tendered, Mr. Elbaum said.  In May, Moody's Investors Service Inc. cut its rating on the debentures to single-B-3 from single-B-2.  Mr. Elbaum said the debentures are held primarily by institutions, though he declined to identify any major holders.  Alpine is confident that it will complete the swap, he added.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Alpine common shares rose 12.5 cents, to $3.  British Petroleum Co., in a sweeping shake-up of its world-wide exploration business, eliminated 1,700 jobs and agreed to sell $1.31 billion of oil and gas assets to Oryx Energy Co. of the U.S.  The wholesale restructuring by Britain's biggest company reflects declining production at its major fields in the North Sea and Alaska's Prudhoe Bay.  BP, like other oil producers, also faces shrinking profit margins amid volatile oil prices, rising environmental costs and higher taxes.  In this more hostile operating environment, "you need to be smaller -- to cut back and focus your efforts," said John Toalster, an oil-industry analyst at London brokers Hoare Govett.  "It is a major cutback and a major withdrawal from certain areas."  Other oil producers haven't pursued a similar strategy, however.  The acquisition by Oryx -- the largest so far this year for oil properties -- is the biggest move in the company's short history and is its first move outside the U.S. Oryx, based in Dallas, was spun off from Sun Co. as a domestic exploration and production company last November and is the nation's largest independent oil company.  The sale by BP and the staff cuts, reducing overhead by more than $150 million a year, will free up cash and lower BP's relatively high level of debt.  Company officials said the moves will help finance expansion into riskier, new exploration areas.  "It is vital that we explore more aggressively but selectively for new reserves" in places that "until recently, were inaccessible to the oil majors," said John Browne, chief executive officer of BP Exploration, a subsidiary.  But industry analysts believe the streamlining will prepare BP, already the biggest oil producer in the U.S., for a major U.S. acquisition soon after Deputy Chairman Robert Horton assumes the top post next March.  Mr. Browne, chief architect of the restructuring, worked closely with Mr. Horton in turning around Standard Oil Co. of Cleveland.  In 1987, BP paid $7.9 billion for the 45% of Standard stock it didn't already own.  Oil analysts believe its next U.S. takeover possibilities include Los Angeles-based Unocal Corp., Phillips Petroleum Co. of Bartlesville, Okla., and New York-based Amerada Hess Corp.  Under the agreement, Oryx would receive about 9% of BP's production fields and exploration acreage in the North Sea -- representing about two-thirds of the assets being sold.  The U.K. oil giant owns a small proportion of many of these fields but prefers to be a majority holder.  BP acquired some fields through its #2.5 billion (US$3.9 billion) purchase of small North Sea oil producer Britoil PLC last year.  It is offering to sell about 12% of former Britoil assets.  Other properties include the company's entire oil-and-gas assets in Dubai, Gabon and Italy plus certain interests in Ecuador, Columbia and Indonesia.  BP said the sale would involve reserves of about 367 million barrels of oil, at an equivalent barrel price of $3.60.  The oil giant has attracted a relatively good price for its assets, analysts said, because they offer Oryx a major entry into international exploration and production.  Oryx gets "a wide-ranging production base in one fell swoop," said Jeremy Hudson, an oil analyst at Shearson Lehman Securities in London.  But the accord prompted Moody's Investors Service Inc. to place Oryx's debt rating under review for possible downgrade.  Oryx has indicated the asset purchase would be substantially financed by debt, the rating agency said.  About $1 billion of debt is affected by Moody's review.  Oryx anticipates assets sales and reduced capital spending to reduce its debt.  Both the sale and the restructuring, which includes a reorganized management structure, "is a 'back-to-basics' strategy" for BP, Mr. Browne said at a news conference yesterday.  The company now will be able "to make sure we are spending enough money on 'frontier' exploration," increasing such expenditures by 50%.  He said BP now spends about $350 million of its $800 million annual exploration efforts world-wide in "frontier" areas such as Vietnam, Ethiopia and Korea.  In the past, BP Exploration hasn't invested much in such areas, fearing it might spend a lot and discover little oil and gas.  But "it's what BP has to do {now} in order to assure reserve replacements in the 1990s" -- and reduce the company's reliance on Alaska and the North Sea area, said Carol Bell, an oil-industry analyst at London brokerage UBS Phillips & Drew.  BP must take the risk of pursuing frontier areas "in order to correct what may be a fairly sharp decline curve in their major sources of production," concurred William Brown, an oil analyst at Kidder, Peabody & Co. in New York.  Hoare Govett analyst Mr. Toalster views BP's chancy new exploration push and expected major U.S. takeover as part of Mr. Horton's aim to shift BP into second place from a precarious third among world oil producers.  "The whole thing is moving BP onto a higher risk plane," he said.  While the asset sale would lower BP's level of debt, "we have no present plans" for a U.S. acquisition, Mr. Browne said.  Following this disposal, BP will have shed about $6.2 billion of assets so far this year.  It currently has most of its coal assets and operations on the block for a sale that analysts say could fetch an additional $500 million.  BP's nutrition business, which includes Purina pet food, also could come up for grabs.  The jobs BP is eliminating account for 17% of BP Exploration's 10,500 employees and include 280 of its 3,000 U.S. staffers.  At his news conference, Mr. Browne said the shake-up ranges from top management to support staff.  Shortly afterward, W. John Saint announced his retirement as BP Exploration's chief executive for Europe; his successor is David Harding, another BP Exploration executive.  ---  Caleb Solomon in Houston contributed to this article.  U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills blasted European subsidies of farms and businesses, promising to unveil a U.S. plan later this year that would pare government handouts world-wide.  In a speech to business executives and economists here, she cited shipyards, farms and steel companies as leading recipients of European government largesse.  Mrs. Hills said the U.S. plans to attack the subsidy habit through the current negotiating round of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, which she called "our best chance to control what may soon be uncontrollable."  The trade negotiator didn't exclude the U.S. from the stinging critique, but she made it clear that she believes European subsidy troughs are deeper.  She estimated that Europeans last year spent nearly $120 billion to support agriculture, compared with about $75 billion in the U.S.  Mrs. Hills reckoned that the European Community "squandered" an additional $50 billion in subsidies to its steelmakers, shipbuilders and manufacturers.  Meanwhile, Mrs. Hills told reporters that she sent a deputy to hammer the West German government for its aid to Airbus Industrie, the European consortium aircraft builder.  Specifically, she assailed the German policy of protecting its Airbus participants against losses from exchange-rate fluctuations between the dollar and the mark.  "Of all subsidies, that which would destroy the price mechanism in trade is the most egregious," she said.  Participants in the Airbus consortium include Aerospatiale of France, Messerschmitt-Boelkow-Blohm G.m.b.H. of West Germany, British Aerospace PLC and Construcciones Aeronauticas S.A. of Spain.  Hacking back Europe's subsidies will be a herculean task.  Earlier this year, Sir Leon Brittan, the European Community's commissioner for competition policy, said "uncontrolled state aids could be a real threat to the unity of the common market and to the system of free competition."  Sir Leon pointed out that past government handouts have created overcapacity in the steel industry through subsidized construction of new plants that turned out to be unnecessary.  Aid to farms, railways, fisheries and coal industries have created similar distortions, he charged.  However, EC officials mainly have fended off new subsidies so far, with little progress to show in dismantling the huge industrial subsidies that have long supported Europe's traditional industries.  The U.S. negotiator expressed resolve.  "We're trying to get an international agreement that all of us will stop paying farmers to grow crops and that we'll stop paying shipyards to build ships," Mrs. Hills said.  "We mean to pull it off."  Meanwhile, Mrs. Hills said the U.S. has yet to come up with a plan for one of its most protected, and politically powerful, industries -- the textile business.  Currently, industrialized countries like the U.S. use the so-called multifiber arrangement to shield their textile and clothing makers from cheap imports from the developing world.  The current GATT talks are aimed at slicing back those barriers and bringing textiles within the mainstream of GATT trading disciplines.  The textile issue is highly sensitive poltically: U.S. and British textile firms are wary of a potential flood of imports from the Third World.  Meanwhile, developing countries might stymie progress on the rest of the GATT trade talks if they aren't given the chance to sell more apparel to industrialized countries.  Mrs. Hills' speech, sponsored by the American Chamber of Commerce in London and the Royal Institute for International Affairs, was part of a five-day European tour designed to blunt what the U.S. considers anti-competitive or protectionist tendencies.  In Paris, she attacked EC plans to limit U.S. television programming within the EC.  She also blasted the EC's local-content requirements for cars and office equipment.  Mrs. Hills' blitz through Europe -- and her sharp criticisms along the way -- signal a new phase in the U.S. attitude toward the EC's 1992 market integration.  After some months of playing down the threat that the single market may adopt a fortress-like stance toward the rest of the world, the U.S. is again worried.  "Of late, some provisions and directives give us pause," Mrs. Hills said.  The names are as stately as granite: Morgan Guaranty Trust Co., Bankers Trust Co., Chase Manhattan Corp., Tomato Bank.  Yes, Tomato Bank.  Since rechristening itself in April, the former Sanyo Sogo, a little-known regional bank, has grown plump with new deposits and nearly 50,000 new customers.  It's given away 100,000 cans of tomato juice and received record numbers of applicants for jobs as Tomato Ladies -- part-time employees who go door-to-door collecting deposits and promoting bank services.  The bank's passbooks and automatic teller machine cards are now decorated with the bank's bright-red, stylized tomato logo.  Why the Tomato Bank?  Why not?  "They've taken a ludicrous idea and generated enormous publicity," says J. Brian Waterhouse, an analyst at James Capel & Co. in Tokyo.  Deposits as of July 31 were up nearly 18% from a year earlier to 477.5 billion yen ($3.26 billion).  Based in rural Okayama Prefecture, a region more famous for its muscat grapes than for tomatoes, Japan's 102nd-largest bank previously took its name from its location (Sanyo), as is common in Japan.  A grape wasn't good enough for Tomato Bank President Kenji Yoshida, who dreamed up the name to attract retail customers.  As marketing gimmicks go, the tomato fulfills a Japanese fascination with small bright objects and foreign words.  Women find the tomato theme "cute."  Mr. Yoshida thought the tomato was a good idea, he says, leaving it at that.  After the name change, the bank's accounts by mail got over 1,000 customers, a third from Tokyo 400 miles away.  Now the bank wants to plant the seeds of its success in Tokyo by opening a retail office here in November.  Tomato Bank is aiming for deposits of 770 billion yen by 1991, its 60th anniversary.  The Tomato Bank hopes its successful theme will also allow it to sink roots elsewhere.  Once deposits in Japan grow to more than one trillion yen, the bank says, it may open offices overseas.  That could pit it for the first time against another bank using a fruit: New York already has the Apple Bank for Savings.  For now, though, the popularity of the tomato shows no signs of dying.  Declares bank spokesman Kozuo Fukuda, "The tomato effects are continuing."  After 29 years and seven months in exile, Sam Nujoma, the gray-bearded president of the South West Africa People's Organization, hit the ground running when he returned home yesterday.  He hastily kissed the tarmac at Windhoek airport and then gave his mother a quick hug.  He proceeded briskly through a reception line of party officials and old friends, and he barely had time to tell the news media "I am happy to be back home" before one of his bodyguards tugged his elbow and said "Comrade, let's move."  Then he was gone, disappearing in an official motorcade that rolled past a mile-long line of supporters outside the airport.  Not only does the 60-year-old Mr. Nujoma have a lot of catching up to do, he must also move quickly to keep a step ahead of those who have tried so long to keep him from coming back.  Mr. Nujoma, who led Swapo's 23-year guerrilla war against South African control of Namibia, returned from his exile in Angola amid a number of anonymous death threats that have cast an ominous shadow over the United Nations-monitored Namibian-independence process, which is scheduled to culminate in elections in early November.  Two days earlier, Anton Lubowski, a high-ranking Swapo official who had also been threatened in the past, was assassinated outside his home.  "If something happens to our president, we won't have an election," warns Hage Geingob, who is heading Swapo's election campaign.  "This should have been the happiest day of the Namibian people.  Instead, there are mixed feelings of fear and joy."  Those mixed emotions are being exacerbated by an election campaign that is proving to be as divisive as the long years of fighting.  About a dozen other political parties are campaigning to prevent Swapo, which favors a socialist and centralized government, from getting the two-thirds vote it needs to control the writing of independent Namibia's constitution.  Also, Swapo's image as a national liberation movement has been tainted by horrific tales of torture and imprisonment told by returning exiles who were accused by Swapo of being South African spies.  Anti-Swapo posters with drawings of torture scenes are appearing on telephone poles around the country.  In addition, leaflets distributed during the welcoming ceremonies hinted of a split between Swapo's exiled leadership and those leaders who remained in the country.  Sitting in front of the red, green and blue Swapo flag in the backyard of his new home -- a spacious split-level house on a hill in the black township of Katutura outside Windhoek -- Mr. Nujoma said bitter memories of the past two decades of fighting "must be buried forever."  While repeating the anti-South African invective that characterized his exile oratory, Mr. Nujoma also appealed for reconciliation inside Namibia.  "If we continue digging up the old pages of our history, we won't achieve anything," he said.  As he spoke, car horns blared in the streets of Katutura, which were jammed with Swapo supporters trying to catch a glimpse of their returning leader.  Many of them were born after Mr. Nujoma went into exile and know him only from pictures, like those printed on the party's ceremonial dresses and shirts on which the slogan "Long live Nujoma" encircles his smiling face.  But that prospect is up to the South Africans, as Namibia's administrator-general, who is appointed by Pretoria, remains in control of the country's police until the day of independence.  "The South Africans have to protect us," says Mr. Geingob with a wry smile.  "We're fighting an election now, not a war."  Alaska, Wyoming, Hawaii, Nevada and North Dakota -- have more men than women, a new Census Bureau report says.  As of July 1, 1988, males accounted for 48.7% of the U.S. population.  But 52.9% of the residents of Alaska were male, a higher proportion than any other state.  Census analysts suggest this largely reflects the migration of young men to work in Alaska.  Alaska also happens to be the only state where the median age of men -- 29.1 years -- is higher than the median age of women -- 28.1 years.  The median age of the U.S. population as a whole is 32.3 years, meaning half the people are older and half are younger.  Women outnumber men by the widest margin in the District of Columbia.  Only 46.7% of the residents of the nation's capital are male.  New York is next with 47.6% males.  Boy newborns outnumber girls by a slight margin, but a substantially larger share of male infants die before their first birthday.  Up to age 34, males still outnumber females in every age group.  In older age groups, however, women predominate because men tend to die younger.  Some novels concentrate on the most private places in the heart.  Others sprawl like diaries, to take in as much as possible of the public world around them.  The British writer Margaret Drabble, author of 10 previous novels, has been moving throughout her career from a more private, self-contained style to an outward-looking, open-ended approach.  "A Natural Curiosity" (Viking, 309 pages, $19.95), is, according to Ms. Drabble, an unplanned sequel to her previous novel, "The Radiant Way," which introduced Alix, Liz and Esther.  All are bright, lower-middle-class girls who met at Cambridge in the 1950s.  Beneficiaries of Britain's postwar social reforms, they awaken rudely in 1984 to a world they never quite foresaw: The onset of their own middle age and the radical changes under way in Thatcherian England.  "A Natural Curiosity" takes up their stories just three years later, yet if Ms. Drabble's style and approach are unchanged, a subtle shift in tone and attitude has occurred.  The shock has worn off.  Even though the characters still disapprove of the changes, they take them as given.  Dismay and bewilderment have been replaced by a cautious pragmatism.  This makes "A Natural Curiosity" a stronger novel than its predecessor.  The contrast between England then and now that Ms. Drabble spent so much time establishing in "The Radiant Way" has now become implicit.  Alix, flailing against a "law-and-order" climate, befriends an imprisoned serial killer.  Liz, the psychotherapist, appears on a television panel, provoking controversy merely by casting a cool eye on the hot topic of child abuse.  Ms. Drabble herself is always on hand to comment on her characters' commentary.  Her narrative intrusions may remind some readers of Fay Weldon's acerbic asides, though Ms. Drabble is less biting, and has a greater ability to see life steadily and whole.  Her irony opens up questions rather than sealing off discussion: "Alix," she notes, "who extends sympathy . . . to criminals and murderers, finds it very hard to listen with patience to the views of a Cliff Harper {Liz's Tory brother-in-law}.  This is one of her more serious limitations, a limitation of which she is, seriously, unaware."  "Life," the narrator, muses, "is more like an old-fashioned melodramatic novel than we care to know."  Among the turns in store for Ms. Drabble's readers are the suicide of a despondent entrepreneur, Alix's pursuit of the serial killer's mother (]), and the plans of Liz's ex-husband to find out what has become of a colleague held hostage -- and presumed dead -- in the Middle East.  I was not surprised to learn that Ms. Drabble plans a sequel describing the experiences of another character who has been traveling in Cambodia.  Intriguing as these developments sound, the heart of this novel is not in its plots, but in Ms. Drabble's effortless evocation of the atmosphere of Britain in the late 20th century, whether she is describing the end of a dinner party or the beginning of a love affair.  The narration continually locates itself in time by means of references to Britain's distant, yet still palpable, past.  "Raspberry vinegar," we are told, ". . . has reached the north of England, as fish sauce reached the outposts of the Roman Empire."  The spirit that animates this informal, informative chronicle, reaching out to include the public and the private, the trivial and the timely, is named in the title: It's the natural curiosity that keeps us tuned in to the world, no matter how bad the news, that keeps us turning the pages of our personal lives as if life were indeed, an old-fashioned melodrama.  Molly Keane's "Queen Lear" (Dutton/ Obelisk, 233 pages, $17.95) is as concentrated and intense as Ms. Drabble's novel is diffuse and discursive.  The octogenarian Ms. Keane began writing fiction in the 1930s under the pen name M.J. Farrell.  She also wrote for the theater.  With the death of her husband and the need to raise her children, she suspended her career, starting up again only in her 60s, this time under her real name.  Two finely wrought novels -- "Good Behaviour" and "Time After Time," depicting the self-contained, fast-vanishing world of the Anglo-Irish ascendancy -- appeared in the early 1980s.  "Queen Lear" returns to that same small world of hard-riding country gentlemen, as seen through the eyes of Nicandra Forester, who is 8 years old as the novel opens in 1904.  Although the story takes her through World War I, the Jazz Age, the "flying years of the thirties," and the shadow of World War II, events in the greater world are distant and muffled.  War looms small: The pattern of a special teapot takes on heightened significance.  Ms. Keane focuses on a single sensibility: Nicandra's.  From childhood on, her overwhelming desire has been to love and give.  Yet, at every turn, she is thwarted: by her mother (who mysteriously disappears the same day as the handsome stableman), by her aloof father, by her flighty pet hen, and by the shallow man she eventually marries.  It's a tragic theme for a comedy of mistaken perceptions, and a comic theme for the tragedy that finally unfolds.  ---  Ms. Rubin is a free-lance writer living in Los Angeles.  Syncor International expects to report a ninefold increase in fiscal first-quarter earnings on a 10% to 11% rise in sales, Gene R. McGrevin, president and chief executive officer, said.  Mr. McGrevin attributed the sharp earnings gain to tight cost controls, more judicious price cuts and personnel changes.  Syncor, based in Chatsworth, Calif., operates 84 service centers which prepare and deliver specialty radiopharmaceutical products used to diagnose cancer and heart disease.  The company expects to report first-quarter earnings of $800,000 to $900,000, or seven cents to nine cents a share, compared with $95,000, or one cent a share, a year earlier, Mr. McGrevin said in an interview.  Sales in the quarter ended Aug. 31 are expected to be between $29 million and $30 million, up from $27.2 million a year ago.  The first-quarter figures represent a turnaround for the company, said Mr. McGrevin, who joined Syncor last February.  Syncor had been battered by two competitors who entered the radio-pharmaceutical distribution business and undercut Syncor's prices to gain market share.  The strategy worked, as Syncor's share of the market was cut to about 50% from 80%.  Now, by reducing labor and material costs, that trend has been reversed and the company holds a 60% market share.  "Before, our prices and market share were going down, but our costs were going up.  We had the key indicators all going in the wrong directions," Mr. McGrevin said.  The company also recently consolidated the positions of vice president of operations and vice president of marketing and sales into one position, which Mr. McGrevin said "eliminated a lot of internal conflict in the organization.  We were battling ourselves internally more than our competitors."  Mr. McGrevin doesn't expect any new competitors to emerge because of declining returns in the business.  Also, the lack of availability of nuclear pharmacists in the U.S. would make any new player unlikely, he said.  Having to some degree "fixed" the company's core business, Mr. McGrevin said Syncor is focusing on expansion, perhaps by setting up some international medical service centers, or by providing other products or services from the 84 U.S. centers.  The company is developing a longrange expansion plan, Mr. McGrevin said.  To be able to staff any expansion, Syncor recently begun a recruiting program for pharmacists at the college level and set up a training program for nuclear pharmacists.  It also plans a $5 million retooling of the company's computer system over the next two years.  The company already plans to expand its home health-care services division, which provides intravenous services.  The division currently has 18 locations and its sales should expand to $12 million this year from $7 million last year, Mr. McGrevin said.  The company also expects to add four to eight new locations in this division.  Syncor also is awaiting the release of several new products.  It anticipates introducing within the next few years a new brain scan product, two cardiac scan products and some monoclonal products.  Mr. McGrevin reiterated that because the company is focusing on growth and its competition, Syncor is not for sale.  Earlier this month, Van Kampen Merritt, an investment banking unit of Xerox Corp., announced a bid to buy Syncor's for about $81.8 million, but it dropped the bid due to Syncor's lack of interest.  Earlier this week, Syncor announced it would buy back about 15% of its outstanding stock from a French shareholder.  Last year, 4.2 million Americans between the ages of 16 and 24 dropped out of high school and failed to get a diploma, for a dropout rate of 12.9%, the Education Department reported.  This figure -- the so-called status-dropout rate, which measures the number of people who left high school before graduation and failed to get a diploma by age 24 -- is down from 16.2% in 1968.  But Education Secretary Lauro Cavazos said the dropout rate is still too high.  Last year, the dropout rate was 35.8% for Hispanics, 14.9% for blacks and 12.7% for whites.  Since 1968, the dropout rate for blacks has fallen by nearly half, a substantial improvement.  The National Center for Education Statistics reported the new figures in its first report on dropout rates, as required by Congress in a law passed last year.  Preparations for President Bush's education summit with the nation's governors later this month in Charlottesville, Va., is generating support for the establishment of national education goals, including a significant reduction in the dropout rate.  The 12.9% dropout rate differs sharply from many reports that cite a dropout rate of 25%.  The higher figure refers to the proportion of 17-year-olds who haven't graduated from high school, and doesn't take into account people who finish school after age 17.  I am sitting with Stanley Kuttner in the family room of his home, watching the baseball game on television.  The first-place Chicago Cubs are playing the Montreal Expos.  It's the fifth inning, the score is tied at zero, and the Cubs have put runners on second and third bases with none out.  But the next batter pops out and the next strikes out, and it looks like the Cubs will come up empty.  Then Expo catcher Nelson Santovenia lets a low, outside pitch get past him to the screen, and the Cubs score after all.  That's the kind of season it's been.  The TV screen records the Wrigley Field bedlam, and also flashes the news that the Pittsburgh Pirates have gone ahead of the second-place St. Louis Cardinals, 5-0, in St. Louis.  If the Cubs win and Cards lose (as it turns out they do), the Cubs would be 4 1/2 games ahead with 17 games to play in the National League East, the TV voice whoops.  We sit quietly.  When the noise subsides, I ask Stanley if he thinks the Cubs can do it -- that is, win the pennant.  A long pause ensues.  "I don't know.  They're the Cubs," he says finally.  "But maybe the other teams are worse this year."  Such phlegm and caution is bred of experience.  Stanley is 73 years old, and a lifelong Cubs fan.  He knows better than most that, down the years, the team has been far more the done-unto than the doer.  He was there when the Cubs established their reputation as baseball's all-time patsies.  Yes, he was there, a short, wiry 16-year-old in the right-field bleachers at Wrigley Field, on Oct. 1, 1932, when the great New York Yankee slugger Babe Ruth, goaded by the Cubs' bench, was said to have pointed toward the center-field seats and then hit a prodigious home run to the same spot.  The homer is the basis of baseball's most lustrious legend, which only has been magnified by the 57-year debate over whether Ruth really called his shot.  With the Cubs again courting playoff or World Series disaster, the time seemed ripe for a revisit.  You were there, Stanley.  Did The Babe point?  Before I reveal his answer, let me assure you that Kuttner is not some old guy who has been sitting around his family room, waiting to talk about something that happened -- or didn't happen -- in 1932.  Still wiry and still short, he is a man of parts and participations, a husband, father of five daughters and granddad of eight.  Growing up on Chicago's North Side, he played American Legion baseball against Phil Cavarretta, later the first baseman and leader of the Cubs' last pennant winner, in 1945.  Stanley played second base for one team, Cavarretta pitched for another.  Stanley did not get a hit off Cavarretta.  He served in the Army during World War II, mopping up after the Marines on Guadalcanal and storming the beaches of New Georgia in the Solomons.  I asked if he had any war stories.  He said he had one.  "They sent me home in 1944 to guard prisoners at Camp McCoy in Wisconsin," he says.  "I met a Japanese prisoner who spoke some English.  He told me he'd been shot on New Georgia.  I told him I'd shot him.  We both had a good laugh."  After the war, he joined the Chicago advertising firm started by his two brothers and sister.  He retired as a partner three years ago.  When golf, tennis and bowling paled, he sought part-time work.  "The woman at the employment agency asked me what I could do.  I told her I couldn't do anything -- I'd been an executive," he says.  He now does odd office jobs for a suburban newspaper chain, in addition to playing golf and tennis, and bowling.  He also watches baseball, but not as much as before.  "The game takes too long now," he says.  "In the old days, games started at 3 p.m. and ended around 4:30.  Now they start at 1:30 and they're still playing at 4:30."  So he watches mostly on TV, and can do other things when he gets antsy.  As a kid, though, he considered baseball a supreme treat.  "My family always lived around Wrigley Field," he recalls.  "We lived at Beacon and Montrose, and on Ainslie, and later at Diversey and Pine Grove.  Some of the Cubs lived in hotels around Diversey, too, and I got to know them.  When Dizzy Dean was with the team, he and I and Billy Herman and his brother-in-law went drinking one night.  I was only 21 or 22, but I held my liquor better than Dean did.  "My brother, Chester, and I went to lots of games when we were teen-agers.  Sometimes we'd go after school, sometimes instead of school. . . .  Naturally, when the Cubs won the pennant in 1932, we wanted to see a World Series game," he goes on.  "The first one in Chicago was on a Saturday, and Chester and I got to the ballpark Friday night to get in line for tickets.  We stayed there all night.  We got good seats, but we were mad because other people showed up at 9 or 10 a.m. on Saturday and did nearly as well.  "I remember a lot about the game.  There were several homers.  Ruth hit one in the first inning.  The Cubs hit a couple.  Ruth came up again in the fifth.  You could see him looking into the Cubs' dugout, moving his head like he was talking to them.  Then he waved his bat toward the bleachers and hit his home run.  When he rounded the bases, you could see him talking to the Cubs some more.  "I didn't think any more of it right then.  It wasn't like everybody was talking about how he pointed, and then hit one.  But later, when I read things about the 'called shot,' I thought, 'Yeah, that's what he did.'"  I felt obliged to mention that most writers who had delved into the incident had concluded that Ruth hadn't pointed, with bat or hand.  Robert Creamer, in his wonderful biography of The Babe, sifted press accounts of the game and found only one that specifically said he had.  Stanley Kuttner is unimpressed.  "Sportswriters don't know everything," he notes, correctly.  "Anyway," he smiles, "it's a better story my way, don't you think?"  On Aug. 22 the Mexican government privatized the country's largest air carrier, Mexicana de Aviacion, in an operation involving a capital injection of $140 million, which simultaneously reduced the government's share of total equity to 40%.  The government gradually will divest its remaining participation in the company.  The control of the airline was transferred to a private group made up of Mexican, U.S. (Chase Manhattan) and British investors who made the winning bid in the auctioning process that opened in July.  Mexicana de Aviacion was one of the country's largest public enterprises.  This operation follows last year's privatization of Aeromexico, Mexico's second airline.  As control of the country's commercial airlines is transferred to the private sector, we will see two major effects: first, a permanent reduction of the fiscal resources channeled into commercial aviation by the state; and second, the promotion of a new development strategy in this sector -- which is of the utmost importance to Mexico's economy.  Both private groups in control of the airlines have announced ambitious expansion plans.  The divestiture of non-priority and nonstrategic public enterprises is an essential element of President Carlos Salinas's plan to modernize Mexico's economy and attain the resumption of sustainable economic growth, accompanied by price stability.  Of the 1,155 public entities that existed in 1982, fewer than 392 currently remain in the public sector with an additional 185 in the process of transition.  Besides the national airlines, notable examples of enterprises that were privatized include the National Hotel Group, which is Mexico's largest five-star hotel chain, several large capital-goods groups, industrial concerns and 19 sugar mills.  The privatization of public enterprises in Mexico has followed a closed auction procedure.  The sales agent, generally a bank, provides information about the companies to prospective clients, who then submit sealed bids.  Subsequently, the sales agent recommends a potential purchaser, based on the best offer.  The decision regarding the most appropriate buyer and form of sale is based on price criteria, the company's investment plans, employment policies, experience in the industry and export projects.  Other large public enterprises have been closed or liquidated due to their lack of economic viability.  The best-known case is the large steel mill, Fundidora de Monterrey, which at the time of its closure in 1986 employed close to 8,000 workers.  A recent survey shows that approximately 95% of these workers have found an alternative source of employment in more dynamic sectors of the economy.  Today, an additional 181 firms are in the process of being removed from the public sector.  Mexico's divestment program must be seen in the context of a larger, world-wide process.  Over the past few years, the world has witnessed broad deregulation and privatization efforts in both developed and developing countries (including centrally planned economies).  The pace and scope of the privatization process in different countries have been determined mostly by the way in which the public sector was formed.  In many cases, privatization has been a response to the need for fiscal austerity -- and a more efficient allocation of resources in the economy.  In some cases, short-run costs have been incurred, as in any structural adjustment program.  But the world has come to recognize that the long-term political and economic benefits of privatization projects outweigh the difficulties of temporary adjustment periods.  The revenues from privatization in Mexico are currently estimated at $2.5 billion.  However, the net benefit for the public sector is much larger, because many enterprises operated at a loss.  As a result of the divestment process, no additional fiscal resources will be allocated to them.  In addition to the fiscal benefits, which allow the government to concentrate on its basic tasks of promoting economic prosperity and preserving civil liberties, the divestiture of state-owned companies fosters overall economic efficiency and increases employment opportunities in more efficient, private enterprises.  Mexico's program to strengthen its public sector might be viewed as consisting of two stages.  The first, which corresponds to the process of divesting existing nonstrategic or non-priority state-owned companies, already has produced significant results.  The second stage consists of opening up new investment opportunities in some areas of the economy where different restrictions prevailed.  New programs will enable the private sector to invest in infrastructure projects, such as toll roads, bridges and hydroelectric dams.  Private investment will allow the refurbishment of the country's infrastructure, which is a necessary condition for the successful integration of Mexico into the world economy.  At the same time, it allows the government to concentrate on other areas such as education, health and social programs.  Mexico's comprehensive privatization program simultaneously strengthens its public sector and generates new opportunities for foreign and private investment.  Our goal is to induce price-stabilized growth through increased efficiency, higher investment and broader private-sector participation in the economy. ---  Mr. Ortiz is Mexico's undersecretary of finance.  As a teen-ager, Sergei Mironenko wanted to go to college.  That meant he had no choice but to join Komsomol, the Communist Party's youth organization.  "It was impossible to get into university without being a member," he says.  Now an artist in his late 20s, Mr. Mironenko has long since thrown away his membership card.  The once-powerful Komsomol is more form than substance, he says.  "It does nothing for its members."  For decades, Komsomol has been a cross between Big Brother and the Scouts, a giant organization that rammed Communist theory down the throats of Soviet youngsters while monopolizing all their group activities.  Like Mr. Mironenko, almost everyone between the ages of 14 and 28 joined, usually because their futures depended on it.  But no more.  Komsomol -- like the rest of the Communist establishment in Mikhail Gorbachev's Russia -- is in the midst of a crisis and groping to find its way.  Over the past four years, membership in Komsomol has plunged to 36 million from 42 million.  The entire Lithuanian Komsomol just voted to leave the organization and set up its own youth movement.  Komsomol officials have taken to debating each other over what to do.  At one extraordinarily candid meeting last month in Volzhsky, an industrial town near Volgograd, about 100 reform-minded officials showed up.  As one participant conceded privately, "The question is how to bury the corpse."  Mr. Gorbachev's attempts to introduce elements of democracy in his country have turned once-mighty political and social monopolies into near-irrelevant institutions.  The country's labor unions have been discredited by the recent coal miners' strike, in which they played no role, while the Communist Party itself is wracked by internal feuding and under attack by the general public.  The plight of Komsomol is a window into this turmoil.  "What is going on in Komsomol is going on everywhere," says Vadim Golovanov, a professor at the elite Komsomol Higher School in Moscow.  "The main tendency in society now is to revise all old stereotypes.  The struggle against the monopoly of the Komsomol is the same as the struggle against the monopoly of the party."  Political indoctrination in the Soviet Union starts early.  During their first year at school, children become Octobrists and wear the badge of Baby Lenin.  Three years later they don the red kerchiefs of the Pioneers, taking trips to summer camp and learning that Uncle Lenin likes boys and girls who clean their plates, the subject of one children's book.  At the age of 14, they become members of Komsomol.  Membership has become such a formality that whole school classes are enrolled automatically.  Duties include sitting through dull political meetings once a month and waving flags at rallies.  Some members are pressed into work in the fields at harvest time.  Komsomol bureaucrats do little to cater to their constituency.  Occasionally, they lay on a disco or visit to a movie for members.  But, says Marina Stepanova, a 20-year-old Muscovite, "It's ridiculous.  You can go to a film on your own.  You don't need Komsomol for that."  It isn't surprising, then, that Komsomolskaya Pravda, the national youth newspaper, now receives a steady stream of letters from readers returning their membership cards in protest.  A typical one comes from Nikolai Smelov, a worker from Central Russia, who enclosed his son's card and a brief note complaining that, "collecting membership fees is the Komsomol's only occupation."  For decades, the organization has been a carbon copy of the Communist Party, mouthing its rhetoric and blindly obeying its commands.  In return, ranking Komsomol members enjoy special privileges handed out by the party or paid for out of Komsomol's approximately $800 million in annual revenue.  The perks include access to restricted stores, big apartments and even chauffeur-driven cars.  Best of all, the officials can work their way up the system of "nomenklatura," through which the party allocates the nation's best jobs.  Komsomol's national leader, for example, is traditionally rewarded the post of ambassador to a Western country.  "It's a kind of surrealistic game," says Konstantin Dludsky, a Komsomol official from Arkhangelsk.  "You don't believe in it, but you do it."  Mr. Dludsky was one of the Komsomol officials who discussed overhauling the organization at the meeting in Volzhsky, which a Western reporter was allowed to attend.  Maxim Sotnikov, a nuclear physicist who runs the Komsomol chapter at Moscow State University, quickly emerged as the pivotal figure during the deliberations -- and his proposals were a sign of the times in the Soviet Union.  Mr. Sotnikov advocated cutting the organization's bureaucracy and, more significantly, ending its political allegiance to the Communist Party.  He wants to make Komsomol a democratic umbrella organization for a wide variety of interest groups.  He would scrap the current, rigidly centralized structure under which members are organized by school or workplace and instead rely on members voluntarily banding to gether to create a national youth pressure group.  The party would no longer appoint officials to hand down orders; members would democratically elect their own leaders.  Mr. Sotnikov even questioned whether the revamped Komsomol -- a Russian abbreviation for All-Union Leninist Communist Union of Youth -- should contain the words "Leninist" or "Communist" at all.  "We don't need a Communist youth organization," explained Mr. Sotnikov, himself a party member.  "We need a general youth organization."  His ideas sometimes seemed too radical or too vague for many of the participants.  The conversation grew increasingly heated.  "So what is it, an organization or a movement?" one bewildered speaker from industrial Sverdlovsk wanted to know.  "I've already explained that," replied Mr. Sotnikov, "but we'll try once more."  A philosophy student from Moscow came to the rescue.  "The movement is the axiom," he shouted impatiently.  "But you need to organize a movement, give it a structure."  The man from Sverdlovsk paused, and then gave up.  "It's too complex for ordinary Komsomol members," he said.  "We just need a simple declaration."  "Our problem," an observer from the Komsomol Central Committee added unhelpfully, "is that we have different understandings of what communism is."  The misunderstandings were eventually cleared up over coffee in the bar downstairs, which showed Tom-and-Jerry cartoons for light relief.  The agreed platform, essentially Mr. Sotnikov's program, will now be presented to a Komsomol national congress next year.  It remains unclear whether even such radical proposals will be enough to save the organization, however.  Komsomol's power has for decades resided in its role as a pillar of the establishment.  But, already, leading universities such as Moscow State no longer insist on a Komsomol recommendation.  Even the Komsomol upper school, an elite post-graduate college on the edge of Moscow, is considering dropping the membership requirement for some disciplines, according to Mr. Golovanov.  It is not just Komsomol's current problems that worry the Communist hierarchy.  For decades, the party has used the organization as a training ground for the next generation of leaders in politics and industry.  If the supply of eager young ideologists slows now, what does this bode for the future?  Worried, Soviet authorities have raised salaries of Komsomol officials as much as 50% to attract the disaffected younger generation back into the fold.  Komsomol's monopoly on organized youth activity, however, is simply eroding.  Across the country, thousands of so-called informal groups have sprung up, often campaigning on local issues such as environmental protection.  Reflecting the newly sanctioned diversity, one participant at the Volzhsky meeting wore a badge proclaiming himself a member of the "Federation of Anarcho-Syndicalists."  Membership is still a must for anyone wanting to become a teacher or join the police or armed forces.  But Komsomol's prestige has sunk so low that it is now an object of widespread ridicule, a sign that drastic changes are needed if the organization is to survive.  A new film that is a vicious satire of Komsomol -- "Extraordinary Incident of District Importance" -- has been playing to packed houses across the country despite attempts by some local officials to prevent it from being shown.  It depicts Komsomol functionaries as toadying, power-hungry and completely out of touch with the problems of ordinary Soviet people.  The opening sequence is of an entire class of 14-year-olds trooping into the local Komsomol committee's headquarters.  Both the children and the officials look completely bored.  After asking a few simple questions about the organization, which the children can't answer, the Komsomol chief proudly tells them they have passed, and are now enrolled in the glorious Komsomol.  The theater audience laughs derisively.  Norton Opax PLC, a specialty-printing company, said it will allow its hostile #688 million ($1.07 billion) offer for De La Rue Co. to lapse.  Norton, which itself is subject to a #382 million bid by Bowater Industries PLC, said it realized the linkup with De La Rue wasn't going to receive shareholder approval at an annual general meeting scheduled for today, chiefly because Bowater has recently lifted its stake in Norton to 29.9%.  Norton also said it entered into discussions with Bowater which may "lead to a recommendation of those offers."  Previously, Norton fiercely resisted Bowater's takeover overtures.  In trading on London's Stock Exchange, Norton shares rose two pence each to 219 pence; Bowater rose two pence to 503 pence, and De La Rue fell nine pence to 338 pence.  Norton's announcement helps resolve the three-cornered takeover battle, by removing De La Rue from the fray.  Bowater is involved in several different activities, ranging from printing and packaging to engineering.  Bowater bought a 25% stake in Norton earlier this year from British Publisher Robert Maxwell, with the view to "develop both companies."  However, when Norton bid for De La Rue without soliciting Bowater's advice, Bowater decided to thwart the move by bidding for Norton.  Analysts say Bowater is likely to succeed in its bid.  From an interview in PR Reporter with Frank Mankiewicz of the public-relations firm, Hill & Knowlton:  The notion of public relations as a profession is as absurd as bartenders calling themselves "mixologists."  A profession is a skill -- PR is not.  Lawyers, accountants and doctors can be good PR people.  All that's required is a sense of public opinion.  A profession has standards and schools.  The Public Relations Society of America's PR degrees, all of it's silly.  If a person has a PR degree, all it indicates is that he wasted a lot of time that could have been spent studying worthwhile subjects like history or economics.  It's about as useful as a degree in astrology.  Well, maybe not quite that bad.  U.S. Secretary of Commerce Robert Mosbacher and Nippon Telegraph & Telephone Corp. President Haruo Yamaguchi signed a research and development agreement to expand cooperation in the computer and telecommunications fields.  Mr. Mosbacher said the agreement "allows both Japan and the U.S. to enrich their technical capability without duplicating basic research in costly and time-consuming areas."  The accord, an expansion of an arrangement dating to 1984 between NTT and the Commerce Department's National Institute of Standards and Technology, is expected to extend cooperative development in certain fields touching on semiconductors, telecommunications, computers, computer networking and frequency measurements.  The agreement calls for information exchange on various scientific and technical developments, visits and technical consultations between Commerce Department and NTT staff members and exchanges of scientists, engineers and other specialists for up to 12 months at each other's laboratories.  It also calls for joint research activities on tests, experiments and other technical projects.  The agreement leaves open the possibility of further cooperation in mutually agreed areas.  News Corp., the Australian media company controlled by Rupert Murdoch, said it bought 50% of two Hungarian newspapers, its first paper publishing venture in Eastern Europe.  Terms weren't disclosed for the investment in the Budapest newspaper company, which remains half owned by Hungary's Credit Bank and other investors there.  Reform, the nation's first independent weekly tabloid when it was launched last year, has circulation of 380,000.  Mai Nap, a daily paper started in February, has circulation of 80,000.  Mr. Murdoch said in a statement that publishing in the eastern bloc is "a most interesting step."  Retail sales grew moderately last month, the government reported, driven by a surge in automobile buying that most analysts expect will stall this month.  Sales rose 0.7% in August to $144.29 billion, according to a Commerce Department survey of retail establishments across the country.  But a 2.6% jump in car sales -- fueled by big end-of-model-year discounts and rebate offers -- accounted for most of the gain.  Without it, the government said, sales grew only 0.2%.  "These figures are borderline abysmal," said Kenneth Mayland, chief economist at Society Corp., a bank holding company in Cleveland.  "Now we know why Mr. Campeau is suffering," he added, referring to the recently reported financial troubles of Robert Campeau's Campeau Corp., which owns several chains of department stores.  The government also said retail sales didn't increase in July as much as it initially estimated; based on new data, the department said sales grew 0.5% during the month rather than the 0.9% it initially reported.  The government's monthly retail sales estimates are based on a relatively small sample of reports and frequently are revised substantially as more data are collected.  The numbers aren't adjusted to remove the effects of inflation.  They also exclude spending on services, which accounts for a large portion of consumer outlays.  Nevertheless, Rosalind Wells, chief economist of the National Retail Merchants Association and president of a consumer research firm, concluded: "Overall, it still says to me that despite the talk of soft landings and soft takeoffs and all the jargon, underlying consumer spending is slow."  Many analysts had expected larger gains in retail sales than August's rise.  Recently revised government economic statistics show that retail sales and overall consumer spending were stronger in the second quarter than initial data indicated.  The financial markets read the report as a sign of weakness.  Stock prices fell and the dollar declined against major currencies.  But the White House insisted that the retail-sales report shows that the nation's 82-month economic expansion, unprecedented in peacetime, continues.  Spokesman Marlin Fitzwater called the numbers "an indication of continued but slow growth."  There are signs that the pace of retail sales could peter out.  On Wednesday, auto companies reported that their sales weakened in the first 10 days of September.  And with new models due out soon -- at prices from 5% to 8% higher -- most economists say car buying may continue to soften.  Sales of other big-ticket items improved significantly last month, according to the report.  Furniture sales, a category that includes electronics and personal computers, climbed 1.6% after tumbling 2% in July.  Sales of hardware and building materials leaped 2.2% after dipping 0.2% the month before.  "Lower interest rates and discount pricing have led to a rebound in spending on consumer durables," said William K. Mac-Reynolds, director of economic forecasting at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce.  But sales of non-durable goods -- products such as clothing, food and chemicals, generally defined as having a usefulness of less than three years -- were weak in August.  Although clothing-store sales grew 1.1%, sales fell at restaurants, grocery stores, gas stations and general-merchandise department stores.  Some analysts speculated that people had cut back on various other purchases to put their money into new cars.  Fingerprints that remain invisible to present developing techniques can be made visible with a method devised by a cell biologist at the Los Alamos National Laboratory.  The U.S.-owned lab said latent fingerprints, palm prints and footprints can be developed on plastic, metal, paper, glass, and porous and non-porous surfaces with a technique invented for the Secret Service by George Saunders.  Mr. Saunder's technique "led to the arrest of a criminal suspect for the first time in March," the laboratory said.  "Palm prints were developed on a blank government check stolen from a military facility in Pennsylvania," it said.  The print-developing method is based on a technique biologists use to stain proteins.  The surface holding a latent fingerprint is washed for about 30 minutes in a buffer solution of citric acid that contains suspended particles of gold.  An image begins to emerge as the gold particles are electrically attracted to the proteins of the fingerprint.  The print is then bathed in a silver solution that highlights the gold particles.  The technique works on the original surface and on a print "lifted" from the surface on a nitrocellulose membrane.  The method can develop prints on adhesive tape used to wrap drugs, counterfeit money and bombs.  It also can develop on computer disks, credit cards, bullet cartridges and wet paper.  Both the Secret Service and the Federal Bureau of Investigation are now using the technique, the lab said.  Root of the Matter  ("Cost, not fear of drilling, is the most common worry people have about going to the dentist." -- WSJ news item)  Somehow this statement  Doesn't fit the bill,  Since I would gladly pay  A dentist not to drill.  -- Arnold J. Zarett.  ---  Summer Speak  Those touring Europe in rented cars  Often find their vacation is spent  Experiencing the cultural shock  Of gridlock with a foreign accent.  -- Edward F. Dempsey.  ---  Hue and Cry  Once folks wanted their place in the sun.  Now many will settle for a place in a tanning parlor.  -- Gil Stern.  The world's poorest countries are likely to be hit particularly hard by rising global temperatures, which may destroy traditional crops, breed tropical diseases and flood coastal areas, according to environmental experts.  Specialists at a three-day conference on the world's environment, sponsored by the Japanese government, said low-lying countries like Bangladesh could lose up to 20% of their land area in the next century because of rising ocean levels caused by melting polar ice.  Thousands of Pacific islands could completely disappear, they said.  Scientists have predicted the Earth will warm gradually over coming decades because of the "greenhouse effect" caused by a build-up of man-made gases in the atmosphere that prevent heat from escaping.  Dennis Tirpak, director of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency's Global Climate Change Division, said temperatures are likely to increase by 1.5 to 4.5 degrees centigrade and ocean levels to rise by 0.5 to 2.0 meters if current emissions of "greenhouse" gases continue through the next century.  The sensitivity of rice, Asia's staple food, to high temperatures, and the widespread farming of marginal lands make the region particularly vulnerable to soaring temperatures, he said.  Bell Atlantic Corp. hopes to eliminate about 1,200 jobs, and will consolidate several telephone operations and write off good will on some non-telephone businesses.  The consolidation, which will result in a charge against profits estimated by analysts at $300 million or more, is expected to wipe out earnings in the fourth quarter and could continue to deflate earnings in 1990.  Bell Atlantic wouldn't specify the size of the charge, but indicated that it will reflect costs of early retirement and some refinancing of subsidiaries' debt.  In the 1988 fourth quarter, Bell Atlantic earned $302.6 million, or $1.53 a share, on revenue of $2.7 billion.  In the full year, the company had profit of $1.3 billion, or $6.65 a share, on revenue of $10.8 billion.  Bell Atlantic said its restructuring efforts will result in the closure of its Chesapeake & Potomac Telephone Co. headquarters in Washington, D.C., which has about 900 workers.  The consolidation is expected to result in savings of about $50 million to $100 million in 1990.  However, analysts said the savings will be offset by certain other costs related to a new medical and dental benefits trust.  The company, which has a total of 81,000 employees, made its announcement after the stock market closed yesterday.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Bell Atlantic closed at $96.75, up 75 cents.  Frank Governali, a First Boston Corp. analyst, said he welcomed Bell Atlantic's move, despite its impact on fourth-quarter results.  "The company is reacting to changes in the industry and new regulation that provides incentives to operate more efficiently," he said.  With five of its seven states adopting regulations that tie profits to efficient operations, he said, such a bold maneuver was inevitable.  Other industry observers weren't so complimentary.  Joel D. Gross, a research vice president at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp., characterized the action as "a big hit for a writedown."  Moreover, analysts said the operating savings expected in 1990 probably would be neutralized by the creation of the medical and dental benefits trust, which the analysts estimated to cost about $100 million next year.  As a result of labor negotiations with the Communications Workers of America and the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers, Bell Atlantic agreed to fund the trust to cover the costs of future health benefits for non-management retirees.  Bell Atlantic also will be refinancing the debt on three of its telephone company units to take advantage of lower interest rates, in the hope of improving cash flow.  The company said it will also examine the possibility of writing down good will on its several small non-telephone operations, including its computer maintenance business.  Philip A. Campbell, Bell Atlantic's vice chairman and chief financial officer, predicted the actions would strengthen the company's balance sheet in 1990 and reduce the "cost burden" associated with premium prices the parent company paid for past acquisitions.  "We are reacting to competitive forces and laying the groundwork for Bell Atlantic's future," said Raymond Smith, chairman and chief executive.  "This is our continuing effort to control costs."  Initial claims for regular state unemployment benefits rose to a seasonally adjusted 319,000 in the week ended Sept. 2 from 318,000 the previous week, the Labor Department said.  The number of people receiving regular state benefits in the week ended Aug. 26 increased to a seasonally adjusted 2,211,000, or 2.2% of those covered by unemployment insurance, from 2,153,000 the previous week, when the insured unemployment rate was 2.1%.  Counting all state and federal benefit programs, the number of people receiving unemployment benefits in the week ended Aug. 26 slipped to 1,978,000 from 1,992,800 the prior week.  These figures aren't seasonally adjusted.  To get more attention this Christmas, K mart Corp. won't just run commercials touting great values in toys, clothes and appliances.  The giant retailer is also spending big to produce two television shows, including a movie with Kenny Rogers and a special about Christmas entertaining with author Martha Stewart.  The two projects represent the first fruits of a division that King World Productions Inc. formed a year ago June to develop and produce advertiser-sponsored television shows.  King World, which earned its fame and fortune as a syndicator of shows produced by others, such as "Wheel of Fortune" and "Jeopardy," is becoming a producer itself.  Its first production effort was "Inside Edition," a tabloid-style syndicated show now in its second season.  King World's newest mission is to become a significant provider of advertiser-bankrolled television specials, an expanding market.  In addition to the K mart projects, King World is developing a television movie based on the book "Free Fall" about an airplane near-disaster, which Kraft General Foods, a unit of Philip Morris Cos., is planning to sponsor as an NBC movie-of-the-week.  "More and more advertisers are looking to create a big event, not just buy advertising spots," says Jeffrey Grant, president of the King World advertiser-programming division, who previously worked for production companies, including one devoted to advertiser-sponsored projects.  Wall Street analysts see King World's move as contributing to its efforts to become a much broader-based entertainment company.  But the competition is getting tougher.  King World will be up against dozens of independent producers in Hollywood and divisions of the big Hollywood studios, as well as the growing number of advertising agencies jumping into the business of developing programs for advertisers.  "King World will have a lot of competition, but you're as good as your ideas and nobody has a lock on that," says Douglas Ritter, corporate broadcast manager at AT&T, who has so far turned down the scripts King World has shown him.  For advertisers, the price tag for these programs is high.  Clients must spend, for example, upward of $2.5 million to produce a TV movie, and then another $1 million or so to buy the time period from the network.  But, says Mr. Grant, the advertiser gets to control the program surrounding its ads, and as the program's owner, may be able to recoup costs through syndication, with additional revenue generated by cassettes and foreign sales.  For its role, King World will generally receive "production fees, distribution fees and a piece of the back end {profit}," says Mr. Grant.  Michael Wellman, a K mart marketing executive, says the retailer isn't necessarily expecting profit, but hopes the two programs become "classics" that can be shown year after year, and perhaps eventually sold as videocassettes.  The Kenny Rogers movie, "Christmas in America: A Love Story," will air as a one-hour prime-time movie on NBC.  "At Home With Martha Stewart -- Christmas" will air three times on the Lifetime cable channel, which has a heavily female audience.  Both specials will be promoted in K mart stores and advertisements, where the season's theme will be "Christmas in America."  Also, Martha Stewart is a K mart consultant and her special will feature dishes and silverware she helped design for the retailer.  On June 4, after the Chinese government began to massacre students in Beijing's Tiananmen Square, ABC dispatched a television crew to Henry Kissinger's weekend home in Kent, Conn., for a live interview with the former secretary of state, who ABC says enjoyed a "unique relationship" with the network.  "We had first call on his services for breaking news events," explains Elise Adde, director of news information for ABC, which paid the 66-year-old Mr. Kissinger a fee (she won't say how much) for his services.  "So what should America do, Dr. Kissinger?" anchorman Peter Jennings asked.  Should the U.S. impose military sanctions, cut off military aid?  "I wouldn't do any sanctions," Mr. Kissinger replied, stressing the importance of the relationship between the U.S. and the Chinese regime.  A month later, Mr. Kissinger, who writes a newspaper column for the Los Angeles Times Syndicate, devoted one of his pieces to praising Chinese leader Deng Xiaoping for his economic reforms.  "No government in the world," he wrote, "would have tolerated having the main square of its capital occupied for eight weeks."  Most TV viewers and readers of his column probably don't know that Mr. Kissinger has unique business ties to the Deng regime -- connections that had him on the verge of earning hundreds of thousands of dollars from a limited partnership set up to engage in joint business dealings with a ministry of the Chinese government.  The arrangement is legal and, in itself, proper.  Nonetheless, it has elicited criticism.  ABC News was interested to learn from a reporter of Mr. Kissinger's extensive business ties to China.  "If I knew then what I know now, I would not have wanted him on that broadcast, plain and simple," Mr. Jennings said yesterday afternoon.  "And I think my management would have understood that perfectly." (On Wednesday, Mr. Kissinger was elected to the board of CBS Inc. and terminated his seven-year stint as a commentator for ABC.)  Additionally, Kissinger Associates, a company founded in 1982, does lucrative consulting work for several businesses seeking counsel on how to conduct themselves overseas.  Mr. Kissinger says that 8% of the revenue of Kissinger Associates, and of a subsidiary called Kent Associates, comes from clients wanting help or advice in dealing with China.  Mr. Kissinger won't divulge the revenue of the two companies, but it clearly is substantial.  Lawrence S. Eagleburger, currently deputy secretary of state, said in a public financial disclosure report that as an employee of Kissinger Associates last year he received $916,989 working for Mr. Kissinger's two companies, 28% of which was severance pay.  One client, American Express, has said it paid Mr. Kissinger and Kissinger Associates $445,000 last year, most of it for business advice.  Mr. Kissinger, who opened U.S. diplomatic ties to China in 1971 at the behest of President Nixon, has kept his business activities secret, going so far as to require his clients to declare in writing that they won't make public his consulting arrangements.  He is hardly the only former government official to engage in well-paying consulting work at the same time he expresses publicly his opinions on policy.  But Mr. Kissinger's stature and prominence make him uniquely influential.  And a number of China watchers in the U.S. think it's possible the views of Henry Kissinger the commentator are influenced by the deals of Henry Kissinger the businessman.  "If you're going to do scholarly comment and if you're doing client work, you shouldn't do both at the same time," says Roger A. Brooks, the director of Asian studies for the conservative Heritage Foundation in Washington.  Adds Harry Harding, a China expert at the Brookings Institution: "The question is whether his work introduces a bias into his analysis."  It's a controversy that Mr. Kissinger says he finds "painful" and "outrageous."  "What other former secretary of state has been submitted to this scrutiny?" he asks during an interview in which he has has agreed to answer certain questions about his China business connections.  "Whatever we did, we did the hard way," he says, asserting that he has built most of his commercial ties from relationships that were established long after he left government in 1977.  Mr. Kissinger's interests include a limited partnership called China Ventures.  It was established in Delaware to pool $75 million raised from U.S.investors for joint ventures with China International Trust & Investment Corp. (CITIC), the merchantbanking arm of the Chinese government.  The fund -- currently in abeyance because of the tumult in China -- would be directed, for a fee, by a general partner aided by a board of limited partners. (Mr.  Kissinger was designated chairman of the board and chief executive officer of the general partnership, with executive responsibility for managing its affairs.) It would invest in projects that "must enjoy the unquestioned support of the relevant PRC {People's Republic of China} authorities," according to an offering memorandum.  Another of Mr. Kissinger's personal ties is the American-China Society, a private organization formed in 1987 by Mr. Kissinger after Han Xu, then China's ambassador to the U.S., suggested to a number of people that China needed a "lobby" to focus its support in the U.S.  "I told him that was absurd, and we haven't done it," says Mr. Kissinger, who says the American-China Society was formed from a number of prominent people to "promote better relations between China and the U.S."  It is run out of Kissinger Associates' Park Avenue office in New York and has held luncheons and dinners for a number of visiting Chinese officials.  It's hard to tell at times where such cultural activities end and Mr. Kissinger's business interests begin.  Last July, for example, he led a delegation of U.S. businessmen to Beijing on behalf of the American-China Society.  Three of 13 executives on the trip were clients of Kissinger Associates.  In China, their host was Rong Yiren, the chairman of CITIC, the Chinese government agency then in the midst of negotiating the deal with China Ventures.  "We had no financial benefit from those meetings," says Mr. Kissinger, who says they were held at China's request to learn more about the problems of U.S. businessmen in the People's Republic.  Mr. Kissinger adds that his public comments about China represent his sense of what is best for the U.S. national interest.  And his conversations with Chinese officials, he says, are similarly motivated.  "The idea that I would take a public position in order to curry favor with the Chinese government for clients is outrageous."  Which is not to say that his efforts aren't helpful to commercial clients.  "He is a hired door opener," asserts Rence Lee, a Washington consultant and China expert who performs risk-analysis for corporations that do business abroad.  But entree at the top, Mr. Lee says, often fails to help U.S. companies in China because many still are thwarted at lower levels of the Chinese bureaucracy.  Mr. Kissinger's influence does appear to have helped out ITT Corp. According to James Gallagher, ITT's director of public relations, the company was unable to get permission for a board meeting in Beijing in June until it received an introduction through Kissinger Associates to Chen Ding, the New York representative of CITIC. CITIC thereupon agreed to play host to the ITT officials.  "The introduction they made wound up being important and beneficial to the trip," says Mr. Gallagher. (ITT no longer does business with Kissinger Associates, for reasons it won't discuss.)  "Door opening is not our principal activity," Mr. Kissinger says.  "It is in fact something we very rarely do, unless it's this ITT thing, which I don't consider door opening.  They could have done it themselves; it would have just been more cumbersome."  Mr. Kissinger's supporters say that, as a commentator, he approaches China much as he has approached other countries during his career as an analyst -- and as he did while Mr. Nixon's secretary of state.  "His sense is that you have to be restrained in intervening with the internal affairs of another country, and you also have to be aware of long-term geopolitical interests that may be at risk," says Winston Lord, a former Kissinger protege who was ambassador to China from 1985 to 1989.  As ambassador, Mr. Lord sat in on the meetings Mr. Kissinger and his entourage of visiting businessmen had with Chinese officials last year.  Mr. Lord says no specific business deals were discussed.  Mr. Lord adds that although he doesn't fully share Mr. Kissinger's sympathy for the Deng regime, he is convinced that Mr. Kissinger's views aren't influenced by money: "If he didn't have a cent of commercial interest in China, he would have taken the same position."  Mr. Kissinger hasn't played down the potential commercial value of his years of dealings in China.  As he states in the offering memorandum for the China Ventures partnership, "The General Partner believes that the international business, financial and political knowledge and experience of the General Partner give the Partnership a unique advantage in exploring such investment opportunities and assessing their strategic, financial and technological viability."  Bankrolled by a number of prominent U.S. businessmen, some of whom have also been advised by Mr. Kissinger vis-a-vis China, China Ventures was supposed to get under way on June 15 but did not.  And after weighing the unrest in China, the participants agreed in July to shelve the project.  "I would say, to put it mildly, that the thing is on hold," says William E. Simon, the former secretary of the Treasury, currently a board member of China Ventures.  "It {Tiananmen Square} changed the whole game."  The board includes a number of prominent business executives who have had dealings in China, such as Maurice R. Greenberg, president of American International Corp.; Anthony J.F. O'Reilly, president of H.J. Heinz Co.: James D. Robinson III, chief executive officer of American Express; and Donald R. Keough, president of Coca-Cola Co.  None would comment on Mr. Kissinger's China dealings.  As for Mr. Kissinger, he says his China contacts will continue but will be more subdued.  He says he has informed the Chinese government that he won't accept its invitation to celebrate the 40th anniversary of the People's Republic next month.  He had been scheduled to give a speech to 100 Western businessmen in Beijing.  Instead, he says, he will go there in November for private meetings with officials.  Sales of North American-made vehicles rose 2.4% in mid-July, despite a sharp slide by Chrysler Corp.'s cars.  The eight major U.S. manufacturers sold 221,231 cars and 136,300 trucks from July 11 to July 20, compared with 217,941 cars and 131,322 trucks in the year-earlier period.  The annual selling rate for cars was 7.8 million vehicles, according to a Commerce Department formula.  That's the third highest 10-day rate this year -- a result partly of heavy advertising and marketing campaigns by almost all manufacturers.  Chrysler was the loser among the Big Three with auto sales down 18.5% to 24,419.  A bright spot for the No. 3 auto maker was its truck sales -- including the top-selling minivan and the Jeep line, which rose 4.1% to 30,377.  For the third 10-day period in a row, Chrysler truck sales bested its car sales.  Chrysler, more than General Motors Corp. and Ford Motor Co., depends on small cars, which tend to slump more in economic downturns.  "Credit for marginal buyers is beginning to dry up," said Christopher Cedergren of J.D. Powers & Associates, a market research firm in Agoura Hills, Calif.  Mr. Cedergren noted that Chrysler is trying to switch sales to more profitable big cars.  For example, the auto maker this fall revives the Imperial name on a new luxury car intended to compete with the Cadillac and the Lincoln.  GM's truck sales rose 3.1% to 55,068 pickups, vans and sport-utility vehicles, more than offsetting a 1.4% decrease in car sales, which fell to 105,307.  The Buick and Pontiac divisions performed strongly while Cadillac, Oldsmobile and Chevrolet tumbled below year-ago levels.  One factor helping Buick has been a recent J. D. Power survey showing the LeSabre as the highest quality North American-built car.  Robert Cox, general manager at Hub Buick in Houston, said customers come in asking about the survey, which has helped boost sales this year about 30% above last year's levels.  Ford's results were similar to GM's, with truck sales up 4.2% to 47,324, while car sales slipped 2.4% to 67,374.  John Lance, a Cleveland Ford dealer, said he has boosted his advertising budget 50% from a year ago, which helped increase his car sales 26% so far this month.  "Last week was the third-strongest week we've had the whole year," he said, adding: "We're near grabbing every deal we can."  @ ---  @ RETAIL U.S. CAR AND LIGHT TRUCK SALES-a  @ 1989 1988 x-%  @ jul 11-20 jul 11-20 Chg.  @ GM total vehicles ...... 166,209 165,422 + 0.5  @ Domestic car ........... 105,307 106,791 - 1.4  @ Imported car ........... 5,514 5,197 + 6.1  @ Total car ............ 110,821 111,988 - 1.0  @ Domestic truck ......... 55,068 53,434 + 3.1  @ Imported truck ......... 320 0 d  @ Total truck .......... 55,388 53,434 + 3.7  @ FORD total vehicles .... 117,963 117,094 + 0.7  @ Domestic car ........... 67,374 69,039 - 2.4  @ Imported car ........... 3,265 2,629 +24.2  @ Total car ............ 70,639 71,668 - 1.4  @ Domestic truck ......... 47,324 45,426 + 4.2  @ CHRYSLER total veh ..... 58,461 63,647 - 8.1  @ Domestic car ........... 24,419 29,956 -18.5  @ Imported car ........... 2,528 2,978 -15.1  @ Total car ............ 26,947 32,934 -18.2  @ Domestic truck ......... 30,377 29,172 + 4.1  @ Imported truck ......... 1,137 1,541 -26.2  @ Total truck .......... 31,514 30,713 + 2.6  @ NISSAN total vehicles .. 6,432 6,666 - 3.5  @ Domestic car ........... 2,901 3,376 -14.1  @ Domestic truck ......... 3,531 3,290 + 7.3  @ HONDA domestic car ..... 13,175 6,344 +107.7  @ TOYOTA domestic car .... 5,729 1,745 +228.3  @ MAZDA domestic car ..... 1,334 690 +93.3  @ MITSUBISHI-c ........... 992 0 d  @ Total cars ........... 232,538 228,745 + 1.7  @ Domestic ............... 221,231 217,941 + 1.5  @ Imported ............... 11,307 10,804 + 4.7  @ Total trucks ......... 137,757 132,863 + 3.7  @ Domestic ............... 136,300 131,322 + 3.8  @ Imported ............... 1,457 1,541 - 5.5  @ Total domestic veh ..... 357,531 349,263 + 2.4  @ Total vehicles ....... 370,295 361,608 + 2.4  a-Totals include only vehicle sales reported in the period.  c-Domestic car  d-Percentage change is greater than 999%.  x-There were 9 selling days in the most recent period and 9 a year earlier.  Percentage differences based on daily sales rate rather than sales volume.  A federal judge formalized his order taking a bite out of Apple Computer Inc.'s copyright infringement case against rival computer giants Microsoft Corp. and Hewlett-Packard Co.  Judge William Schwarzer held that Microsoft and Hewlett were entitled to rely on an old license from Apple in developing the software that Apple has targeted in its lawsuit.  The judge ruled that more than 90% of the individual visual displays in the supposedly offending works were no longer an issue in the case.  The ruling yesterday tracked the judge's tentative decision of last week.  In its suit, Apple claims that Microsoft's Windows 2.03 operating system and Hewlett's New Wave program infringe copyrights on the Macintosh computer.  Now that the license issue has been resolved, "the court will therefore now proceed to determine whether the use of those unlicensed visual displays in combination with licensed visual displays infringes Apple's audiovisual copyrights," the judge said.  Apple said the ruling wouldn't significantly affect its chances of proving infringement.  Hewlett said:"The few remaining issues are minor, and we are confident they will be resolved quickly in our favor."  Microsoft said the ruling was favorable to its side.  The Nasdaq Composite Index of over-the-counter shares edged upward in mixed trading that was highlighted by a Microsoft tumble and an MCI Communications rebound.  The composite indicator rose 0.49 to 446.47 on 127.7 million shares.  Buyers and sellers played to a near-standoff, as 989 of the 4,403 OTC stocks that were traded lost ground, while 936 gained.  The Nasdaq 100 Index of large financial stocks was off 0.20 to 416.03, while the Nasdaq Financial Index gained 2.98 to 439.44.  MCI, buffeted lately by investor worries that the stock's price may not have much further to rise after gaining about 57% so far this year, recovered a bit, rising 1 3/8 to 37.  More than 3.6 million shares changed hands.  Meanwhile, Microsoft fell 3 1/4 to 52 on about 2.3 million shares after the software maker forecast future microprocessor unit growth over the next 12 months of about 10%, and told analysts to expect slower earnings growth from the company than previously projected, Dow Jones Professional Investor Report said.  The news wire said analysts consider the projection important because Microsoft provides basic software for all International Business Machines personal computers and for Compaq Computer machines, which dominate personal-computer sales.  IBM and Compaq on the Big Board, Apple Computer and several other personal computer-related stocks began falling sharply yesterday afternoon as word spread about the relatively soft market outlook from Microsoft.  On 1.9 million shares on the OTC market, Apple lost 1/2 to 38 3/4.  Ashton-Tate dropped 1/3/4 to 14 1/2 on volume of 968,500 shares.  The Torrance, Calif., computer software maker reported a second-quarter loss of $19.8 million on revenue of $59.5 million.  In the comparable year-earlier quarter, which ended July 31, 1988, Ashton-Tate earned $11.5 million, or 44 cents a share, on revenue of $71.9 million.  The company also announced that its president and chief operating officer, Luther J. Nussbaum, resigned over "differences in management philosophy."  Stratus Computer slid 5/8 to 29 1/2 despite reporting higher quarterly sales and earnings.  The Marlboro, Mass., concern had second-quarter revenue of $83.3 million, up 32% from $62.9 million, and earnings of almost $9 million, a gain of 34%.  The news wasn't all bad from other technology stocks, either.  Corporate Software jumped 1 1/4 to 12 in active trading after First Boston analyst Charles R. Wolf initiated coverage of the company with a "buy" recommendation, the Professional Investor Report said.  Corporate Software recently reported second-quarter earnings of 16 cents a share, compared with 15 cents a share, a year earlier.  Cellular communications issue LIN Broadcasting jumped 2 3/8 to 111 7/8 on 1.7 million shares.  In a letter to McCaw Cellular Communications, LIN reiterated its willingness to be acquired by McCaw for $127.50 a share.  McCaw Cellular rose 1 3/4 to 37.  Duty Free International, which was priced in its May initial offering at $20.50 a share, rose 1 1/4 to 36.  Shearson Lehman Hutton's retail-industry analyst, Stacy Ruchlamer, initiated coverage of the stock with a "buy" recommendation.  Duty Free sells name-brand liquor, tobacco, perfume and luxury gifts free of import, sales and excise taxes to travelers leaving the U.S.  ProGroup tumbled 4 to 12 1/2 after a letter of intent to buy the company was terminated.  The sports equipment and apparel concern said Australian Capital Equity had proposed acquiring it for $17.50 a share.  These are awkward times for the Dow Jones Industrial Average.  Despite its advances, the DJIA is trailing the market.  The Standard & Poor's 500 Index, in relative terms, is well ahead.  With the S&P and some other market indexes setting highs last week, some analysts are wondering anew whether a narrow index of 30 companies is accurately reflecting the market.  Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. strategist Abby Joseph Cohen muses that the industrial average, the most widely followed index, is a relic from "those days of inkwells and green eyeshades."  But a comparison of the Dow Jones industrials with the S&P sheds light on which stocks have been rising and why.  The DJIA consists mostly of such big industrial stocks as Bethlehem Steel Corp., Goodyear Tire & Rubber Co. and General Motors Corp.  Such companies are thought to be sensitive to recession, and a recession is thought to be here, or around the corner, or coming nearly any week, depending on who is asked.  The DJIA "reflects concern about the longevity of the economic cycle," Ms. Cohen says.  Investors, by contrast, "are more inclined to buy the consumer and financial companies which are fully reflected in the S&P," says Steven Einhorn, a strategist at Goldman, Sachs & Co.  From Whitefish, Montana, home of James Stack's InvesTech Research, comes another explanation.  "Merger mania."  S&P stocks are riding a wave of buy-outs, he notes.  On the other hand, the DJIA stocks are too big and of the wrong sort to benefit. (Though occasionally it happens; General Foods was acquired in 1985.)  John Connolly, Dean Witter's strategist, says the Dow Jones industrials/S&P divergence illustrates the central question facing market timers:  "The play here is between the late-cycle stocks and the early-cycle stocks," he says.  To wit: the Dow Jones Industrial Average is composed of recession-sensitive, "early-cycle" companies: the auto companies, steelmakers and others that expand and reward investors most in the beginning of economic cycles.  The S&P 500 is led by "late-cycle" stocks such as consumer goods, financial services and utilities.  As of yesterday, the S&P closed less than 1% beneath its record of 336.77 reached Aug. 25, 1987.  The DJIA, however, remains 5.1% behind its high-water mark of 2722.42, reached the same date.  The DJIA also has underperformed the broader Dow Jones Equity Index, which is composed of nearly 700 issues.  Though the S&P is the benchmark for many money managers, few individual investors know the S&P's numerical level.  In fact, many are unaware that the S&P surpassed its record -- and thus, that stocks can be said to have reached a high -- in intraday trading last week.  Historically, the two indexes haven't diverged much; over the past 12 months they have risen nearly the same, roughly 25%.  But there isn't any doubt that the DJIA is cheaper now.  It is trading at 11.1 times corporate earnings for the latest 12 months, compared with 13.5 times earnings for the S&P 500.  By contrast, the P-E ratio of the Dow Jones industrials was 22, and the P-E of the S&P was 23, at the peak of the giddy 1987 rally.  Analyst Barry Schrager says the pricier S&P shows that, contrary to current wisdom, speculation is a factor in the current rally.  The fever, he says, has taken hold in the S&P, where stocks have risen most.  "There is a story that people are paying for," he says.  The story goes like this: people won't stop eating or drinking when the economy slows down, so buy the consumer-oriented stocks in the S&P.  He points, as an example, to Quaker Oats Co. -- selling at a cool 21 times 12-month trailing earnings.  He also points to the speculative -- and lately, quite profitable -- practice of "throwing darts at takeover targets."  Oppenheimer & Co. analyst Norman Weinger disagrees.  "When there is speculative money -- people buying the overall market -- they buy the big, well-known Dow stocks," he says.  People who rely on fundamental analysis of stocks buy shares that figure in the broader indexes.  There is one other theory as to why the Dow Jones Industrial Average hasn't quite kept up.  It is known as the IBM theory.  Shares of International Business Machines Corp., afflicted by the maturing of IBM's core, mainframe computer business, have fallen 34% from Aug. 25, 1987.  That accounts for more than half the difference between the DJIA's level two years ago and now.  The Dow Jones industrials also lag far behind the Dow Jones Transportation Average.  The latter, thanks to airline-takeover speculation, is up about 14% from its August 1987 peak.  For those who hold that indexes predict stock prices, rather than merely reflect them, this is worrisome news.  Technical analysts -- call them the palm readers of Wall Street -- maintain that broad bull markets portend sweeter tomorrows than narrowly rising markets.  "The fact that the transportations have moved to record highs and the industrials haven't is a negative," says Richard Russell, the La Jolla, Calif., editor of Dow Theory Letters.  "You have to ask yourself why 30 of the best blue-chip companies can't equal their 1987 highs."  Dean Witter's Mr. Connolly, though, cautions against this approach.  On any given day, he says, an average may move because of the whims of "program traders trying to scalp the spread in Chicago and New York."  He says, "I find it hard to believe that all" relevant information about stocks "is captured on the squiggle of a chart."  ---  @ The Lagging Dow  @ AUGUST PCT.  @ 1987 PEAK 7/25/89 CHG.  @ DJIA 2722.42 2583.08 -5.12%  @ S&P 500 336.77 333.88 -0.86  @ Nasdaq 455.26 446.47 -1.93  @ Dow Jones Equity Index* 313.73 313.37 -0.11  @ *Performance has been calculated as if it were in existence in August 1987  A federal judge ruled that Saudi arms merchant Adnan Khashoggi can be released if he posts a $10 million bond and agrees to wear an electronic monitoring bracelet that will keep track of his location.  Mr. Khashoggi pleaded innocent last week to two counts of obstruction of justice and mail fraud.  He has been accused of helping Ferdinand and Imelda Marcos hide assets that the ousted Philippine president and his wife allegedly stole from the Philippines.  Mr. Khashoggi's attorney, Robert Morvillo, couldn't be reached for comment, but the lawyer's office said that Mr. Khashoggi didn't post bond yesterday after the ruling by Judge John Keenan.  The U.S. attorney's office in Manhattan had asked that Mr. Khashoggi be held without bond, on the ground that he is so wealthy that no bail condition could guarantee his presence for trial.  The U.S. attorney's office declined to say whether it would appeal the judge's decision.  Mr. Khashoggi was extradited to the U.S. from Switzerland last week on the counts of obstruction of justice and mail fraud.  As part of the extradition, the U.S. dropped the more serious charges of conspiracy and racketeering against Mr. Khashoggi.  Mail fraud and obstruction of justice carry maximum penalties of 10 years in prison and fines of as much as $500,000 for each count.  Mexico's new "debt reduction" deal with private banks falls well short of the kind of Third World relief dreamed of by theorists in the Elysee Palace or U.S. Senate -- or for that matter the U.S. Treasury.  Mexico is the easiest case among the deeply indebted nations, and even that took long, slogging negotiation and finely cut compromises.  There is no reason to suppose a magic formula has been found for world debt.  The $54 billion in bank debt involved in the Mexican agreement is only a fraction of the $290 billion owed banks by the 15 most highly indebted countries.  Moreover, taxpayers in the U.S. and elsewhere suffered a new exposure in the form of a $7 billion fund partly supplied by the IMF and World Bank that will guarantee interest on long-term bonds some banks will accept in exchange for short-term debt.  Finally, while being billed as a triumph for "debt reduction," in fact the arrangements do little or nothing to shrink Mexico's outstanding debt.  None of this, however, makes the Mexican deal unimportant.  In action here, indeed, the Brady Plan turns out to be a model for a new realism about Third World debt.  If similar deals can be struck with other indebted nations, it will be because their leaders are willing to display a degree of political courage equivalent to what Mexico's president, Carlos Salinas de Gortari, has demonstrated in commitments to Mexico's future.  While debt probably will not shrink, Mexico nonetheless will no longer be so hard pressed in scraping together enough foreign exchange to meet the payments on its external obligations.  Depending on how banks choose among the options available to them, Mexico's debt payments could decline by $1.5 billion to $2 billion next year.  Currently, those costs are some $14 billion a year, with about $5.5 billion of that represented by the bank debt under negotiation.  Mexico also will get some new lending, including a new U.S. bridge loan of some $2 billion to tide it over until the other credits are made available.  But while the cash and political symbolism of the bank deal provide a new window of opportunity, Mexico's success or failure in the years to come will hinge on its own actions.  In an "adjustment" agreement with the IMF this spring it pledged certain steps to put itself on a sounder economic footing.  Mercifully, the IMF did not demand a currency devaluation as it has elsewhere in the past with mostly disastrous results.  Quite the opposite.  Mexico will try to avoid a further peso devaluation.  That could be crucial.  A country that badly needs to attract foreign investment and win back capital that has fled abroad has a very heavy stake in establishing confidence in its national currency.  Confidence is not built with devaluations.  Yet this is not an easy equation, even with the aid of the bank deal.  Mexico, like many other debtor nations, is caught in a vicious circle.  Because of capital flight, it lacks internal capital to finance both development and its huge federal deficit.  The temptation, always, is simply to print more money.  But that generates inflation in an economy already inflation-prone because of low productivity.  Inflation, in turn, ultimately forces devaluation.  And devaluation, adding to distrust of the currency, discourages the return of flight capital and new peso investments.  President Salinas is fighting to hold down inflation and maintain the peso's value by keeping real interest rates extremely high.  But that, too, acts as a brake on development.  Nothing good can really happen until the government makes a serious effort to slash its own spending, which now is some 50% of gross domestic product, and thereby cut huge borrowing needs.  That requires a more serious effort to sell off or shut down deficit-ridden state industries and to reduce the size of the federal bureaucracy.  You need a tough psyche to break the rice bowls of so many state bureaucrats and favored elites all at once.  But Mr. Salinas will never get a better chance.  He drove a good bargain with the banks.  George Bush is taking a strong personal interest in Mexico's problems.  New winds are blowing in Mexican politics, reflected in the election of a free-market PAN governor in Baja California Norte this year.  If Mr. Salinas wants to impress upon potential investors that he is serious, he could do so quite easily with some dramatic privatization and budget-cutting moves.  That, not the bank deal, is the key to Mexico's future.  Similar measures offer the key to future improvement in the other highly indebted nations.  There is no single, global solution to the Third World debt problem.  Mexico and its bankers have demonstrated that problems can be ameliorated through negotiation and some help from the industrial world.  But they can be solved only by the debtor nation itself; that is what Mexico now has a unique chance to demonstrate to the world.  TAKEOVER EXPENSE must be capitalized, the Tax Court tells a Unilever unit.  The long-awaited decision says National Starch can't deduct as current business costs $2.9 million spent on investment-banking, legal and other expenses of its friendly 1978 takeover by Unilever.  In fact, Judge Clapp rejected all specific IRS arguments that the costs must be capitalized as incident to a recapitalization, merger or reorganization.  Instead, says James Power of Deloitte Haskins & Sells, CPAs, the judge adopted a far broader and harsher view that the ownership change led to long-term benefits that are capital in nature.  Surprisingly, notes Donald Alexander, a Washington lawyer, IRS private ruling 8927005 recently let an unidentified company deduct costs of defeating a hostile takeover attempt and negotiating acquisition by a "white knight."  The facts differ from those of the National Starch case, but he finds the private ruling questionable.  Clapp's opinion, if upheld, will upset many tax practitioners' understanding of deductible costs, says Robert Willens of Shearson Lehman Hutton.  THESE HORSE AUCTIONS were held for the breed, not the bread.  The tax-exempt California Thoroughbred Breeders Association conducts horse auctions as a means to improve breeding.  Since 1984, it has used a separate taxable unit.  Earlier, it had a 50-50 venture with a commercial auctioneer and treated its share of the profits as exempt.  But the IRS sought to tax the 1978-83 share as income unrelated to the group's exempt aim of promoting a form of agriculture.  Now Tax Court Judge Clapp gives the group free rein.  The 1978-83 auctions were held whether or not they made money and included even mediocre stock, the judge found.  Sellers and buyers said they got a broad and orderly market that commercial firms didn't provide.  The association ended the joint venture because the auctioneer wanted to concentrate on making money.  The group's conduct showed that its aim was improving the breed, not profits, Clapp held.  He rebuffed the IRS and ruled the income exempt.  IF A TAX LEVY levitates, does gravy gravitate?  The IRS doesn't know, any more than it knows how much it gains from seizing delinquents' assets, such as bank accounts and wages, held by others.  Now the General Accounting Office offers the first estimates: In 883,281 cases sent to IRS collectors in 1986, such seizures, or levies, produced $696 million by mid-1988.  The GAO studied how successfully the phone-based automated collection system used levies against delinquents that ignored repeated notices.  The study sampled 665 personal and 1,041 business cases and omitted field agents' levies.  The IRS used levies in 51% of the cases, averaging 1.9 levies in each on various accounts.  About 47% of the levies were "productive," raising as much as $31,000 and an average of $1,533.  Levies were used more often for individuals than for businesses, but collections per taxpayer were higher for businesses.  The GAO couldn't determine why levies weren't more productive.  It may be simply that the delinquents were unemployed or had depleted their bank accounts.  A NEW CUSTOM greets globe-trotters returning to Illinois homes with purchases on which they haven't paid a 5% sales tax: The state checks U.S. Customs records at Chicago's O'Hare airport and bills residents for a 5% "use" tax.  Some 260 notices have produced $15,000 in tax on such items as silverware, a fur coat and a harpsichord.  PACKAGE-DESIGN COSTS must be capitalized, not deducted as incurred, the IRS said in an unpopular March ruling.  Now the IRS is reconsidering transition rules issued then and has extended the deadline for filing Form 3115 to adopt capitalization accounting.  Announcement 89-98 has details.  VOLUNTEERS ARE SOUGHT for Tax Counseling for the Elderly, an IRS program.  For information about participating during the 1990 filing season, non-profit agencies and organizations may call Roy Johnson of the IRS in Washington at 202-566-4904.  THE STATE THEY LEFT behind may tax their pensions, some retirees find.  Nevada, Florida, Texas and the seven other states without broad-base personal-income taxes look like retirement havens.  But people who move from California, New Jersey and some other states are shocked to learn that their former home states may tax their pensions wherever they go -- on the grounds that the income should be taxed where it was earned.  New Jersey exempts the first $10,000 of a couple's pensions.  California has no pension exemption.  Groups such as the National Association of Retired Federal Employees and the American Association of Retired Persons are just starting to take note.  But at the urging of Resist, a group of retired Californians in Nevada, Rep. Vucanovich (R., Nev.) entered a bill to bar any state from taxing pensions of nonresidents; she has 17 co-sponsors from 13 states.  In the Senate, Nevada Democrats Bryan and Reid have a similar bill with co-sponsor Graham (D., Fla.).  States imposing a tax require pension payers to file reports on payments to individual retirees.  BRIEFS: Airline pilot Charles J. Collins of Boulder, Colo., had a credibility problem in Tax Court that cost him all his claims.  Example: He listed his occupation as "heavy equipment operator." . . .  A Senate Finance subcommittee plans a hearing Friday on a bill to ease tax liabilities for farmers renegotiating troubled loans.  Motorola Inc. said it intends to develop a wristwatch with Timex Corp. that would double as a telephone pager.  The announcement means Motorola is moving into a corner of high-tech development that has been almost the private preserve of AT&E Corp., a tiny San Francisco company that for years has been working on a pager watch with Hattori Seiko Co., Japan's watch giant.  Besides allowing callers to track down pager owners and telling time, pager watches will be able to flash short, written messages on the watch face.  Motorola hailed its pager watch as "revolutionary" and "the world's first."  But it said Timex would introduce a pager watch for distribution through traditional retail channels only "within two years."  AT&E has said its pager watch will hit the market early next year.  AT&E scoffed at Motorola's pager watch technology.  Motorola's pager watch apparently is based on a miniaturized version of standard pager technology; it will be hooked into existing pager relay networks.  AT&E said its pager watch is based on patented technology that enables wearers to be paged from anywhere in the world.  It said Motorola's pager watch, like current beepers, only will have a range of about 20 miles.  Motorola, which made its announcement in a news release, didn't return phone calls seeking comment.  The S&L mess has alerted some Congressmen to the fact that the government also implicitly stands behind $700 billion in obligations issued by such government-sponsored enterprises as the mortgage-lending Fannie Mae.  The House S&L bill contains a provision requiring an annual Treasury Department study of the financial risk these off-budget entities represent.  One senior HUD official says Fannie Mae's shaky portfolio makes it "the country's biggest insolvent savings and loan."  Fannie Mae claims it is sound and welcomes outside scrutiny.  Still, it has quietly recruited Senator Alan Cranston to kill any Treasury study of its operations.  Wall Street securities giants Salomon Inc. and Shearson Lehman Hutton Holdings Inc., as expected, posted big earnings gains in the second quarter, buoyed by declining interest rates and financial market rallies.  Salomon, helped by a huge gain in bond trading for its own account, rebounded from a first-quarter loss as second-quarter net income more than tripled.  Shearson said second-quarter net rose 43%, aided by a sharp increase in commissions and trading profits.  It was the company's first quarterly gain after three quarters of losses.  Despite these gains, analysts remained cautious about the securities industry and aren't convinced the second-quarter boom will continue over the next half.  Many brokerage activities, such as underwriting, trading and sales, remain depressed compared with previous years.  "With both companies, you're seeing big swings from huge losses to huge profits," said John E. Keefe, a financial services analyst at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  "It shows the securities business was, is and shall be a cyclical business.  Just about every activity these companies engage in is plugged into interest rates.  When they're rising, as they were in the first quarter, they lose money.  When they're falling, they're making money."  In the second quarter, interest rates fell about a percentage point on short-term money-market securities and as much as 1.5 percentage points on five-year Treasury notes.  The second quarter was even stronger than analysts had expected, aided by the recent pickup in investor activity.  Shearson, which is 62%-owned by American Express Co., said net income rose to $55 million, or 54 cents a share, from $39 million, or 37 cents a share.  The year-earlier results include $69 millon of pretax expenses associated with the acquisition of E.F. Hutton.  Despite a 25% drop in investment banking revenue, total revenue rose 31% to $3.29 billion from $2.51 billion.  Commission revenue rose 38% to a record $533 million, while market making and principal transaction revenue rose 26% to $363 million.  Investment banking revenue fell to $295 million.  Shearson said its effective tax rate in the quarter was almost 41%, compared with 17% a year ago, reflecting a decrease in investment income subject to preferential tax treatment and increased tax expense on foreign earnings.  Salomon said second-quarter net income climbed to a record $253 million, or $1.89 a share, from $80 million, or 49 cents a share.  Revenue rose 63% to $2.33 billion from $1.43 billion.  In the first quarter, Salomon had a loss of $28 million on revenue of $1.54 billion.  The firm blamed the loss on adverse trading conditions in its securities and non-oil commodities businesses.  The firm is now "comfortable that its strategy is working and it is encouraged by its broadly based earnings gains," said Robert Baker, a Salomon spokesman.  Salomon said its securities, energy and commodities businesses earned $390 million, $102 million and $10 million, respectively, before taxes in the second quarter.  "Obviously, Salomon hit the jackpot in proprietary trading," said Drexel's Mr. Keefe.  "Its earnings amounted to $7 a share at annual rate, which is outstanding.  But Salomon is in the bond business and it's shown us the amount of money that can be won and lost are huge.  I think it's unlikely {the second-quarter performance} can be sustained."  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Hertz Corp. -- $100 million of 9 1/8% senior subordinated notes due Aug. 1, 1996, priced at 99.867 to yield 9.15%.  The issue, priced 125 basis points above the Treasury's seven-year note, is noncallable for life.  Rated Baa-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and triple-B-minus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  @ MUNICIPALS  Minnesota -- $225 million of general obligation state bonds (state various-purpose bonds and state sports and health club tax bonds), due 1990-2009, through a Goldman, Sachs & Co. group.  The bonds, rated double-A by Moody's and double-A-plus by S&P, were priced to yield from 5.85% in 1991 to 6.75% in 2007-2009.  Members of the account will be participating in an auction for the approximately $11 million of bonds due 1990, according to an official with the lead underwriter.  Massachusetts Health and Educational Facilities Authority -- $83.1 million of revenue bonds (Beth Israel Hospital Issue), Series E, due 1990-2003, 2009 and 2014, tentatively priced by a Goldman Sachs group to yield from 5.90% in 1990 to 7.184% in 2014.  Serial bonds were tentatively priced to yield to 7% in 2002 and 2003.  There are $24,545,000 of 7% term bonds due in 2009, priced at 98 1/2 to yield 7.14%, and $29.6 million of 7% term bonds due 2014, priced at 97 7/8 to yield 7.184%.  The bonds are rated double-A by Moody's and single-A-plus by S&P, according to the lead underwriter.  Cleveland -- $58.7 million of various purpose general obligation bonds, Series 1989, due 1990-2004 and 2009, tentatively priced by a Prudential-Bache Capital Funding group to yield from 5.90% in 1990 to about 6.97% in 2009.  Serial bonds were priced to yield to 6.90% in 2003 and 2004.  There are $12,425,000 of 6 7/8% term bonds due 2009, tentatively priced at 99.  The bonds are all insured and rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $307.5 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 18 classes by Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp.  For classes on which details are available, yields range from 8.91% to 10.45%.  This issue could feature the most classes in the six-year history of the derivative securities market.  The offering, Series 75, is backed by Freddie Mac 9 1/2% securities.  @ EUROBONDS  Abbey National Treasury Services (U.K. parent) -- 150 million Canadian dollars of 10 1/4% bonds due Aug. 23, 1994, priced at 101 5/8 to yield 10.32% less full fees, via Merrill Lynch International Corp. Guaranteed by Abbey National PLC. Fees 1 7/8.  Daicel Chemical Industries Ltd. (Japan) -- $300 million of bonds due Aug. 10, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/4% coupon at par via Nomura International Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Aug. 24, 1989, through July 27, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 1.  Parco Co. (Japan) -- $120 million of bonds due Aug. 10, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 3/8% coupon at par via Daiwa Europe Ltd. Guaranteed by Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Aug. 21, 1989, through Aug. 3, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed July 28.  Fujikura International Management (Netherlands) B.V. (Japanese parent) -- 10 billion yen of 6% bonds due Aug. 10, 1995, priced at 101 3/4 to yield 6.03% less full fees, via Nomura International Ltd. Guaranteed by Fujikura Ltd. Fees 1 7/8.  Denki Kagaku Kogyo K.K. (Japan) -- 200 million Swiss francs of notes due Aug. 17, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 2 3/4% coupon at par, via Banque Paribas Suisse.  If there was anything to be learned from the performances given recently at the Metropolitan Opera House by Leningrad's Kirov Ballet, it was simply that Soviet dance no longer has anything important to impart.  Thirty years ago, the situation was different.  Moscow's Bolshoi Ballet, the first such troupe to arrive in the U.S., was a revelation -- not because of its choreography, which hardly transcended the action in a silent movie epic, but because of its dance style, which was more heroic in scale and fluid in silhouette than anything hitherto seen in this country.  As amended in due course by the arrival of the courtlier Kirov Ballet, the Soviet approach challenged many of our assumptions, especially with respect to companies that, like American Ballet Theatre, lacked a coherent artistic policy and thus a purposeful classical method.  Under the impact of Soviet ballet, our dancers began to search for a more expressive style, using their arms with greater freedom, and performing in general with new-found force, as though it were less important for them to embody an ideal than to win a victory over human limitations.  For a while, the adoption of a Soviet style promised to enlarge decisively the emotional confines of American dance.  Nothing of the sort happened, for the simple reason that the technique that had created the Soviet style was too limited to sustain the diverse demands of Western choreography.  More influential, because more versatile, was the limpid and spontaneous method evolved by Balanchine at New York City Ballet, which has since become the dominant influence all over the country.  Unlike the Soviet interpretation of classicism, it does not depend for its effectiveness on its narrative and emotional connotations.  Its effectiveness comes from its energy, and its energy from the rhythmic impulsion of music, by which it is activated and sustained.  Unlike Soviet classicism, moreover, it continues to evolve, to suggest further possibilities and refinements.  In its New York season, the Kirov offered a kind of dancing that, by comparison with what we see at New York City Ballet, was sluggish and over-careful.  The dancers, though often talented, looked self-protective.  Their deliberate approach to classicism doesn't, in fact, increase their power of expressivity, it hobbles it.  Of this, as it happens, they seem aware.  In Oleg Vinogradov's tendentious one-act piece, "Battleship 'Potemkin': A Ballet-Allegory," and in the group of short works collected under the ominous title of "Contemporary Choreography," they discard not merely classicism but dance itself.  Instead of the latter, the various choreographers make use of an up-to-date version of Stalinist social realism, in which content takes precedence over form.  One of the strangest experiences of the entire dance season was to see in this series of short ballets -- or excerpts from long ballets, such as Mr. Vinogradov's "The Knight in a Tiger's Skin" -- that none of the choreographers showed the slightest interest in space or rhythmic impulsion.  In Dmitri Briantsev's "The Road," set to music by Elton John, a woman crouched on the floor and attempted -- at times imploringly, at others vengefully -- to block the path of a bare-chested man, who, understandably enough, reacted to her with indifference.  In the same choreographer's "The Conception," to music by one Piart, a couple tussled inconclusively on the floor until the final fadeout.  In Leonid Lebedev's "Aria From 'The Fifth Bachianas Brasileiras,'" set to music by Villa-Lobos, two women and a man, all dressed in shiny lilac leotards, stood in a spotlight in the middle of the stage and grappled with one another.  By the end, the women seemed to have found consolation in each other's arms.  In "Tiger's Skin," a ballet based on a Georgian epic poem, five dancers huddled together and moved their arms in a vaguely Oriental manner.  In Boris Eifman's "Adagio," a cluster of people wearing rags swayed for a while to the sticky quasi-baroque music of that name attributed somewhat dubiously to Albinoni, before leaving the spotlight to a solitary man, who tore off his tattered cloak and emoted in tight bathing trunks before rejoining the group at the back of the stage.  Even worse, because longer, was Mr. Vinogradov's "Potemkin," in which movie-style music by Alexander Tchaikovsky -- no relation to the talented composer -- accompanied the persecution of a shipload of infinitely noble sailors by a handful of monstrously cruel officers, not to mention the mocking of those same worthy tars by a bunch of arrogant aristocrats, who for some reason were visiting the battleship.  A mixture of mass movement and mimetic vignettes, the work kept going limp.  Lacking confidence in the effectiveness of his crudely propagandistic theme, Mr. Vinogradov introduced a skeletal figure of death, who, despite the encumbrance of a scythe, gamely danced a series of pas de deux with the more pathetic victims of naval oppression.  At the end, the surviving sailors ran up the aisle to the exit at the back of the auditorium, shouting joyously as they went, while the curtain came down on a stage filled with what looked like red doves.  Perhaps the piece is best seen as a tribute to Maurice Bejart, the czar of kitsch.  Only on the last day of the Met season, when both in the afternoon and the evening the Kirov presented Balanchine's "Scotch Symphony" and "Theme and Variations," was it possible to see how Soviet ballet might be saved.  Not by dancing Balanchine, or trying to become New York City Ballet, but by rethinking the premises of its technique in terms of a larger, nobler and more impersonal style.  Though there seem to be no choreographers in the U.S.S.R. capable of giving the company the kind of creative impetus it needs, it could take its first step toward regeneration by rethinking its approach to the 19th-century classics.  A new production of "The Sleeping Beauty" that honored the connection between Tchaikovsky's music and Petipa's choreography would help a great deal.  So would the acquisition of works like "Scotch Symphony" and "Theme and Variations," both of which were danced in a promising manner, especially by the corps de ballet.  In both cases, the American "regisseurs" who mounted the pieces -- Suzanne Farrell and Francia Russell, respectively -- seem to have insisted that the conductor and not the performers set the tempos.  The results were startling.  Hard pressed though the dancers often appeared, they looked, for the first time all season, alive.  The following issues were filed recently with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Chesapeake and Potomac Telephone Co. of Virginia, a unit of Bell Atlantic Corp., shelf offering of up to $100 million of debt securities on terms to be set at the time of sale.  Pinnacle Financial Services Inc., initial offering of 170,000 common shares, via Rooney & Co.  Digital audio tape players are soon expected to go on sale world-wide, as consumer electronics leaders from Japan, Europe, and the U.S. have agreed on rules limiting the technology.  Mass sales of so-called DAT players, considered superior to cassette decks, have been delayed because of concerns that unrestricted use of the product could hurt competing technologies and could spur massive copyright violations.  But industry sources here said yesterday that concern was taken care of in a tentative agreement, signed by all the major players last month, that would restrict the DAT machines' copying ability.  "This agreement, which recognizes the basic interests of consumers and the mutual interdependence of these industries, is a major breakthrough for creators, consumers and industry," a preliminary draft of an announcement says.  The memorandum of understanding, to be unveiled at a news conference Friday, is signed by 12 Japanese producers, three European companies and two recording trade groups.  It also says the Electronics Industry Association of the U.S. has endorsed the terms.  The Washington-based association and the Recording Industry Association of America both declined to comment.  The agreement still requires approval by each country's government.  The sources said they didn't know when DAT machines would go on sale under the new agreement.  But companies will certainly move as quickly as possible.  Many producers were ready to introduce the machines in 1986, but held back because of the controversy.  Machines are available in Japan and Europe but sales have been limited, in part because of uncertainty stemming from the dispute.  DAT machines essentially aren't sold in the U.S.  The DAT is to tapes what the CD, which came out in 1982, is to records.  It plays and records music digitally, which allows sound to be reproduced more accurately than conventional decks.  But while the CD can only play prerecorded digital sounds, the DAT can also record music digitally, and has thus triggered concerns of widescale piracy.  Many analysts say the DAT machines will eventually make current tape recorders obsolete, and that it will even cut into CD sales.  Under the new system, the DAT players will be able to make one copy from a CD, a prerecorded DAT cassette, or a digital broadcast, the draft of the announcement said.  The system, however, would prevent subsequent recordings from those recordings.  The system would allow up to two generations of DAT copies from traditional sources -- such as records and cassettes -- but would prevent owners from making a third copy.  Current DAT machines don't have the capability to make any copies from CD players.  Every major Japanese electronics company, including Sony Corp., Hitachi Ltd., and Matsushita Electric Industrial Co.'s Panasonic unit, has developed a DAT player.  In addition, several European companies, led by N.V. Philips of the Netherlands, have made such machines.  No major American company has developed a DAT player.  Jefferson Bankshares Inc. said it agreed to acquire Chesapeake Bank Corp. in a stock transaction valued at $20.2 million.  The acquisition has received federal approval and will close Sept. 1.  Under terms, Chesapeake holders will receive 1.1333 shares of Jefferson's common for each of Chesapeake's 751,739 shares outstanding as of June 30.  Chesapeake's two affiliated banks, Chesapeake Bank & Trust and American Bank, will be renamed Jefferson National Bank/Tidewater, which will become a separate entity under the Jefferson Bankshares holding company.  Cray Research Inc. reported surprisingly weak results for the second quarter and indicated it expects significantly lower earnings for the year.  Moreover, the world's leading maker of supercomputers said it was abandoning its hopes for much, if any, revenue increase this year.  The news, which came after the market closed, is a major disappointment.  Cray had been predicting 10% revenue growth, and continued strong earnings.  The company's bearish forecast also is likely to raise questions among investors about the pending spinoff of founder Seymour Cray's computer design unit as a separate company, something Cray now says is several months off.  Cray said it earned $4.4 million, or 15 cents a share, in the latest quarter on revenue of $128.2 million.  That's a 77% decline from last year's earnings of $19.1 million, or 61 cents a share, on revenue of $134.3 million.  For the first half, per-share earnings totaled 20 cents, and Cray President Marcello Gumucio said, "Meeting last year's second-half, earnings-per-share performance of $3.53 will be a challenge."  Thus, the company indicated it doubts it can come close to last year's $4.99 per-share figure, even though it has nearly three million fewer shares outstanding.  In the first half of 1988 Cray earned $45.5 million, or $1.46 a share.  "I'm shocked," said Patricia Laupheimer, an analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  "We didn't realize to what extent pressures were harming Cray's outlook."  She predicted that earnings "estimates are going to come down pretty sharply.  Potentially, I could see $3.25 this year and $4.25 next year.  I could see the stock breaking 40," she added, "because it sounds from the tone of the company's comments that the problems on the demand side aren't just going to blow away in 1990."  Needham & Co. analyst Gary Smaby said indications of sluggish government orders for large systems could be bad news for the spinoff, since Mr. Cray's company would be relying primarily on that business.  "This will further confuse matters," Mr. Smaby said.  The company released its results after the market closed.  But the stock is likely to come under severe pressure today, since Cray's new estimate for the year is below the worst-case projections of most Wall Street analysts, some of whom were forecasting $5 per-share earnings on the year.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Cray fell 75 cents to $44.125.  Cray said it was being squeezed by competitors as well as customer preferences for leasing rather than buying systems, which can cost $20 million or more.  Accordingly, Mr. Gumucio said that "our earnings will continue to be under pressure."  And he said it was unlikely that cost-control efforts would offset rising expenses, which include about $10 million a quarter to develop the Cray-3 supercomputer that Mr. Cray will take with him.  "We expect to be far more profitable in the second half of the year than the first half," Mr. Gumucio said.  But he said the earnings outlook is "very dependent on making our revenue objective."  Cray cited competitive and economic conditions for delays in obtaining contracts for systems to be installed this year.  "We still expect to obtain all of these orders," Mr. Gumucio said, but he noted "a shift in the product mix, to more used systems and less new systems."  During the second quarter, Cray installed 10 supercomputer systems -- half of which were used -- with a total value of $150 million.  It said its order backlog at the quarter's end was about $340 million, compared with $280 million at the end of the first quarter.  Meanwhile, Cray's one-time Minneapolis supercomputer rival, Control Data Corp., reported a huge loss for the quarter, reflecting its withdrawal from that business.  The $497.3 million loss, which was expected, also covered charges related to reducing its Computer Products operations, which primarily makes mainframes, the pending sale of its Plato training and education unit and a 300-member reduction in the company's corporate staff.  Unlike many Western nations that are rich in art, the U.S. has no laws limiting the export of cultural treasures.  Italy, France and Great Britain all have laws to screen major works of art before export, and American buyers have often chafed at restrictions that delayed or undid their purchases.  However, in anticipation of the May 31 sale of the Stillman Pontormo at Christie's, many Americans began to think for the first time that such restrictions might be a good idea here.  Although privately owned, this great Italian mannerist portrait had been on loan to American museums for decades.  The successful bid by the J. Paul Getty Museum brought a collective sigh of relief and blunted the edge of those worries: The painting will stay in America.  But the problem will not go away.  Discussions are just beginning to get serious about whether American painting, sculpture, decorative arts and the art of native Americans should be kept at home.  On June 20, at the convention of the American Association of Museums in New Orleans, the committee on museology unanimously passed a resolution drafted by Paul N. Perrot, director of the Virginia Museum of Fine Arts, recommending that the museum community study the question and present recommendations to the relevant governmental authorities.  Without restrictions on the export of cultural property, market forces play freely, not only for Rembrandts and van Goghs, but also for home-grown American art, artifacts and documents that speak to our history.  ---  Although the U.S. has no strategy for keeping American heritage at home, our policy of helping other countries protect their cultural heritage is much stronger.  In 1970, when archaeological plunder was endemic in the jungles of Central America as well as the mountains of Asia Minor and Etruria, Unesco adopted its "Convention on the Means of Prohibiting the Illicit Import, Export and Transfer of Ownership of Cultural Property."  More than 60 nations are now signatories, but the U.S. is the only one among them that could be described as an art importer.  France, Britain, Germany, Switzerland and Japan are not parties to the convention.  The U.S. Senate ratified the convention in 1972, but it was only in 1983 that Congress enacted enabling legislation, passing a bill that was a compromise between archaeological and commercial interests.  In accord with that law, the Cultural Property Implementation Act of 1983, the U.S. recently banned the importation of a type of Bolivian textile essential to religious and social ceremonies of the Aymara culture.  The textiles in question are made from alpaca and vicuna wool in Coroma, a town high in the Bolivian Andes, and have been woven in the same manner since before the advent of the Inca or the Spaniard.  The textiles have a silken luster, and enough had found their way to the U.S. for the Smithsonian to organize a traveling exhibition, "Aymara Weavings: Ceremonial Textiles of Colonial and 19th-Century Bolivia," in 1983.  This in spite of export restrictions enacted by Bolivia in 1961.  Bolivia submitted a formal request to President Reagan to ban the import of these textiles, saying that the U.S. has been a major market for the weavings.  Bolivia estimated that about half its sacred textiles had been smuggled out of Bolivia and found their way into American collections.  The request was reviewed, following the provisions of the legislation, by the Cultural Property Advisory Committee, a group of 11 archaeologists, dealers, private citizens and representatives of the museum community.  The committee found that the loss created an emergency situation for the Aymara culture and recommended a five-year ban that went into effect on March 14, 1989.  Customs is the agency charged with enforcing the ban.  This is the second ban recommended by the committee; the first, in 1987, was to restrict the importation of pre-Hispanic material from El Salvador's Cara Sucia region.  ---  With the arrest in Miami of a former commissioner in the Buenos Aires police department, the stage was set for the recovery of old master paintings stolen in 1983 and 1987 from two museums in Rosario, Argentina.  Juan Carlos Longo, 53 years old, and his common-law wife, Hilda Arias Longo, 40, were arrested after selling one of the stolen pictures, "Doves and Hens," attributed to Francisco Goya, to an undercover FBI agent.  Special Agent James D. Keith of the Miami FBI called IFAR to confirm that this picture and others that Mr. Longo said were available were in fact stolen.  After the sting and the arrests, the couple was extradited to Argentina, where Interpol continued the investigation and, in short order, arrested six other individuals and recovered a second work, "Portrait of Philip II," by Alonso Sanchez Coello, a Spanish 16th-century court painter.  ---  Rodin's "Mask of a Man With a Broken Nose" has been safely returned to the Rodin Museum in Philadelphia, where it was stolen at gunpoint last November.  An anonymous tip led the authorities to 24-year-old Stephen Shih, an unemployed truck driver, described by neighbors as "really nice," but also as "eccentric, peculiar and odd."  Mr. Shih was charged with robbery, theft, receiving stolen goods, unlawful restraint and weapons offenses.  If convicted, he faces a possible 40 years in prison.  The police had to find the bronze without his help, however, and searches in and around the garage over which he lived were frustrating.  Eventually, they found "Mask" well-wrapped and hidden in the basement of an apartment building owned by the accused's mother.  Police and museum officials were jubilant at the happy ending, a rarity in art-theft annals, where the recovery rate hovers around 12%.  ---  Ms. Lowenthal is executive director of the International Foundation for Art Research (IFAR).  Clarcor Inc. said its board authorized the repurchase of as many as two million common shares in the open market and privately negotiated deals as part of a restructuring.  The maker of packaging and filtration products also said it is restructuring its operations to focus on its filtration and precision products groups.  As a result, the company said the best interests of the company and its shareholders will be served through the sale of its packaging products and services groups.  The two groups had combined sales of $71.6 million in 1988.  Clarcor, which has 7.9 million shares outstanding, said the share repurchase program is expected to begin immediately and will be financed through current cash reserves, existing credit lines and new credit arrangements.  The advertising claims of many makers of plaque-fighting products are misleading, Consumer Reports magazine says in its August issue.  In an article, the consumer watchdog magazine examined several products, including Pfizer Inc.'s Plax, a pre-brushing rinse.  Pfizer says in its ads that Plax removes 300% more plaque, a film that forms on teeth, than brushing alone does.  The magazine cited a study that showed no difference in results between a group using Plax and a control group.  Of the Pfizer ad, the magazine said it's "one claim you can brush off."  Pfizer snapped off a strongly worded statement, calling the article "irresponsible" and saying that the magazine didn't do its own testing and ignored "a large body of scientific evidence supporting the effectiveness of Plax."  The study on which the magazine relied "was one not conducted according to accepted clinical practice," Pfizer said.  Industry estimates of Plax sales exceed $100 million for 1988, "and I would think market share shows continued strong growth through the first half of 1989," said Truman Susman, president of Pfizer's oral-care division.  Pfizer is a pharmaceuticals and health-care-products concern here.  Consumer Reports is published by Consumers Union of U.S. Inc., Mount Vernon, N.Y.  The magazine said the "most important weapon in the fight against plaque remains thorough, conscientious brushing and flossing at least once a day."  Cooper Tire & Rubber Co. said it has held talks to acquire the assets of Fidelity Tire Manufacturing Co. from Condere Corp.  Condere, of Hamden, Conn., purchased Fidelity Tire, the former Natchez Tire Manufacturing operation, from Armtek Corp. in 1987.  Troubled Pantera's Corp. said a shareholder sued it in federal court in Dallas charging that the Pizza Inn owner violated securities laws.  The company said that it believes the lawsuit is without merit and that it will contest it.  Pantera's recently said that it doesn't believe it will be able to make an August debt payment and that it is trying to restructure its debt.  George Lamborn, 53 years old, was named chairman of the futures subsidiary of this commodity trading and brokerage company.  Mr. Lamborn had been senior vice president and director of the commodity division of Thomson McKinnon Securities Inc., a unit of Thomson McKinnon Inc. Walter Goldschmidt retired from the Balfour post last Dec. 31.  Three major media companies posted higher earnings in the second quarter: Net income at Times Mirror Co. was up 7.6%; Knight-Ridder Inc.'s profit nearly tripled, and the Washington Post Co.'s earnings rose 22%.  Times Mirror's net rose to $85 million, or 66 cents a share, on higher revenue, but the company wasn't optimistic about the rest of the year.  "Until economic conditions in our markets brighten, we are not likely to see improvement in operating results," Chairman Robert F. Erburu said.  Earnings for the latest quarter included a pretax gain of $23.1 million, or 11 cents a share after tax, from the sales of timberlands.  In the 1988 second quarter, Times Mirror had net of $79 million, or 62 cents a share, which included a pretax gain on the sales of timberlands of $7.9 million, or four cents a share after tax, and a six-cent increase in earnings from a change in accounting for inventory at a unit.  Although second-quarter revenue rose 5.3% to $861.3 million from $818.1 million, that apparently disappointed the concern.  "Revenue growth slowed in the second quarter, due largely to the weakness in Northeast regional economies," Mr. Erburu said.  "While companywide cost containment programs and newsprint price reductions helped to offset this slower revenue growth, margins were impacted."  Advertising volume declines at Newsday, its newspaper based in Long Island, N.Y., and a softening New York economy "seriously impacted" the performance of the newspaper group, despite strong results for the Los Angeles Times, Times Mirror said.  Revenue from newspaper publishing rose 2.5% for the quarter to $524.7 million, but operating profit slipped to $88.3 million from $88.6 million.  The Los Angeles-based firm's cable-TV operations posted an 18% rise in revenue and a 58% increase in operating profit.  Knight-Ridder's second-quarter net nearly tripled following the sale of several of the company's media properties.  The Miami-based media concern said earnings jumped to $126.9 million, or $2.44 cents a share, from $44.9 million, or 78 cents a share, a year earlier.  The latest results included a pretax gain of $49.1 million, or 58 cents a share after tax, from the sale of the Pasadena (Calif.) Star-News.  The paper was sold for about $55 million.  The sale made earnings from continuing operations $70.1 million, or $1.35 a share, compared with $42 million, or 73 cents a share, a year earlier.  The company also earned $1.09 a share from broadcast operations and posted a gain of $55.5 million from the sale of five of its eight TV stations.  The company said it expects to complete the sale of the remaining three stations "in the coming months."  Proceeds from the sales are being used to pay down the company's debt.  Despite the extraordinary items, operating revenue for the quarter increased 12% to $578.7 million from $515.9 million a year ago, while operating profit jumped 22.5% to $90.3 million from $73.7 million.  Robert F. Singleton, chief financial officer, said results were "slightly better than we expected" in the wake of softened newsprint prices and improved cost controls.  Mr. Singleton said retail advertising strengthened, while classified advertising growth slowed in most markets.  "The outlook for operations in the second half is encouraging despite some signals of uncertainty in the economy," he said.  "We expect 1989 to be our 14th consecutive year of earnings-per-share growth."  In Washington, the Washington Post Co. said its 22% increase in net was fueled by "strong operating results across the board."  The company doesn't break out each segment's profit.  Second-quarter net climbed to $60.5 million, or $4.72 a share, from $49.3 million, or $3.83 a share, in the year-earlier period.  Revenue rose 8.1% to $374.5 million from $346.2 million.  At the flagship Washington Post newspaper, ad volume grew 5%.  The full newspaper division posted 9% higher revenue.  Revenue rose 4% at the company's TV stations, 13% in cable TV, 6% at Newsweek magazine, and 16% at other businesses.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Times Mirror shares rose 75 cents to $42.50 and Knight-Ridder rose $2.25 to $53.75.  Washington Post shares rose $1 to $288.75 in American Stock Exchange composite trading.  "John F. Kennedy was the first American President in this century who did not even pretend to have a 'program' except the conquest of power," argues Peter F. Drucker.  Without knowing it, Kennedy heralded a new age, described in "The New Realities: In Government and Politics/In Economics and Business/In Society and World View" (Harper & Row, 276 pages, $19.95).  The age was born when people lost faith in what Mr. Drucker calls "salvation by society."  Romantic solutions, such as revolutions and New Deals, lost their appeal.  Instead, Mr. Drucker argues, we live in an age of pluralism.  Rather than crafting grand national policies, governments address each issue separately.  Central cities are growing less important as work gets done in the suburbs and in the home.  Business power no longer resides in the boardrooms of multinationals, but with autonomous "knowledge workers."  Human thought is no less pluralistic, according to Mr. Drucker.  Overarching economic theories such as Keynesianism no longer explain a disjointed economy.  Instead, economists must make do with specialized theorems that apply to one problem, say the savings rate, but do not presume to fit into a coherent world view.  Moral crusades no longer have any power.  Instead, cool pragmatism drives policy.  Charisma, Mr. Drucker continues, is a remnant of the past era: "The constructive achievements of this century were the work of completely uncharismatic people."  What Mr. Drucker is talking about is the end of ideology.  Successful political figures of our era -- Francois Mitterrand, Margaret Thatcher, Bettino Craxi -- all have one thing in common, he says: "All achieved their political successes through anti-ideological, interest bloc integration.  None of them paid the slightest attention to the ideological manifestoes of their own parties."  Further, "none of the new political tasks is ideological . . . few if any could be dealt with as adversarial issues; few, if any could be tackled as traditional political issues."  Well, it seems that this case has to be made every five years, so perhaps we are lucky that this time it is made by somebody as smart as Peter Drucker.  Albert Camus wrote an end-of-ideology essay in 1946.  Raymond Aron wrote one in 1955.  Daniel Bell wrote his famous book "The End of Ideology" in 1960.  The Public Interest magazine was founded with a flurry of such pronouncements in 1965, and even Michael Dukakis's campaign stands as a manifesto for "competence, not ideology."  Many of the mid-century end-of-ideology pieces, were based, as Mr. Drucker's is, on the death of salvation by society. (People are perpetually declaring communism intellectually dead, but somehow it always is around for further eulogizing.)  But, the Public Interest pragmatists were different, and they make the most interesting comparison with Mr. Drucker.  They too saw John F. Kennedy as heralding the new non-ideological age.  But it was their self-confidence that led them to declare ideology dead.  They believed that social problems could be solved if experts looked at them analytically, skeptically, without ideological blinders.  The last 28 years have been humbling.  Fittingly, Mr. Drucker bases his end-of-ideology prescription on humility.  He argues that not only can we not solve grand problems, we cannot even understand them.  He cites the fruits of chaos theory, which shows social phenomena to be affected by things we cannot even measure.  The apt metaphor is called the Butterfly Effect: Butterflies flapping their wings in the Amazon affect the weather in Chicago.  Mr. Drucker goes wrong in presuming that ideology adheres only to large salvation-by-society issues, and that once you get down to specifics, pragmatism reigns.  On the contrary, the experience of the past 28 years in economic and social policy has shown that in their smallest units problems are ideological.  The social programs of the 1960s failed because they didn't appreciate the importance of individual morality, the dangers of promiscuity or malaise.  The humbled Public Interest intellectuals now stress character and behavior in their writings.  This has made them more ideological over the years, not less.  Irving Kristol has become more conservative; Daniel Patrick Moynihan more liberal.  Other recent issues such as the Pledge of Allegiance and the burning of the flag are highly ideological.  Many consider them trivial yahoo concerns.  But they are part of an important populist effort to reverse the ideological trend of the 1960s, which celebrated self-expression, and to restore an earlier ideology, which celebrated self-control.  Mr. Drucker is one of the finest essayists alive.  Individual sections of this book are superb.  But on the whole it is wide of the mark.  Michael Dukakis lost.  George Bush and the Pledge of Allegiance won.  Today's realities are as ideological as ever.  ---  Mr. Brooks is a Journal editorial writer.  The House Ways and Means Committee, bowing to intense pressure from the elderly, voted to make the catastrophic-illness insurance program voluntary and to reduce the surtax that pays for it.  The tax-writing panel voted 19-17 to halve the rate of the surtax, which was the target of the elderly's ire, and to permit older people to avoid the levy by dropping the catastrophic-illness program, so long as they also agree to drop Part B of Medicare, which provides doctor and outpatient care.  Critics of the compromise said that for most elderly, the new voluntary system wouldn't really provide much of a choice.  Using private insurers to replace the Part B benefits, which are chosen by the vast majority of Medicare recipients, would be enormously costly, the critics said.  Nevertheless, other versions of the compromise are being considered by Senate tax writers, and have been encouraged by officials of the Bush administration.  Meanwhile, the debate over a possible cut in the capital-gains tax intensified.  House leaders hinted that a vote on the issue mightn't come until September, and White House officials said that if a Ways and Means vote on the capital-gains taxcut proposal isn't scheduled soon, they might begin stepping up public pressure for one.  Mr. Bush's aides said the time "isn't quite there" for Mr. Bush to begin a public campaign for the cut.  But they suggested that in a few days, House and Senate Republicans may become more vocal in pushing for a vote, and that Mr. Bush might speak out after that.  The White House officials also indicated, though, that Mr. Bush will be flexible in considering variations on his proposal for a straight cut in the capital-gains tax rate.  For instance, they said, the White House would be willing to consider a plan for indexing capital gains to discount the effect of inflation, a plan that continues to be floated by House Speaker Thomas Foley (D., Wash.) and other leaders.  Congressional Democrats continued a public-relations campaign against cutting the capital-gains tax.  New Jersey Sen. Bill Bradley and Missouri Rep. Richard Gephardt held a joint press conference to lambaste the notion as an attack on the Tax Reform Act of 1986, which they helped author.  They also released new data from the Congressional Joint Committee on Taxation showing that 80% of the benefit from the rate reduction in the leading plan, introduced by Rep. Edgar Jenkins (D., Ga.), would go to taxpayers who earn more than $100,000 a year.  The Jenkins plan would use an exclusion to reduce the top tax rate on capital gains to 19.6% on assets held more than one year from the current rate of as much as 33%.  This reduction would be for two years.  At least some of the six dissident Democrats who favor the capital-gains tax cut in the committee appeared open to compromise.  "I think there will be an attempt to accommodate everyone's position. . . ," said Rep. Michael Andrews (D., Texas).  "The six of us are open to positive suggestion."  The changes in the catastrophic-illness program would be paid for by increasing the Part B premium and reducing the value of the drug-benefit portion of the catastrophic-illness program.  In addition, the program would use an accounting gimmick to raise revenue.  It would delay payment of Medicare claims by five days at the end of fiscal 1990, six days at the end of fiscal 1991, three days at the end of fiscal 1992 and one day at the end of fiscal 1993.  The plan, which was advanced by Reps.  Fortney Stark (D., Calif.) and Willis Gradison (R., Ohio), would halve the rate of the surtax.  This year, for example, some elderly people would have to pay 15% of their tax liability; under the proposal, their rate would be 7.5%.  The maximum payment per recipient would remain the same.  It is $800 per person this year, and would rise in succeeding years.  Hans W. Becherer, president and chief operating officer of Deere & Co., was elected a director of this pharmaceuticals company, increasing the board to 16 members.  Stratus Computer Inc. reported a 34% rise in second-quarter net income, to $9 million, or 43 cents a share, from $6.7 million, or 33 cents a share, a year ago.  Sales jumped 32% to $83.3 million from $62.9 million.  Stratus, Marlboro, Mass., makes fault-tolerant computers for on-line transaction processing, a fast-growing niche market.  William E. Foster, chairman and chief executive officer, said the company enjoyed continued strong domestic demand through the quarter.  In national over-the-counter trading, Stratus closed at $29.50 a share, down 62.5 cents.  MCN Corp. said its Saginaw Bay Pipeline Co. unit signed two major natural-gas producers to use its proposed 126-mile Michigan pipeline.  The utility company said Marathon Oil Co. and Wolverine Gas & Oil Co. signed 15-year commitments with the pipeline, joining Shell Western Exploration & Production Inc., a unit of Royal Dutch/Shell Group.  MCN officials said the three producers make up a majority of the discovered East Central Basin reserves in Michigan.  The staff of the Michigan Public Service Commission is considering two other proposals to build a Michigan pipeline and is expected to make a recommendation on the proposals by mid-August.  Mazda Motor Corp. said it expects to purchase a total of $100 million of North American-made automotive parts in the year through next March to export to Japan.  This would represent a 60% increase from the year-earlier period.  The Japanese auto maker said such purchases in the five months ended last March 31 nearly doubled to $33 million.  The parts include headlamps, anti-skid brake parts and front windshields that Mazda uses in vehicles it sells in Japan and exports to other countries, as well as in new products that it will introduce in the next two years.  Linear Technology Corp. said its board approved a plan to allow the company periodically to repurchase as many as one million common shares on the open market.  The maker of integrated circuits said the amount and timing of any stock repurchases will depend on market conditions.  Employers' compensation costs rose slightly in the second quarter, continuing a trend that has kept labor costs and consumer prices moving in tandem, the Labor Department reported.  The quarterly report showed a 1.1% increase in employer compensation for the three months ended in June.  The first-quarter increase was only slightly higher at 1.2%, and for the year ended in June 1989, compensation costs rose 4.8%.  Employer costs for wages and salaries during the second quarter rose only 0.8%, with a 4.3% total increase for the year ended June.  "Certainly we are continuing to see the same trend," said Kathleen Cooper, chief economist at Security Pacific National Bank in Los Angeles.  Employer costs have been creeping up over the past few months, but the increases show no signs of exerting strong pressure for increased prices.  "The growth rate is running right in line with inflation," said Brian Wesbury, vice president of Stotler Economics in Chicago.  Consequently, increases in wages aren't leading to improved standards of living, nor are they forcing up the prices of consumer products.  Compensation for workers in private industry increased 1.2% from the first quarter, and 4.5% for the year ended in June.  Wages and salaries for this group rose 1% during the second quarter, and 4.1% for the year, according to the report.  Private industry employers also spent slightly more for benefits in the second quarter.  There was a 1.6% increase for the three-month period ended in June.  For the year ended in June, the increase was 5.6%.  State and government employer compensation cost showed a 0.6% increase for the second quarter.  For the year ended in June, the average rate of increase was 5.8%.  Employment costs for wages and salaries were up 0.5% from the first quarter, and 5% for the year ended in June.  Employer compensation figures reflect all changes in wages and salaries and employer costs for employee benefits.  The figures aren't adjusted for seasonal variations.  In the terribly trendy world of magazine publishing, Vanity Fair has become a must read.  Chock-full of glossy pictures and glossier prose, it's hip.  It's stylish.  It's on everybody's lips -- or at least it will be until the next hot magazine comes along.  There's just one thing it hasn't been: profitable.  But in an interview, S.I. Newhouse Jr., chairman of Vanity Fair's publisher, Conde Nast, said the magazine will show a profit for this year, the first time it has done so since it was brought back to life after 47 dormant years in 1983.  G. Douglas Johnston, the magazine's publisher, says the September issue closed with a record 208 ad pages, up from 159 last September.  Its previous high had been 168 pages in its debut March 1983 issue.  In all, not a bad comeback for a magazine that early on went through so many editors and monthly personality changes that, at its low point in July 1984, it pulled in scarcely 14 ad pages.  But Vanity Fair is still a tough sell as far as a lot of advertisers are concerned.  Image-conscious advertisers such as high-priced cosmetics, fashion designers and retailers are regulars in its pages, but other, more pragmatic advertisers haven't been swayed.  The problem is numbers: Vanity Fair charges more to reach each reader than any other upscale publication except for "W."  According to figures provided by the magazine, Vanity Fair charges $62.48 to reach each thousand readers, while Esquire charges $39.45 and the New York Times magazine just $21.72.  The difference in price is largely the cost of being chic, the price of an image.  Vanity Fair sells that image hard to advertisers, but it does its best not to remind them of just how much it costs.  "We don't do presentations {for advertisers} using numbers.  We would lose every time," says Mr. Johnston.  "We're asking traditional media analysts to forget everything they've learned about cost-per-thousand, about reach and frequency.  We've had to change the way Madison Avenue thinks."  Mr. Johnston concedes that wooing numbers-crunching potential advertisers and asking them to think about image instead of money "is a slow process."  But he says the magazine is making progress.  In 1987, cosmetics, fashion and retail accounted for 58% of Vanity Fair's ad revenue; in 1988, those three image-driven categories, while all growing, accounted for only 52% of ad revenue as other categories grew stronger.  Still, "I have a long way to go with travel, automotive, electronics, liquor and tobacco," Mr. Johnston says.  The magazine is single-minded in its pursuit of those and other advertisers.  Tina Brown, the magazine's high profile editor in chief, used to accompany salesmen on their trips to see potential advertisers.  She says she no longer does so, but she "understands, which is rare for an editor, that this is a commercial operation," Mr. Johnston says.  Indeed, the magazine is sometimes accused of being too close to its advertisers; critics often point out its breathless cover stories about Calvin and Kelly Klein, or about Ralph and Ricky Lauren, both major advertisers.  Ms. Brown, however, shrugs off that criticism as "jealousy" on the part of other media because "we do get a lot of ads."  And as far as the Klein and Lauren stories go, she says: "They've also been the subject of nice cover stories {elsewhere}.  I have to put a celebrity on the cover. . . and sometimes I get tired of movie stars."  In any case, a more taxing challenge for both Ms. Brown and Mr. Johnston now is how to make sure their magazine doesn't become terminally trendy.  "There are more magazines for rich people than rich people could ever read," says Martin Walker of Periodical Studies Service, a consulting firm.  "The downside is as more and more magazines start chasing the same audience, you start splitting the pie too many ways."  While Vanity Fair is in a stronger position than its upstart rivals, it is trying not to stand still.  Ms. Brown says she is looking for more "substantial" pieces for the magazine, sometimes giving writers several months on a single story, "where in the early days it would be rapid fire."  And she says she continues to sign more writers and photographers to keep the magazine's writing and ideas fresh.  For the first six months of this year, Vanity Fair's circulation grew 13.5% to about 686,000, and Mr. Johnston says he plans to raise its rate base next year to 600,000 from 500,000.  Ms. Brown is determined to go further.  "My goal is to get to one million in sales," she says, "while not in any way lessening the quality."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   PACKAGE FOR BBDO: Federal Express Corp. awarded its estimated $25 million international ad account to BBDO, New York, a unit of Omnicom Group.  The decision doesn't affect Federal Express's relationship with Fallon McElligott, the Minneapolis agency that services its domestic account.  A spokesman for Federal Express, based in Memphis, Tenn., said it named a separate agency to handle the international account in anticipation of expanding business following its acquisition of Tiger International Inc., a large airfreight courier.  ACCOUNT ACTIVITY: American Association of Advertising Agencies, in its annual study monitoring ad account movement, reported sharp declines in both numbers of accounts and account billings that left member agencies and moved to inhouse advertiser ad departments last year.  The net gain in movement of accounts to member ad agencies from in-house in 1988 was $83.8 million, the highest ever recorded and almost double the 1987 figure of $42.1 million.  Ramada Inc., Phoenix, Ariz., said hearings by gambling regulatory agencies to review its restructuring plans will be a month later than expected, delaying completion of its restructuring until mid-September.  Ramada is engaged in a major transition from a lodging, restaurant and gambling concern to just a casino company.  Last April, Ramada agreed to sell its hotel business to New World Development Co. of Hong Kong and Prime Motor Inns Inc. of Fairfield, N.J., for $540 million.  In May, it sold its Marie Callender Pie Shops Inc. restaurants to a company formed by Hayes Financial Corp. and Hampton Ventures Inc. of New York for $54.3 million and the assumption of $30 million in debt.  The company said the hearings before various Nevada and New Jersey casino and gambling regulatory agencies couldn't be scheduled until mid-August.  In addition to approval by the regulatory agencies, Ramada shareholders will vote on the proposed restructuring at the company's July 31 annual meeting.  Three officers at Johnson & Johnson sold portions of their company stock in June.  Clark H. Johnson, chief financial officer of the big New Brunswick, N.J., health-care products concern, sold 6,000 shares, or one-third of his holding, June 7 and 9, according to Securities and Exchange Commission filings.  He received a total of about $316,000, or an average price of $52.80 a share.  That's slightly above yesterday's closing price of $49.875.  The issue fell 25 cents in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Robert Z. Gussin, vice president, science and technology, sold 8,100 shares between June 16 and June 26 for about $408,000, or an average price of $50.42 a share.  That was about half his stock, taking into account indirect holdings.  A smaller sale was made by Francis H. Barker, vice president, public affairs.  Mr. Barker parted with 2,482 shares June 7 at $52.125 each, or a total of $129,374.  He still has 10,332 shares remaining.  A company spokesman said Mr. Johnson sold to fund a divorce settlement, and that Mr. Barker sold to pay taxes and pay off loans connected with an earlier exercise of stock options.  The spokesman said, "None of these transactions has any implication for the company's performance or prospects."  Both Mr. Johnson and Mr. Barker declined to be interviewed.  Mr. Gussin was traveling and couldn't be reached.  Analysts were generally unfazed by the selling.  Mimi Willard, a health care analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., called Johnson & Johnson "a classic high-quality, sleep-at-night growth stock."  She is excited about EPO, an anti-anemia compound the company has developed in a joint venture with Amgen Inc.  She also thinks Sucralose, a heat-stable artificial sweetener, will be approved by regulators in 1990 or 1991.  And she is impressed with sales of Johnson & Johnson's new disposable contact lenses, which she said are running at a pace of $80 million annually.  Robert Hanss, a health care analyst with Edward D. Jones & Co. in St. Louis, said Johnson & Johnson is "one of our strongest buys, especially for the long term."  But he thinks the stock price may have hit a short-term plateau, mainly because of the rising dollar.  The company gets almost half its revenue overseas.  ---  TASTY SLICE: The chairman of Uno Restaurant Corp. recently sold 500,000 Uno shares for $6.5 million, and he said most of the proceeds will go "to enhance the lifestyle of my two children."  The shares were sold as part of a one million-share secondary offering at $13 a share.  Half of those shares belonged to Uno's chairman and chief executive officer, Aaron Spencer.  He earmarked proceeds from 50,000 shares for a charitable foundation, to be used for construction of a hospital building.  The remaining 450,000 shares were sold by a partnership of Mr. Spencer and his two children.  He said the proceeds might be used to purchase a Boston apartment complex for the children.  "They're good kids," said Mr. Spencer, "and you can't take it with you."  Insulated from the raging pizza-industry wars by a relatively upscale image and wide menu, West Roxbury, Mass.-based Uno has prospered recently.  Per-share earnings in the third quarter ended July 2 doubled to 14 cents from a year earlier.  Mr. Spencer still directly or indirectly owns some 3.6 million shares, or 58% of Uno, valued at about $48.6 million based on yesterday's closing price of $13.50.  The stock fell 12.5 cents in American Stock Exchange composite trading.  ---  MIXED MESSAGE: Medco Research Inc. is a small Los Angeles pharmaceutical research firm that went public in 1984 and has never reported an operating profit.  Several of its products are designed for use in the diagnosis or treatment of heart disease.  Last month, its medical director, William C. Govier, purchased 37,000 shares for $310,000, or an average price of $8.38 a share.  "It looks to me as if the things we're managing to develop are going to be very useful products," he said.  "I'm placing my own bets that the products we have moving in the system will make money for the company."  Mr. Govier said he expects that Medco Research "will clearly have some income" in 1990, "probably enough to put the company in the black."  But other insiders took some money out in June.  President Manfred Mosk sold 100,000 shares at an average of $8 each, for proceeds of $800,000.  Mr. Mosk still owns 494,096 shares directly and has options to buy more.  "What I did with the money is my own personal business," Mr. Mosk said.  He noted that it was his first sale since the company went public and added, "It seems to me that I'm rather the oddball" in not having sold some of his stock earlier.  The company's chairman and chief counsel also sold some shares, representing small fractions of their holdings.  ---  THE ARM OF AGNELLI: The investment arm of Agnelli Group, the big Italian concern that also controls Fiat S.p.A., made a big purchase of Firemans Fund Corp. stock.  Because of the way SEC disclosure requirements work, the transaction is shown as an indirect purchase by Gianluigi Gabetti, who is an official of the Italian company and a director of Fireman's Fund.  He couldn't be reached for comment.  Agnelli last year provided a cash infusion of $300 million to Fireman's Fund by buying convertible preferred stock.  As a result, it holds an 18% voting stake in the insurance company.  A federal jury convicted James and David Taggart, two of the four men indicted in December in the PTL scandal, of tax evasion.  The brothers, former aides to PTL Club founder James Bakker, are the first to be convicted since a federal grand jury closed its investigation of the television ministry in January, according to a spokesman for the U.S. attorney's office here.  The official wouldn't say if the trials for Mr. Bakker and former top associate Richard Dortch, who were also indicted by the grand jury, have been set.  The Taggarts, after five hours of jury deliberation, were convicted of all charges of conspiracy and tax evasion for the years 1984 through 1987.  They were accused of evading more than $525,000 in income taxes after spending more than $1 million in PTL money on personal luxuries.  The Taggarts maintained that Mr. Bakker gave them authority to take large cash advances and to use PTL credit cards.  Sentencing is tentatively set for Aug. 25.  Each man could receive as much as 25 years in prison and be fined more than $1 million.  Attorneys for the Taggarts couldn't be reached for comment.  Wickes Cos., the principal unit of WCI Holdings Corp., said in Santa Monica, Calif., that it agreed to sell its Elco Corp. unit for about $250 million to Kyocera Corp., Kyoto, Japan.  Elco is based in Laguna Hills, Calif., and produces electrical connectors and connection systems in the U.S., West Germany and Japan.  The company has about 1,200 employees.  Kyocera makes ceramic products, electronic equipment and optical instruments.  The sale, when completed, will bring to about $950 million the total proceeds from the sale of Wickes assets.  Blackstone Capital Partners Limited Partnership, a New York investment firm, and Wasserstein Perella Partners Limited Partnership, a merger and takeover company that control Wickes, have been selling company operations since taking control of Wickes last November in a two-step, $538.9 million transaction.  ITT Corp. said second-quarter profit rose 7%, although profit from its Hartford insurance unit continued to decline.  ITT said net income rose to $244 million, or $1.70 a share, from $228 million, or $1.59 a share.  Sales and other revenue rose to $5.2 billion from $5 billion, despite a reduction in premiums from insurance operations.  The company had 140.9 million shares outstanding in the latest quarter, down from 142.9 million a year ago.  ITT said operating profit at the Hartford unit "declined substantially" during the first half, "reflecting the industrywide downturn.  This industry situation is expected to continue during the remainder of 1989."  A spokesman said the Hartford unit's operating profit was better in the second quarter than in the first.  Rand V. Araskog, chairman and chief executive officer, said "we are pleased with our results for the first half of this year considering the downturn at The Hartford, our major profit contributor.  While the general downturn in the domestic property and casualty industry was anticipated, the severe losses suffered becasue of storms in May and June were not and added to the downturn."  The latest quarter's results included a gain of $18 million from sale of ITT's European headquarters and a $28 million writedown for the Hartford unit's investment in the Thompson McKinnon Inc. securities firm.  In the first half, the ITT Financial unit had higher operating results and income at Communication and Information Services was significantly higher, while Sheraton Corp. hotel operations were down slightly as a result of foreign-exchange losses in South America.  Temple Holdings Ltd., a company jointly owned by Stena Holdings AG and Tiphook PLC, said it extended its $777 million tender offer for Sea Containers Ltd.  The $50-a-share offer for all shares of Sea Containers, a Hamilton, Bermuda, equipment-leasing and shipping concern, will now expire Aug. 9.  It had been scheduled to expire July 28.  Meanwhile, Sea Containers, seeking to remain independent, is considering plans to launch a leveraged buy-out or restructuring that could bring shareholders $70 to $100 a share.  The company has said it may announce its move this week.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Sea Containers shares yesterday rose 50 cents to close at $67.125.  Washington Bancorp. said its board rebuffed a proposal to acquire the bank holding company for about $127 million in cash and preferred stock.  The proposal was made by a newly formed company led by Robert B. Washington Jr., a Washington Bancorp. director who controls 5.4% of the company's common.  He is also a former co-managing partner of a now defunct Washington law firm that is one of the company's debtors.  Under the proposal, Mr. Washington's company planned to offer $18 and one share of a new issue of preferred stock for each of the company's seven million fully diluted common shares that Mr. Washington doesn't already own.  Washington Bancorp. said its board concluded at a special meeting that Mr. Washington's proposal and other unspecified "indications of interest" to purchase the company were "highly conditional."  It said the board found the overtures "an unacceptable basis for negotiations."  Tokyo stock prices ended sharply higher, with the Nikkei average of 225 issues closing at a record.  London share prices cast aside early weakness to register robust gains after a confident opening on Wall Street.  In Tokyo, the Nikkei was up 445.57 points at 34538.90, breaking the record of 34266.75 set May 31.  The Nikkei reached a high for the day of 34542.51.  Monday the index gained 193.90 points.  Bullish market sentiment was helped by an inflow of money from investment trusts.  One trader estimated that one billion yen from trust funds will flow into the equities market this week.  Volume in the first section was estimated at one billion shares, the highest since 1.6 billion shares were traded June 1.  Monday's volume was 601.4 million shares.  Advancing issues outnumbered decliners 671 to 276, and 140 issues were unchanged.  In early trading in Tokyo Wednesday, the Nikkei index rose another 193.31 points to 34732.21.  With Sunday's upper house election out of the way, brokers are trying to whip up enthusiasm to make up for lost ground during the last two months of low volume trading.  "Domestic institutions need to generate some market performance before they close their books in September," the midpoint in the current fiscal year, said Christopher Chew, an analyst at James Capel & Co.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section also reached a record of 2584.07 points.  The index, which gained 13.55 points Monday, was up 37.46 points.  The second section index, which gained 1.58 points Monday, rose 4.54 points to 3033.33.  Volume on the second section was estimated at 13 million shares, up from 9.2 million shares Monday.  The market opened higher on index-buying by large institutional investors to set up investment-linked trust funds, brokers said.  Buying was concentrated in financial issues.  Financial stocks are heavily weighted in the stock price index and are a substantial part of the Nikkei index, so heavy buying in the sector gives an extra push to both indexes.  The Industrial Bank of Japan closed up 190 yen ($1.33) at 4,990 yen ($35.02), Fuji Bank was up 40 yen at 3,630, and Nomura Securities gained 90 yen to 3,330.  The rally in financial stocks spread to a broad section of the market in the afternoon, with conspicuous losses limited to export-related electrical issues, brokers said.  The dollar has been stronger of late, which usually signals buying interest in these issues.  But some traders said the dollar's movement this week is sending investors mixed signals about the direction of the foreign exchange market.  TDK fell 80 yen to 6,000, Sharp was down 40 yen at 1,440, and Pioneer shed 120 yen to 3,790.  Housing-related issues remained firm.  Although they lost some momentum, brokers consider them a sustainable theme for the market.  Meanwhile, in London, market sentiment was also enhanced by the renewal of takeover speculation across a range of stocks, which coaxed a number of wary players back into the market.  "The market decided to bounce back today," a trader said.  "There was no real foundation for its sharp (23.9 point) fall Monday, and prices were starting to look cheap."  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended 10.3 points higher at 2269.4, just a shade below the day's high of 2269.7.  At its lowest, the index slipped to 2250, a fall of 9.1 points.  Dealers said market makers trimmed several prices during the early afternoon to spur buying interest.  At the close, the narrower Financial Times 30-share index was up 13.1 points at 1886.  Turnover registered 461.7 million shares, up from 390.4 million Monday.  Dealers said the market's sturdy performance was particularly impressive ahead of today's U.K. balance of payments figures for June.  The trade figures are forecast to show a widening of the current account deficit to between #1.5 billion ($2.43 billion) and #1.7 billion ($2.76 billion) in June from #1.3 billion in May.  ICI rallied 14 pence (23 cents) to #12.67 ($20.60), as the market anticipated the company's interim earnings report, due tomorrow.  Other pharmaceutical and chemical stocks were buoyed by ICI's rally.  Beecham jumped 7 to 633, while Glaxo advanced 5 to #14.03.  The market's favorite speculative stocks also rose sharply.  Rank Organisation rose 11 to 949 pence, Pearson jumped 7 to 747 pence, and Reckitt & Colman climbed 9 to #11.99.  "All these stocks are perennial takeover candidates," a trader said.  National Westminster rose 2 pence to 310, following news that the company's chairman and three other directors have resigned in the wake of a government report highly critical of the bank's handling of the 1987 Blue Arrow PLC rights issue.  "It shows the bank is trying to clear the air," a dealer said.  In Frankfurt, share prices recovered after a slight dip on profit-taking Monday.  Traders said heavy-duty buying of shares in Schering, a pharmaceuticals and chemicals company, spurred the rally and pulled up other blue chips.  Stock prices in Stockholm rose to yet another record in quiet trading as a few single orders turned around the declining market at midday.  Elsewhere, share prices closed lower in Zurich and Milan and mixed in Paris, Brussels and Amsterdam.  South African gold stocks closed mixed.  In Hong Kong, share prices rose smartly in thin trading as a brightening view of the local property market helped snap a three-session losing streak.  Shares in Singapore climbed in heavy trading.  Retail and institutional buying helped push prices up across the board, with blue chips benefiting particularly from the interest of overseas fund managers.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed higher in Seoul and Wellington, mixed in Manila, lower in Taipei and little changed in Sydney.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Jul 21 Jul 20 Year  @ U.S. ................. 309.9 307.5 +21.0  @ Britain .............. 691.5 693.9 +26.6  @ Canada ............... 425.1 423.4 +15.8  @ Japan ................ 1502.1 1486.6 + 5.7  @ France ............... 511.1 509.1 +15.5  @ Germany .............. 242.6 240.9 +16.7  @ Hong Kong ............ 1866.6 1905.8 - 8.0  @ Switzerland .......... 218.1 217.2 +26.1  @ Australia ............ 323.0 322.1 +11.3  @ World index .......... 525.1 520.9 + 6.2  Telos Corp. said it expects to report "marginally profitable" fiscal first-quarter earnings, but that profit is expected to be below earnings for the same period last year.  In the same quarter a year ago, the Santa Monica, Calif., technology services company earned $462,000, or 12 cents a share, on revenue of $27 million.  The company estimated revenue for the first quarter, ended June 30, rose, but that earnings declined because of personnel costs in its hardware services segment.  It added that it has taken a write-off in the first quarter because it logged sales that "didn't exist," Howard Metcalfe, president and chief executive officer, said.  He didn't specify the size of the write-off; the company plans to announce earnings later this month.  Talley Industries Inc. reported that second-quarter profit jumped nearly sixfold to $18.1 million, or $1.42 a share.  The increase reflected a $60 million pretax gain on the February sale of Talley's air-bag business to TRW Inc.  The gain was partly offset by a $35.3 million pretax provision for realty losses.  A year earlier, the Phoenix, Ariz., company earned $3.1 million, or 25 cents a share.  Revenue in the quarter rose 16% to $105.7 million from $91.4 million.  Talley, a maker of industrial products, has interests in real-estate and thrift operations.  The sale of the air-bag business included cash on closing of $97.8 million, plus royalty payments over a 12-year period, which Talley said could amount to more than $1 a share by 1996.  The real-estate reserve included $24.7 million of potential future carrying costs for a portfolio of real estate in the moribund Phoenix market, $2.9 million of write-downs on notes receivable, and a $7.7 million reserve against interest accrued from real-estate loans.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Talley was unchanged at $10.875 a share.  Government officials are brawling with Exxon Corp. over whether the company has done a satisfactory job in cleaning up its giant Alaskan oil spill and whether it should return in the spring to continue its work.  At issue are questions such as how clean is clean and who decides when Exxon's work is over.  The company has said it is halting its cleanup efforts Sept. 15.  At a hearing in Washington, hastily called for Friday, members of the powerful House Interior Committee will challenge Exxon on these issues.  Representatives from Exxon, the Coast Guard and the state of Alaska are expected to testify.  "Prior to the deadline of the cleanup, we want to get clarification of who is responsible and liable for the cleanup," said Rep. George Miller (D., Calif.), the committee member who called for the hearing.  The Coast Guard can't force Exxon to clean up, said Coast Guard Ltd. Cmdr.  James Simpson.  But if Exxon walks away before the effort is completed, the cleanup would have to be taken over by the federal government and costs recovered through litigation down the road.  At present, Exxon's cleanup effort is voluntary.  The hearing was requested in response to an internal memo by Otto Harrison, Exxon's manager in Valdez, Alaska, where an Exxon tanker spilled more than 10 million gallons of oil into pristine waters when it went aground in March.  In the memo, Mr. Harrison says no commitment should be made to any government authorities concerning cleanup activities in 1990.  At a news conference in Valdez, Mr. Harrison said, "The memo was only telling the management team that decisions {about the cleanup} are reserved to me, not them."  He went on to say that Exxon will work this year until the weather "shuts us in.  We'll come back with a team of 20 people in the spring and then make a determination on whether there will be anything more for us to do."  He continued, "I won't speculate on whether Exxon will clean up in the spring.  We'll leave trailers, the work camps and the new office building intact."  Mr. Harrison said that by the end of this season, Exxon will have made the more than 700 miles of soiled shoreline "environmentally stable," but won't necessarily have restored them.  In Washington, Interior Secretary Manuel Lujan Jr. called the Exxon memo "idiotic" and, through a spokesman, vowed to take Exxon to court if necessary to ensure it cleans up long-term damages from the spill.  He said he hoped the memo reflected only the thinking of a lower-level employee rather than of top officials.  "Exxon not only is going to be returning in the spring of 1990 but for subsequent springs, because it will take up to five years to restore that area.  And that's the obligation that Exxon has," said an Interior Department spokesman.  "The secretary of interior won't allow them to pull out.  They are fully liable and responsible for that accident, and if we have to litigate, we will."  Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner told reporters that Exxon can't be expected to make a commitment for next spring until it knows what's left to be done.  He said he understands Exxon's cutoff date is based on the risk of bad weather after then.  Because the latest memo didn't come from Exxon's chairman or chief executive officer, he said, he interprets it as not absolutely precluding continued operations for a while beyond Sept 15.  Mr. Skinner also said that while he was initially critical of Exxon's cleanup, the company's recent increased funding and personnel have been satisfactory.  Congressmen are becoming increasingly concerned that the decision to end the cleanup effort will be made based on Exxon's financial needs rather than environmental needs.  Totaling more than $1.25 billion, the cleanup has been a huge drain on the oil giant's coffers.  There's "no question that Exxon isn't as open to persuasion" as it was, said Robert LeResche, who heads Alaska's inquiry into the spill.  "Nobody knows what the beaches will look like in the spring.  All we're asking Exxon to do is to make a commitment to return and resume work if the Coast Guard, along with other federal and state agencies, says the work isn't completed."  Mr. LeResche went on to say that state officials are concerned that Exxon won't be able to treat all of the polluted shoreline "before winter shuts down the effort."  ---  Barbara Rosewicz contributed to this article.  Hewlett-Packard Co. said it will allow its microprocessor design to be used by other companies, a move designed to strengthen the Palo Alto, Calif., firm's position in the computer-workstation market.  Hewlett is expected to grant the first license to Hitachi Ltd. of Japan.  A spokesman said Hewlett will announce an agreement to license its Precision Architecture microprocessor "in the very near future," but wouldn't elaborate.  Hewlett's microprocessor is based on technology known as reduced instruction set computing, or RISC, which allows high-speed computing.  The RISC chips are currently used only in Hewlett machines.  Sun Microsystems Inc., a Mountain View, Calif., maker of computer workstations, also uses a RISC chip in its machines.  Sun has licensed its RISC chip to other computer concerns.  Earlier this year, Hewlett surpassed Sun as the largest player in the expanding computer workstation market when it acquired Apollo Computer Inc.  Incstar Corp., Stillwater, Minn., said it signed definitive agreements that will result in Bioengineering International B.V., an affiliate of Fiat Group, acquiring a 51% stake in the maker of drug tests and the simultaneous merger with Clinical Sciences Inc., Whippany, N.J.  Bioengineering will acquire control of 51% of Incstar stock on a fully diluted basis for $27.1 million.  From the proceeds, Incstar said it will declare a distribution of $7.50 a share to its shareholders.  To complete the merger, Incstar said it will issue new common shares in exchange for all of Clinical Sciences, based upon an exchange ratio of 0.8772 Incstar share for each Clinical Sciences share.  After the transaction, Incstar's shares outstanding would increase to 14.6 million from a current 3.6 million fully diluted.  Of the new shares issued, 7,451,000 would be owned by Bioengineering while 3,522,000 or 24%, would be owned by Clinical Sciences shareholders other than Bioengineering.  Current Incstar holders will continue to own 25% after the transactions.  Mattel Inc., boosted by consumer demand for many of its staples such as the Barbie doll and Hot Wheels cars, posted a fivefold increase in second-quarter net income to $16.6 million, or 33 cents a share, from $3.2 million, or seven cents a share.  The Hawthorne, Calif., toy maker's sales for the quarter ended July 1 were $272.3 million, up 31% from last year's $207.1 million.  John W. Amerman, chairman and chief executive officer, said retail and consumer demand has remained "very strong" for its core brands as well as a line of licensed Disney infant and preschool toys.  Net income for the first half rose sixfold to $20.9 million, or 42 cents a share, from $3.5 million, or seven cents a share.  Mattel said it would have reported per-share income of 51 cents in the latest half except for a mandated accounting change involving tax benefits.  Sales for 1989's first half were $467.6 million, up 18% from the year-earlier $395.7 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, the stock rose 87.5 cents to $16.75.  Seamen's Corp. reported a second-quarter loss of $39.5 million and said it will seek new capital with assistance from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  The New York company, parent of Seamen's Bank for Savings, said previous attempts to find new investors without FDIC aid have failed.  "If an assisted transaction does occur, it would involve substantial dilution or elimination of the equity investment of the company's shareholders and possibly of the bank's unsecured debtholders," Seamen's said.  The board believes, however, that "such a transaction represents the best prospect of preserving the institution in the present situation."  The loss was $39.5 million, compared with net income of $5.3 million, or 33 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  Unitil Corp., Exeter, N.H., said that a Rockingham County, N.H., Superior Court judge rejected a shareholder request for a list of the company's holders.  Unitil, an Exeter, N.H., utility, had argued that the shareholder was acting as a "straw man," attempting to get the list for the benefit of Eastern Utilities Associates, Boston, which is making a hostile tender offer of $40 a share, or $27.9 million, for Unitil.  The judge added that Eastern isn't entitled to the list under the law.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Unitil shares closed at $37.50, up 12.5 cents.  Premier Bancorp. said its board approved a plan calling for it to sell troubled assets with a book value of $450 million to a bank created to liquidate those assets.  The Baton Rouge, La., company said it hopes that selling the assets will reduce the risk in its loan portfolio, cut its administrative costs and help its return to profitability.  Terms of the plan call for the new bank, to be called Florida Street National Bank, to buy the troubled assets for $315 million.  To pay for the assets, Florida Street would issue about $250 million in bonds and would get a $50 million note from Premier.  In addition, Premier would capitalize the new bank with about $15 million, including about $13.5 million in preferred stock to be owned by Premier and about $1.5 million in common stock that would be paid as a special dividend to Premier's current shareholders.  To reflect the reduced value of the troubled assets, Premier said it took a special reserve of $78 million for its second quarter, which contributed to its net loss of $99.4 million.  Premier said the transaction is subject to regulatory approval and is expected to be completed by year end.  An estimated $138.1 billion in fiscal 1990 spending for labor, health, and education programs won approval from the House Appropriations Committee, which also voted narrowly to block the Treasury from enforcing new tax rules governing employee benefits.  The 29-26 roll call on the so-called Section 89 tax provisions represents a tactical victory for business interests, and Republicans engineered the amendment to pressure the Democratic leadership to allow for a floor vote on outright repeal of the 1986 law.  The action occurred as a rush of spending bills came before House and Senate Appropriations Committees, which in a single day dealt with legislation affecting as many as 10 departments and more than $236 billion in funding for the year beginning Oct. 1.  Timber and oil interests maneuvered behind Senate amendments attached yesterday, and the convergence of bills offered a striking portrait of trading in pork-barrel projects by both houses.  By a simple voice vote, the Senate panel approved language to overturn injunctions against the timber industry in the Pacific Northwest where environmental lawsuits have blocked lumbering in tens of thousands of acres of forest.  Environmentalists won the promise of reduced cutting and precedent-setting language to protect old stands of timber favored by the spotted owl.  But major reservations remain despite the bipartisan support of senior House and Senate members.  Oregon Sen. Mark Hatfield, the chief sponsor of the timber proposal, was helped by the prestige he holds as the ranking Republican and former chairman.  He also found himself allied to oil interests fighting their own battle against restrictions on drilling off the East and West coasts.  The committee endorsed House-approved moratoriums covering an estimated 84 million acres of the outer continental shelf.  But with Mr. Hatfield's help, oil interests won a 12-10 vote seeking to force the lifting of many of these limits in the next two years.  Effective Oct. 1, 1991, the amendment would prohibit oil tankers from entering any U.S. waters covered by a ban on exploration.  The threatened impact would be to shut down much of the oil shipping on the East and West coasts if current curbs continue, and the sudden move appeared to catch environmentalists off guard.  Among the underlying spending bills, the largest was a measure approved by the House committee allocating $138.1 billion among the Labor, Health and Human Services, and Education departments in fiscal 1990.  Spending for research and activities related to the prevention and treatment of AIDS would be increased by an estimated 25% to $1.6 billion, though the National Institutes of Health are given increased discretion in how to allocate these funds.  Total NIH appropriations, which include a major portion of the AIDS funding, would grow nearly 7.5% to $7.68 billion.  But the committee cut by a third the administration's ambitious request for a new center to map genes in human cells.  Elsewhere, the panel restored a proposed $300 million cut by the president in low-income fuel assistance, and funds for disadvantaged elementary school students would be increased to nearly $5.6 billion -- a $1 billion increase, or twice what the administration had proposed.  The Section 89 amendment was attached to a separate $18.4 billion measure reported by the House committee to fund the Treasury Department and Postal Service as well as a variety of independent agencies.  Seven Democrats joined all of the panel's 22 Republicans on the critical roll call, and the final language prohibits the use of any funds to "implement or enforce" the relevant section.  Adopted first as part of the massive tax overhaul bill in 1986, the rules were intended to prevent discrimination in employee-benefit plans.  But the small-business lobby has bitterly complained that the procedures are too burdensome.  Treasury has delayed the effective date until Oct. 1, the beginning of the new fiscal year.  Though the House tax writers are proposing their own solution to the problem, the amendment yesterday seeks to block enforcement of any remedy short of repeal.  Among the three bills approved by the Senate panel, the single largest allocated an estimated $44.25 billion for agriculture and rural-development programs.  The two remaining dealt with interior and energy and water programs most jealously guarded by old Southern and Western powers in the chamber.  The interior bill, estimated at $11.46 billion, will carry the oil and timber amendments adopted yesterday.  The separate $18.4 billion energy and water measure includes $225 million for the proposed superconducting supercollider in Texas.  Most of the supercollider funds would go toward beginning construction of the massive atom-smasher research facility.  While the Senate committee added $25 million more than the House for the supercollider, it signaled a much more wary view toward foreign nations entering into partnership with the U.S. on the project.  The Senate committee cut 20 of 44 new water projects funded in the House bill.  But elsewhere, senators used their position to earmark funds for their states.  Twenty million dollars is set aside for universities in Louisiana and Oregon -- the home of the chairman and ranking Republican overseeing energy and water accounts -- and $15 million for a Utah water-user association supported by Republican Sen. Jake Garn.  Oil industry allies gained leverage by being well-positioned to disburse funds.  However quiet he seems in the corner of the ornate room, North Dakota Sen. Quentin Burdick, chairman of the agriculture subcommittee, never lost sight of dollars for the Great Plains.  More than $6.6 million is allocated for buildings at state universities, and from seedstocks to safflower, he added nearly $1.9 million to the House bill for research grants in which North Dakota has a major share.  Pan American Satellite, a satellite operator, filed a suit seeking $1.5 billion in antitrust damages from Communications Satellite Corp. for alleged attempts to limit competition in the market for satellite transmissions.  The suit, filed in federal court in Manhattan, said Comsat has attempted by itself and with others to monopolize the commercial satellite market in the U.S., and has tried to stifle competition through unfair pricing and other methods.  In Washington, D.C., a Comsat spokesman denounced the lawsuit, calling it "groundless and particularly ironic because Comsat took a leadership role" in urging other members of the International Telecommunications Satelite Organization to approve Pan American's operations.  Created in 1962 by a federal law, Comsat is the U.S. government's representative on Intelsat and on the International Maritime Satellite Organization, Inmarsat.  Intelsat, an international consortium, owns and operates a world-wide satellite system for voice, data, facsimile and video transmissions.  Inmarsat, a similar cooperative, provides maritime communications.  "We compete fairly and legally and -- we believe -- effectively," the spokesman said.  The suit seems to follow a pattern of harassment by Pan American Satellite, he said, referring to challenges by the closely held Greenwich, Conn., company to Comsat proposals before the Federal Communications Commission.  The lawsuit claims more than $500 million in damages and seeks to treble that amount under antitrust statutes.  The suit charges that Comsat urged other Intelsat signatories to boycott any competing systems, including Pan American.  It alleges that Comsat told actual and potential customers that Pan American wouldn't be able to get necessary agreements to transmit signals to foreign countries.  And it charges that Comsat has priced its services "without regard to cost, below average variable cost, or at a predatory level" to discourage competition.  In an interview from Peru, Pan American's Reynold Anselmo said that it hopes to force Intelsat "to stop all of the shenanigans that have been going on for so long."  Eventually, he said, he would like to see Intelsat scrapped.  If private companies were allowed to compete fairly, he said, the result would be better service at cheaper rates.  Pan American is a sole proprietorship, the brainchild of Mr. Anselmo, a businessman who has spent about $90 million to build, launch and market a satellite designed to transmit broadcast and data signals in Latin America, North America and Western Europe.  Mr. Anselmo came up with the idea in the early 1980s when, as president and an owner of the Spanish International Network and 23 Spanish-language TV stations, he was stung by the high cost of transmitting programming from Mexico.  In 1985, the FCC approved the notion of separate satellite systems for international communications, but prevented them from linking up with the public switched telephone network.  The FCC gave Pan American final approval in 1987, and a French Ariane rocket lofted the company's first satellite in June 1988.  Efforts to market its services have been frustrated, however, by politically powerful telephone monopolies in many Latin American countries.  The first breakthrough came in Peru.  To crack what it alleged was an Intelsat boycott, Pan American offered Peru use of a transponder covering the entire country as well as Ecuador, Bolivia and parts of Chile for $1 a year.  In the lawsuit, Pan American said it would have sold out capacity on its satellite and recovered its capital investment around the time of its June 1988 launch if Comsat and Intelsat hadn't interfered.  Western Health Plans Inc. said it reached an agreement in principal to transfer the subscriber base and other assets of its Greater San Diego Health Plan health maintenance organization to a joint venture of Aetna Life & Casualty Co.'s Aetna Life Insurance Co. unit, Partners National Health Plans and a consortium of seven San Diego area hospital systems.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Western in recent months has been shutting down its HMO covering the Riverside and Pomona areas of Southern California.  Last month PacificCare Health Systems Inc., Cypress, Calif., submitted a bid to acquire Western's remaining HMO business.  Upon completion of the transaction, which requires approval of Western's shareholders, more than 100,000 subscribers to Greater San Diego Health Plan would become members of Aetna's local Choice Healthcare Plan associated with the Partners National Health Plans Network.  Partners, which has about two million members, is a joint venture of Aetna and the VHA Enterprises Inc. unit of Voluntary Hospitals of America Inc.  Reisterstown Federal Savings Bank, Reisterstown, Md., said it entered into a final agreement to be acquired by an investor group for $21.75 a share, or $28 million, plus the amount by which the bank's adjusted net worth at closing exceeds $20.5 million.  The acquisition is subject to financing and approvals by regulators and shareholders.  The bank's current adjusted net worth is $20.4 million.  Under the accord, the investor group, which includes members of the bank's senior management and former executives of Bank of Boston, is getting an option to acquire 382,632 newly issued shares.  As of June 30, the thrift had assets of $198.6 million, deposits of $162.1 million and stockholders' equity of $20.4 million.  Beaman Corp., Greensboro, N.C., said its board approved an agreement for Beaman to be acquired by Conder Group PLC for $7 a share.  The accord is valued at about $18 million.  As part of the agreement, the maker of prefabricated buildings said it granted Winchester, England-based Conder Group an option to acquire as many as 500,000 newly issued shares at $7 each "upon the occurrence of certain specified events."  The merger is subject to approval of holders of both companies and certain other conditions, including compliance with antitrust procedures, the company said.  Conder supplies service station canopies and underground tanks in Britain.  The management of Beaman will remain with the company, including President Donald S. Jay, who said, "We expect that, in working with Conder, we shall be able to expand Beaman's expertise and technology into the international market."  Beaman shares were quoted yesterday at $6.25 bid, up $1.375, in over-the-counter trading.  Individual investors who missed this year's big bond-market rally might want to take a tip from the pros.  After years of missing market turns themselves, more and more professional money managers are relying on bond indexing.  Indexing involves buying a basket of securities whose performance tracks some market gauge, such as one of the bond indexes calculated by Merrill Lynch & Co., Salomon Brothers Inc. or Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. Instead of beating the market, the idea is to match it.  That may sound mechanical, even lazy.  But bond indexes in the 1980s have registered consistently higher returns than most professional bond managers.  This was especially true in this year's second quarter.  According to a study of professionally managed bond portfolios conducted by SEI Corp., a Wayne, Pa., financial services firm, only about 20% managed to beat a broad market index in the eight years through June 30.  Says Charles D. Ellis, partner at Greenwich Associates, "The bond market is an experts' market, and it's very difficult to be more expert than the other experts."  Individual investors who want to play the bond market this way can buy shares in an indexed mutual fund offered by the Vanguard Group of Investment Cos. in Valley Forge, Pa.  The Vanguard Bond Market Fund ranked No. 3 in total return among 22 intermediate-term, investment-grade bond funds in the first half of the year, according to Lipper Analytical Services Inc.  Its total return, including both interest income and price changes, was 11.36%, compared with the group average of 9.70%.  Wells Fargo Bank manages a bond index fund for individuals, but it is limited to individual retirement accounts.  The Wells Fargo fund has about $13 million in assets, compared with Vanguard's $105 million.  Some other managers may allow well-heeled individuals into funds created for institutions, but the price of admission is apt to be a steep minimum investment.  Bond indexing isn't without its critics.  Some of them contend that although it may work well in bull markets, it takes active management to avoid trouble when bond prices are tumbling.  Many critics also insist that they know how to beat bond indexes through careful study of credit risks, sector analysis and the Federal Reserve monetary policy.  Still, the amount of money under bond indexed management has soared to about $75 billion from only $2 billion in 1984, says Martin L. Leibowitz, managing director and chairman of the asset allocation committee at Salomon Brothers.  Institutional investors like the idea that their returns will at least approximate the performance of the market.  And while indexing may lack boldness and imagination, Mr. Ellis of Greenwich Associates recalls an old military saying: "There are old pilots, and there are bold pilots -- but there are no old, bold pilots."  Advocates of indexing also say costs are significantly lower than with actively managed bond investments.  That is because the mechanical nature of bond indexing makes it unnecessary to have teams of highly paid analysts and investment strategists making frequent portfolio changes.  The same arguments are made for stock-market indexing, which long has been popular and attracts much more money than bond indexing.  Index funds "are a cheap way of being invested in the markets," agrees Patricia Dunn, president of Wells Fargo Investment Advisors.  Index funds "will outperform the average portfolio over long periods of time by virtue of their lower cost," she says.  Vanguard says costs of operating its indexed bond fund last year amounted to 0.3% of fund assets, far below costs at the typical actively managed fund.  The Vanguard fund was started at the end of 1986.  It requires an initial investment of at least $3,000; additional investments can be made for as little as $100.  The fund tries to track Salomon's Broad Investment Grade Index, which includes U.S. Treasury bonds, government agency issues, corporate bonds and mortgage-backed securities.  So far, however, it hasn't been able to achieve its goal.  Last year, the fund's total return was 7.35%, compared with 7.98% for the Salomon index.  Transaction and operating costs explain part of the difference.  But Vanguard says performance also suffered because of the fund's size, which made it difficult to buy a portfolio of bonds that adequately represented the bonds in the Salomon index.  As recently as the end of March, the fund's assets were only $64 million.  Since then, the fund has been growing strongly, and "the odds of tracking the index precisely are considerably improved," says Ian A. MacKinnon, senior vice president and head of the fixed-income group at Vanguard.  So far, officials at other mutual funds say they aren't in any rush to copy the Vanguard idea.  "To institutions, bond indexing is a very powerful idea whose time definitely has arrived," says George J. Collins, president of T. Rowe Price Associates Inc. in Baltimore.  But "it's very tough to explain something like this to the average fellow," he says.  "We don't see any demand from our shareholders for this kind of product."  Nonetheless, Mr. Collins says, indexed bond mutual funds for individual investors is "an idea whose time will come."  ---  @ Vanguard vs. the Average  Total returns, including price changes, income dividends and capital gain distributions, for Vanguard's indexed bond fund and average intermediate-term, investment-grade bond fund.  @ Vanguard Group Average  @Latest month* ............... 2.93% 2.29%  @Latest 6 months** ........... 8.18% 6.99%  @Latest 12 months** .......... 11.36% 9.70%  @*May 31, 1989 to June 30, 1989  @**Through June 30, 1989  @Source: Lipper Analytical Services Inc.  Cambridge Analytical Associates Inc. said it reached a definitive agreement to be acquired by closely held National Environmental Testing Inc., Cherry Hill, N.J., for $9.9 million, or $3.48 a share.  Cambridge, a provider of laboratory analysis of wastes, said the agreement is subject to shareholder approval.  The two companies had announced a letter of intent for the acquisition May 12.  Aldus Corp., Seattle, said net income was about flat in the second quarter.  Aldus, citing excess inventory, said net was $3.4 million, or 26 cents a share, compared with the year-earlier $3.3 million, or 26 cents a share.  Revenue rose 9% to $21 million from $19 million.  The fast-growing software concern, which makes a popular desktop publishing program called PageMaker, saw net rise 39% in the first quarter.  It said second-quarter growth slowed because distributors had too much inventory.  International revenue was hurt because of the strengthening of the U.S. dollar, the company added.  In the first six months, net rose 19% to $7.6 million, or 60 cents a share, from $6.4 million, or 50 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue grew 28% to $44.8 million from $35.1 million.  In national over-the-counter trading, the company's stock closed yesterday at $14.50 a share, down 50 cents.  The new Ringo Starr feels some songs are better left unheard.  The former Beatle won a temporary restraining order yesterday, blocking the imminent release of studio recordings that he says were made in 1987 in a "degenerative atmosphere" of free-flowing alcohol and thus don't pass muster with a star of his stature.  Mr. Starr recently emerged from a Tucson, Ariz., alcohol rehabilitation program to kick off a nationwide concert tour that began Sunday in Dallas.  He is scheduled to hit 30 cities in 43 days, his first public performances in more than a decade.  And the last thing he wants, according to his attorneys, is to have his image marred by the simultaneous release of some "second-rate," old, and embarrassing recordings, belted out "while under the influence."  "After he went through rehabilitation, he listened to the recordings," says Bruce Grakal, a Honolulu-based attorney for Mr. Starr.  "And in the cold light of sober day, he didn't think they were up to the standard he is used to."  The recordings in question, some 14 songs in all, were made in February and April 1987 at a Memphis recording studio belonging to producer Chips Moman.  According to papers filed in Fulton County Superior Court, Messrs.  Starr and Moman made a verbal contract that essentially made them partners in the venture and gave either party a veto right over the release of the material if he wasn't satisfied with it.  Mr. Starr, who says he had an alcohol problem at the time, says in his suit that Mr. Moman held himself out as a nondrinker, but on the first day of the session, passed around a bottle of tequila.  That was a prelude of things to come, the suit says, noting "the parties spent substantial time in the recording studio engaged in activities other than recording."  Mr. Starr sings on the recordings while two studio musicians play drums.  Among other objections, Mr. Starr says he would like to go back and redub the tapes -- with his own drumming -- and touch up other problems.  He wasn't the only one with hesitations about the performances.  When Mr. Moman tried to market the recordings, which include Bob Dylan on some cuts, he got no takers among the major record companies.  Mr. Moman eventually asked Mr. Starr for $146,000 in production costs but balked when Mr. Starr countered with an offer of $100,000 to settle the matter.  Things were at a stalemate until the new tour.  Mr. Moman, who contends that Mr. Starr previously agreed to the release of the recordings, says he saw a unique chance to recoup his lost money by bringing out the recording to coincide with the tour.  The songs would appear on a new label, CRS Records Ltd., of which Mr. Moman is part owner.  Mr. Moman, who has produced records for stars such as Elvis Presley and Willie Nelson, says that with the publicity of Mr. Starr's national tour, the recording could easily reap sales of $50 million.  Mr. Moman says he would keep at least $3.5 million.  Mr. Starr's attorney, Jane G. Stevens, of Gold, Farrell & Marks in New York, calls Mr. Moman's math "pure speculation," and beside the point.  "Ringo has a right to like what is released," she says.  "It's his creative product."  Mr. Moman, who says time is of the essence because Mr. Starr is likely to release a live album from his tour, plans a quick appeal to the Georgia Supreme Court.  Says his attorney, Thomas Washburn, "They want to hold (the release) off until it's worth nothing again."  Fireman's Fund Corp., Novato, Calif., said net income in the second quarter fell 11.5% to $45.1 million, or 83 cents a share.  The insurance company cited declining premium volume and increasing underwriting losses, among other things.  Premiums written in the quarter dropped 10% to $669.8 million, while underwriting losses rose to $122.2 million from a year-earlier $62.9 million.  Revenue dropped about 6% to $880.7 million from $934.9 million.  In the year-earlier quarter, Fireman's Fund earned $51 million, or $1.04 a share.  In the first half, net dropped 29% to $81.6 million, or $1.49 a share, from $114.9 million, or $2.17 a share, a year earlier.  The year-earlier results included an $11.7 milllion charge for reducing debt.  Revenue fell 11% to $1.7 billion from $1.9 billion.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Fireman's Fund closed at $35, up 87.5 cents.  Independent insurance agents won a federal court ruling that could make it harder for state regulators to recover certain debts from the agents when insurance companies become insolvent.  The decision, which declares part of an Iowa law unconstitutional, directly affects only insurance insolvencies in that state.  However, legal experts said the ruling is likely to attract widespread attention because at least 17 other states have insurance insolvency laws similar to the Iowa statute.  Liquidations of insolvent insurance companies generally are handled under state statutes rather than federal bankruptcy laws.  "I think it's a significant decision," said David Simmons, general counsel for the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.  An association spokeswoman said about 130 multistate insurance companies currently are in liquidation or receivership, but she didn't know how much money was involved.  At issue is the right of a state liquidator to collect premiums outstanding on property and casualty policies sold through independent insurance agents.  Such agents sell policies for insurance companies, collect the premium and, after deducting a commission, send the premium to the company.  However, disputes often arise over premiums that haven't been sent to the insurance company at the time it declares insolvency.  State laws such as the one in Iowa provide, in essence, that independent agents are liable to the insolvent company for all such premiums.  However, in a decision last week, U.S. District Judge Donald O'Brien, in Des Moines, said agents weren't liable for certain of the uncollected premiums.  The judge ruled that if the premiums were for coverage that was canceled as a result of the insolvency, requiring payment by the agents would represent an unconstitutional taking of private property.  The decision stems from the 1985 insolvency of Iowa National Mutual Insurance Co.  The state liquidator filed 575 suits against agents to recover some $31 million in unpaid premiums.  Most were settled.  A handful were consolidated in the U.S. district court case challenging the Iowa law as unconstitutional.  Johnson & Johnson reported second-quarter net income climbed 9.6%, buoyed by higher pharmaceutical-product sales.  The New Brunswick, N.J., health-care product maker's net reached $297 million, or 89 cents a share, up from $271 million, or 79 cents a share, a year earlier.  The per-share figures are adjusted for a 2-for-1 stock split in May 1989.  Sales rose 4.4% to $2.39 billion from $2.29 billion.  Johnson & Johnson shares fell 25 cents, to $49.875, yesterday in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Johnson said that per-share earnings were in line with company expectations.  The stronger U.S. dollar depressed sales, which would have risen 8.2% if the exchange rate hadn't changed from a year earlier, the company said.  Management Co. Entertainment Group Inc., Los Angeles, said it signed a letter of intent to purchase Virgin Vision Ltd., an international distributor of filmed entertainment, from London-based Virgin Group Ltd. for $83 million in cash and about a 25% stake in Management Co.  The transaction will make Virgin Group, an entertainment concern, the largest minority shareholder of Management Co., with nearly 5.5 common shares.  Kidder, Peabody Group Inc., Management Co.'s financial advisor, has agreed in principal to provide bridge financing for the acquisition.  The agreement calls for a $55 million cash payment and $7.5 million of subordinated debt.  "The acquisition positions MCEG as one of the largest independent film distribution companies in the world with annual revenue exceeding $150 million and with more than 1,600 films in its library," said Jonathan D. Krane, chairman of Management Co., an entertainment concern with interests in talent management, production, distribution and marketing, and entertainment financing.  Stocks finished little changed, but investors took a hard look at earnings and punished companies that posted or predicted weak results.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average slipped 1.90 to 2583.08.  Broader averages showed a modest gain.  Standard & Poor's 500-stock index rose 0.21 to 333.88, and the New York Stock Exchange composite index rose 0.07 to 186.10.  Big Board volume was 179,270,000 shares.  Traders said investors hammered issues that have reported poor earnings or expect to do so.  This investor scrutiny was evident in the Big Board's most active list, led by Unisys, which reported a decline in earnings Monday.  Unisys lost 1 3/8 to 20 1/4 on trading of six million shares.  Second on the list was McDonald's.  The stock suffered a 2 3/8-point setback Monday after a lackluster second-quarter earnings report, though it rebounded 1/4 yesterday to 29 3/8 on 2.5 million shares.  Though Microsoft reported a gain in earnings Monday, it predicted a slowdown in the personal computer industry in a meeting with analysts yesterday.  That led to broad selling in a variety of technology shares.  Compaq Computer dropped 2 to 88 1/8 and Microsoft fell 3 1/4 to 52.  Among other technology issues, International Business Machines eased 3/4 to 112 3/4 and Digital Equipment lost 1 7/8 to 92 3/4.  Hewlett-Packard slid 1 1/8 to 51 1/2 and Cray Research dropped 3/4 to 44 1/8.  Data General, which reported a loss of $23.1 million for its third quarter, ended June 24, dropped 1/2 to 17 3/4.  Arnold Kaufman, editor of Standard & Poor's Outlook, said analysts at S&P have cut their 1989 earnings forecasts for 28 companies so far on the basis of second-quarter results.  "There are a large number of disappointments," he said.  "Investors are not tolerating sloppy earnings."  A second day of earnings-related selling weighed on Eastman Kodak, which dropped 1 to 46 7/8 as 1.7 million shares changed hands, and Exxon, which lost 1 1/8 to 44 on two million shares.  In the case of Kodak, Prudential-Bache Securities recommended that clients avoid the stock and buy Polaroid, which climbed 1 1/8 to 46.  Analyst B. Alex Henderson told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report he expects Kodak shares to fall below $45 and possibly as low as $42 before rebounding.  Polaroid may reach $50 a share by this fall, he said, partly from speculative buying related to its instant-camera patent-infringement suit against Kodak.  Among companies that were rewarded for better earnings, Mattel rose 7/8 to 16 3/4.  It posted second-quarter profit of 33 cents a share, compared with seven cents a share a year earlier.  Chevron slipped 7/8 to 54 5/8 after its second-quarter net income fell short of most analysts' expectations, and other oil stocks extended a retreat that started Monday amid a sharp decline in oil prices.  Mobil fell 5/8 to 51 1/8, Amoco lost 1/2 to 46 5/8, Texaco dropped 1/8 to 52 7/8, Phillips Petroleum eased 3/8 to 22 5/8 and Unocal slid 5/8 to 48 3/8.  While the broad market stumbled, airline issues rallied on renewed takeover speculation.  The latest wave of buying in the sector followed a report that Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis, a loser in the bidding war for NWA, has bought about a 3.5% stake in UAL.  A spokeswoman for Mr. Davis declined to comment.  UAL, the parent company of United Airlines, soared 6 3/4 to 183 1/2.  The advance accounted for about nine points of the gain in the Dow Jones Transportation Average, which established its second consecutive all-time record by rising 12.77 to 1253.07.  AMR, which owns American Airlines, rose 1 3/8 to 66 3/4; Delta Air Lines added 3/4 to 70 5/8, Southwest Airlines firmed 1/2 to 29 1/2 and Pan Am added 1/2 to 4 on 1.8 million shares.  Warner Communications dropped 1 to 66 1/8 following Time Inc.'s acceptance of 100 million shares under its $70-a-share tender offer, the first step in a takeover of the company.  Time will exchange cash and-or securities valued at $70 a share for the remaining stock.  Time rose 3/8 to 137 3/8.  Syntex, a long-rumored takeover target, dropped 1/2 to 47 3/8 in active trading after forecasting that its earnings per share for the fourth quarter, ending this month, would be down about 15% to 20% from the year-ago level.  Ryder System fell 1 to 27 3/4 as speculative interest in the stock cooled.  Chairman M. Anthony Burns said the company hasn't been approached by any possible suitors, as had been rumored, and he dismissed the idea of a leveraged buy-out "for now."  Among other takeover stocks, Campbell Soup jumped 3 to 60, Stride Rite rose 1 3/8 to 27 1/8 and Longview Fibre advanced 2 3/8 to 73 5/8.  BankAmerica added 3/4 to 30 1/4 in active trading.  Keefe, Bruyette & Woods repeated its buy recommendation on the stock in the wake of the company's meetings with analysts this week, which focused on the improvement shown in its second-quarter results.  Texfi Industries gained 3/4 to 10 1/4.  Oppenheimer & Co. put the stock on its special series recommended list, consisting of issues that the firm believes will outperform the market.  Safety-Kleen dropped 1 7/8 to 29 5/8 after Prudential-Bache cut its short-term investment rating on the stock.  The firm cited weakness in the used oil business, the impact of a stronger dollar and start-up costs in Spain and France.  The American Stock Exchange Index added 0.30 to 370.12.  Volume totaled 11,130,000 shares.  AT&E plunged 2 1/2 to 11 in reaction to news that Motorola is developing a wrist watch pager that would compete with a product the company is testing.  Motorola eased 1 3/8 to 53 3/4 on the Big Board.  President Bush decided to extend the nation's steel quotas for two and a half years, but he emphasized that he would seek in the meantime to negotiate an end to all such trade-distorting practices in the world steel market.  Even though the decision will continue steel quotas beyond their scheduled Sept. 30 expiration date, the administration described Mr. Bush's decision as "a steel liberalization program."  Officials said the extension would allow a transition to open markets in steel and give the U.S. steel industry more time to continue modernization efforts.  "This program is designed to restore free-market forces to, and end government interference in, global trade in steel," the president said.  Major domestic steelmakers were disappointed that President Bush hadn't opted to extend trade restraints for five years, as they had sought.  They contend the shorter extension period won't give them the time or incentive to make what they consider critical capital improvements.  The nation's increasingly vocal steel users applauded the decision, though.  "We're very pleased," said Jon Jenson, a spokesman for the Coalition of American Steel Using Manufacturers.  "We believe the president's decision is a reasonable compromise between the interests of U.S. steel producers and U.S. steel users."  The steel quotas, called "voluntary restraint agreements," currently limit steel imports to about 18.4% of the U.S. market.  Established five years ago because of widespread foreign subsidies and "dumping" of low-priced steel in the U.S., they now are scheduled to expire no later than March 31, 1992.  Dumping is the practice of selling in a foreign market at prices below the cost of production or the prices in the home market.  Mr. Bush said the overall ceiling on imports could be increased during the next two and a half years at an annual rate of one percentage point.  The administration could delay the increase, however, to support its attempts to achieve an international consensus on steel.  Moreover, U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills said the increase would be allocated "on a first-come, first-served basis to countries that commit to removing trade-distorting practices."  The president's program will give Mrs. Hills some leverage in her coming negotiations with the 29 countries that supply steel to the U.S. under voluntary restraint agreements.  She will be able to use the annual increase in the quota ceiling to reward freer traders in steel.  President Bush pledged during his election campaign to extend the nation's steel quotas, pending international action to remove barriers to trade in steel.  Technically, the extension has to be negotiated with foreign steel suppliers, but it is unlikely that any will refuse to agree to the extension.  The president also instructed the Commerce Department to liberalize and streamline "short supply arrangements," which allow quotas to be bypassed when steel shortages arise.  Requests for such action normally will be processed within 30 days; and in cases involving steel products that aren't domestically produced or for which domestic output is exceeding 90% of capacity, there will be a 15-day procedure.  In addition, the burden of proof in cases involving short supply will shift to the steel producer from the steel consumer.  Some steelmakers have announced multimillion-dollar capital-spending projects that they said hinged on five more years of the voluntary restraint accords.  Allegheny Ludlum Corp., a Pittsburgh-based specialty steelmaker, said in May it would boost capital outlays by $25 million if the quotas were extended for five years.  It is unclear whether steelmakers will begin dismantling any capital-improvement programs.  Armco Inc., for example, said outlays scheduled to improve plants will be necessary regardless.  Armco praised the decision to apply the import restraints on all major product groups -- including specialty steel.  The company also lauded Mr. Bush for his intention to correct market distortions through an international agreement.  "But we're concerned that there's not enough time in the extension to get the job done," the company said.  Armco said it fears that at the end of the 30-month extension, the industry may once again see "high levels of imports and another rash of trade case filings."  And the steelmaker said it wouldn't be surprised then if another extension is urged.  The president's decision is something of a victory for Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady and Michael Boskin, chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers.  They had argued for an extension of only two years, according to administration officials, and had urged that the administration seek to restore freer trade in the international steel market.  The Commerce Department, and to a lesser extent the trade representative's office, favored a longer extension -- possibly coupled with some easing of the program in later years -- pending the removal of subsidies and trade barriers maintained by other steel-producing nations.  Howard M. Love, chairman and chief executive officer of National Intergroup Inc., which owns 50% of National Steel Corp., said two and a half years "appears to be a very short time to satisfactorily negotiate" an international consensus to end unfair and illegal subsidies of foreign steel.  Richard P. Simmons, chairman of Allegheny Ludlum and the Specialty Steel Industry trade group, also said the administration may have too little time to negotiate such an accord, "given the pervasive nature of these practices in so many countries."  Privately, steelmakers questioned whether they will spend as aggressively as they have in the past several years to modernize old steel facilities.  Peter Marcus, an analyst with PaineWebber Inc., said that "since capital spending in large part is based on confidence, all things being equal, the shorter period would lead to lower capital spending than if the industry had a longer period."  But other industry executives and analysts said they wonder whether the threats of reducing capital spending were idle.  Charles Bradford, an analyst with Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, said: "You don't spend for the short-term protection.  You spend money if you need facilities."  Indeed, Weirton Steel Corp. Chairman Herbert Elish said the company will continue to move forward with a five-year, $650 million capital plan of modernizing facilities.  Meanwhile, Caterpillar Inc., a big steel user that has lobbied hard against the steel quotas, hailed the president's actions.  "They improve competition, focus on removing trade barriers and also give a date certain when quotas will end," said William Lane, a senior trade specialist for the company.  STEEL QUOTAS WILL BE extended by Bush for 2 1/2 years, though the president said he will seek to end all protectionism in world steel markets.  U.S. officials said the extension will allow a transition to open steel markets and give the U.S. industry more time for its modernization.  ---  IBM has run into last-minute technical problems that could delay the introduction of new computer disk drives until at least early next year.  The embarrassing delay dims the company's short-term outlook.  ---  Hooker's bank creditors abandoned plans to rescue the financially troubled Australian company, which is likely to lead to its liquidation.  One U.S. bank has started foreclosing on a Hooker-owned mall, sources said.  ---  Durable goods orders edged up 0.3% in June as higher bookings for machinery more than offset a drop in autos.  Analysts said the report indicates manufacturers are still struggling to adjust to a slower economy.  U.S. vehicle sales increased 2.4% during mid-July despite a sharp decline in Chrysler car sales.  ---  Sears's profit rose 21% in the quarter, reflecting gains in its brokerage and Discover credit card businesses.  Retailing didn't help results.  ---  Mobil and Chevron posted lower quarterly earnings, while Phillips Petroleum and Sun had gains.  Three were aided by higher oil prices.  ---  Boeing's profit jumped 20% in the quarter, but the aircraft maker said it still faces major challenges and risks in commercial and military lines.  ---  USX's profit rose 17% in the quarter, helped by higher oil prices and stronger demand.  Also, National Steel's earnings nearly doubled.  ---  Cray Research reported unexpectedly weak second-quarter results and indicated it expects significantly lower earnings for the year.  --- NatWest's chairman and three senior directors resigned in one of Britain's biggest banking purges.  ---  A Tokyo court swept aside a major corporate takeover defense.  The landmark decision could open Japan to more mergers and acquisitions.  ---  Employer costs climbed 1.1% in the second quarter, continuing a moderate trend that has kept labor costs and consumer prices in tandem.  ---  Data General reported an unexpected loss of $23.1 million for its latest quarter, reviving concern for the slowing pace of minicomputer sales.  ---  OTC short interest rose only 0.9% in the month ended mid-July, mainly because investors don't expect technology stocks to fall much further.  ---  Salomon and Shearson posted big earnings gains for the quarter, as expected.  Both were aided by lower interest rates and market rallies.  ---  LIN Broadcasting set a Monday deadline for McCaw Cellular to complete a definitive merger accord.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 179,270,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2583.08, off 1.90; transportation 1253.07, up 12.77; utilities 215.42, off 0.50.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3302.41, up 9.08.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.05, off 0.10; spot index 130.46, up 0.17.  Dollar: 141.45 yen, off 1.05; 1.8830 marks, off 0.0137.  Lederle Laboratories, New York, introduced into the U.S. market an oral antibiotic to treat middle-ear infections and bronchitis that can be taken once a day and doesn't need refrigeration.  Lederle, the pharmaceutical division of American Cyanamid Co., said the antibiotic, called Suprax, would be convenient in treating children of working parents who don't want to rely on a third party to administer the drug more than once a day.  Typically, such antibiotics are taken several times a day.  Lederle, which developed Suprax, has exclusive licensing to market the drug in the U.S. through the year 2000.  It is being sold by Fujisawa Pharmaceutical Co. in Japan, and has been well received, according to David R. Bethune, Lederle president.  The company said it expects sales of Suprax, a cephalosporin that has been shown effective against bacteria resistant to other antibiotics, to reach about $70 million in the first year.  The company said Eli Lilly & Co. currently is the sales leader in the U.S. with its cephalosporin.  The dollar fell in largely technical trading, as market participants hunted for a better indication of the U.S. currency's prospects.  Traders said the dollar's inability to stay above the key 1.90-mark level and its disappointing response to the yen's recent weakness have made participants reluctant to buy the U.S. currency.  But they said the market still seems to lack the conviction to trigger sustained dollar selling and is looking to economic indicators later this week for guidance.  The yen is still a focus of attention, and many traders feel Japan's currency could rebound jauntily from its lows following Sunday's discouraging national election performance by Japan's ruling party.  John Baker, first vice president and chief dealer at Bank Julius Baer in New York, said the yen has been oversold in the wake of the election results, especially because the market has little evidence of the impact on Japan's economic policy.  He predicted that profit-taking on short-yen positions established before and after the Sunday elections will trigger a sharp recovery in the Japanese currency "in the next 24 to 48 hours."  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.8830 marks and 141.45 yen, compared with 1.8967 marks and 142.50 yen Monday.  Sterling was at $1.6380, up from $1.6260.  In Tokyo Wednesday, the dollar opened for trading at 141.50 yen, down from Tuesday's Tokyo close of 142.35 yen.  After holding fairly steady in Asian trading Tuesday, the dollar began to fall during early European trading, as participants who were disappointed by the dollar couldn't benefit more from the yen's losses dumped the U.S. currency, traders said.  Dollar sales continued through U.S. trading, aided by a weak report on U.S. durable-goods orders in June.  The report, which showed orders rising 0.3%, also showed that, minus military hardware, orders fell 0.7%.  Technically driven sales greatly accelerated the dollar's dive when the unit sank below 1.8880 marks, traders added.  They said the market will likely remain in a trading range between 1.8750 marks and 1.91 marks until U.S. preliminary gross national product data for the second quarter and June personal income and spending data give further insight on the likely course of U.S. interest rates.  William Harrington, senior foreign-exchange analyst at the WEFA Group in Bala Cynwyd, Penn., said the dollar is walking a tightrope, balanced by the opposing forces of political instability in Japan and strong European economies.  Concerns about the economic implications for Japan of the election upset for the ruling Liberal Democratic Party support the dollar, he said.  Mr. Harrington said the fear that a political deadlock may petrify economic initiatives is feeding investment flight to the U.S. currency, among others, and "as long as the yen doesn't recover against the dollar, market psychology won't see the dollar rally over."  "There would be a broader move down (in the dollar) if it wasn't for the fact that Japanese investors are such a major influence" in world markets, he said.  However, Mr. Harrington said, the chances of the LDP falling from leadership are extremely thin.  He predicted the yen will be due for a moderate corrective rebound in the near future, opening the door for new dollar sales.  On New York's Commodity Exchange, gold for current delivery settled at $373.70 an ounce, up 30 cents.  Estimated volume was a moderate 2.7 million ounces.  In Hong Kong Wednesday, gold opened for trading at $373.92 an ounce.  Three steelmakers from the U.S., Japan and Canada said they are proceeding with further study of a proposed hot dip steel-galvanizing facility that would employ the latest technology.  National Steel Corp., Pittsburgh, a joint venture owned by National Intergroup Inc. and NKK Corp. of Japan; Dofasco Inc., a Canadian steelmaker; and NKK said the plant has been designed to produce about 400,000 tons annually of coated products for automobiles and other applications.  Its steel would serve both U.S. and Canadian auto markets.  The cost of the plant and its location aren't known, but officials said it could be completed by January 1992.  National Steel and NKK would hold a 50% interest in the proposed plant and Dofasco would own the rest.  Energy prices meandered in a market marked by indecision as participants questioned whether recent price declines were the beginning of a more sustained drop.  West Texas Intermediate crude oil contracts for September delivery ended an active day 20 cents lower, at $18.54 a barrel, on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  Prices rose through the morning and fell later in the day, trading in a narrow range with a high of $18.88 and a low of $18.52.  Gasoline for August delivery closed at 52.07 cents a gallon, down 1.09 cents.  A tremendous buildup of gasoline inventories along with less-than-expected demand in the peak summer driving season has recently combined to pull crude oil demand, and prices, down.  In trading Monday, crude prices broke out of their recent trading range of around $20 a barrel and plunged more than 75 cents, far more than many experts anticipated.  The declines have sparked debate as to whether market psychology is in the midst of turning from bullish to bearish.  "A lot of traders are trying to decide whether the market is going to go into a major downtrend or whether this is just an adjustment to the trading range," one trader said.  "I don't think we have established a new trading range yet," said another.  Yet another trader said that prices could tumble again if they slip below the next support level, $18.50 a barrel.  The uncertainty on the Merc trading floor is visible at the nation's oil refineries.  The prices refiners are willing to pay for a barrel of WTI, known as the postings, are all over the board.  Usually refiners move up or down in lockstep.  "The postings are really reflecting what we see on the exchange: indecision," said Eric Bolling, vice president of Edge Trading Corp.  "One of the first indications of a market changing is the posting situation being as volatile as it has been.  Refiners aren't sure what they need."  In recent days, many refiners have cut postings by anywhere from 50 cents to $1 a barrel, to $18.75 a barrel.  But yesterday, such large refiners as Phillips Petroleum Co. and Sun Co. cut their postings 75 cents, to $18 a barrel.  Another big refiner reduced its posting 50 cents, to $18.25 a barrel.  A number of traders said they squared their positions in advance of weekly inventory and production numbers reported after the close of trading yesterday.  In recent weeks, these figures, from the American Petroleum Institute, showed the huge buildup in gasoline stocks and production that helped trigger the downturn.  The API late yesterday reported that gasoline stocks in the week ended July 21 fell some 1.5 million barrels to 221.3 million barrels.  Traders said several weeks of drawdowns would be needed to convince market participants for any sustained period of time that the oversupply was being reduced.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Prices continued to slide, albeit at a slower pace than on Monday, as predictions of abundant rainfall across much of the Farm Belt weighed on the market.  "The threat of weather problems for this year's crops are rapidly diminishing, and there is still weak U.S. demand," said Mario Balletto, a futures analyst with Merrill Lynch & Co., New York.  He said some soybean buyers, expecting a good harvest and lower prices in the months ahead, are putting off purchases.  He estimated that if the weather continues to improve, with above-average moisture and below-average temperatures, November soybean futures could be trading at about $5.50 a bushel by the end of August, compared with yesterday's closing price of $5.975, down five cents from Monday's close.  The corn crop, in its crucial pollination phase, also benefits from the increased moisture.  Corn futures for December delivery fell 2.5 cents to $2.26.  SUGAR: Futures prices recovered after three consecutive sessions of declines.  The October contract ended with a gain of 0.15 cent a pound at 14.09 cents.  Demand was triggered by anticipation of tightening supplies of both raw and refined sugar, analysts said.  One dealer estimated that the Soviet Union last week bought as many as 200,000 tons of raw sugar.  Soviet purchases so far this year may have totaled as many as 1.5 million tons, he said, and there is a need for still more because of increased demand within the Soviet Union.  In addition, he said, China has a larger demand for sugar than it can satisfy from its own production and may need to buy as many as one million tons this year.  An analyst said China's import needs might be only about half that much, but he agreed that China isn't producing as much as it will consume.  Some market nervousness has been generated by dry weather and some disease in the European beet sugar crop, analysts said, and a tightness of refined sugar supplies is creating demand for raw sugar to be refined and sold at a higher price.  There is an underlying uncertainty in futures that's creating volatility, analysts agree.  On the one hand, fundamentals are market-supporting, but on the other, there is concern that the market may be overbought, which is limiting advances and creating spurts of selling, they said.  COTTON: Prices rebounded from a four-session decline.  The December contract ended with a gain of 1.33 cents a pound at 75.28 cents.  For the most part, trading was technical as demand from brokerage houses and funds developed around midday and pushed prices higher, according to Ernest Simon, cotton specialist for Prudential-Bache Securities, New York.  The demand triggered buying of contracts by traders who had sold short in anticipation that prices would continue to drop.  As a result, as prices for December delivery broke through several resistance levels and then topped the previous high of 75 cents a pound, the advance was accelerated by fresh buying.  More fundamentally, Mr. Simon said, the cotton crop in the Texas high plains, particularly below Lubbock, still needs rain, although at this stage of its development, "it might not make too much difference," he said.  In the Mississippi Delta, which recently had too much rain, "cotton-growing areas are drying out, and only scattered showers are taking place," he said.  The House cut $1.8 billion from President Bush's budget request to develop a space-based anti-missile system, immediately earmarking a big chunk of that money for anti-drug efforts and other politically popular domestic programs.  Despite concerted lobbying by Mr. Bush and Vice President Dan Quayle, lawmakers easily approved an amendment reducing to $3.1 billion from $4.9 billion funding of the so-called Strategic Defense Initiative for the fiscal year starting Oct. 1.  The House's SDI cuts are $700 million deeper than those approved last month by the Armed Services Committee.  But the administration's $305.5 billion military spending plan fared better in the Senate, which is moving to endorse hefty Bush administration requests for both SDI and the B-2 Stealth bomber.  "I'm confident we will come out of the Senate with our program basically intact, including the Strategic Defense Initiative and the B-2 bomber," Defense Secretary Dick Cheney predicted.  The 248-175 vote on SDI in the House, which saw 34 GOP lawmakers break ranks, reflects continuing erosion of support for SDI among Republicans as well as Democrats.  It also increases pressure on the administration to scale back long-term hopes for the anti-missile shield conceived and championed by President Reagan.  Rep. John Spratt Jr. (D., S.C.) said the cuts "serve notice on the administration" to bring the program "down to the world of budget reality."  In spite of White House appeals, the House used the SDI cuts to provide an additional $300 million to clean up toxic pollution around nuclear weapons plants and $450 million to step up military efforts to catch drug smugglers.  However, the House resoundingly defeated substantially deeper cuts intended to shrink SDI to a basic physics research program, as well as a White House-backed amendment seeking to restore nearly all of the $1.1 billion in SDI funds previously cut in committee.  Overall, the defense authorization bill taking shape in the House reflects the new Democratic leadership's desire to offer a clear alternative to Bush's spending plan.  Armed Services Committee Chairman Les Aspin (D., Wis.) has called it the "opening shot in this whole new effort to stake out a defense budget in this new era" of stepped-up arms talks with the Soviets.  By a 278-143 vote largely along party lines, the Democratic-controlled House rejected Mr. Cheney's bid to eliminate money for new F-14 fighters built by Grumman Corp. and stop all funds for a proposed Marine Corps troop transport being developed by units of Boeing Co. and Textron Inc.  But both issues are expected to come up for another vote tomorrow.  Supporters of the Cheney package portrayed it as a dose of bitter medicine to reduce the deficit.  "For years, we have been hearing howls from the House" about Pentagon refusals to eliminate major weapons programs, GOP leader Robert Michel (R., Ill.) said.  "But when the cuts aren't to our liking, we howl even harder."  Democrats responded by stressing that Congress must exert more control over defense spending.  Democratic leaders, for instance, want to keep SDI spending at $3 billion or less for the foreseeable future.  "There will always be a new name, a new technology" touted by SDI supporters, Rep. Edward Markey (D., Mass.) said in the spirited debate.  "Arms control is what we need {and} an end to this insanity."  Because SDI has become an inviting target for deficit-conscious House members looking to fund domestic and military programs, Mr. Bush and his GOP supporters are betting on the Senate to approve SDI funding of well over $4 billion.  SDI spending levels envisioned by House Democrats through the early 1990s are less than half of those projected in the Pentagon's long-range plans, and Rep. John Kyl (R., Ariz.) said such cuts would be "devastating and wreak havoc with the program," including layoffs of as many as 8,000 scientists and engineers.  The Senate, meanwhile, merely tinkered with the administration's plan to spend $70 billion over the next decade on the B-2 bomber assembled by Northrop Corp.  While senators made B-2 production contingent on successful flight tests, cost-control efforts and independent analyses of the radar-eluding bomber's capabilities, Armed Services Committee Chairman Sam Nunn (D., Ga.) appeared to sum up the mood of his colleagues: "There's not a cheaper alternative if we want a penetrating bomber."  By voice vote, the Senate also passed a largely symbolic amendment offered by Sen. Edward Kennedy (D., Mass.) requiring the Pentagon to submit a report by early next year that, among other things, analyzes the strategy and cost implications of building only about 60 of the planned fleet of 132 B-2s.  The White House maintains that deep cuts in the B-2 program would destroy one of the foundations of U.S. arms-control proposals and undermine talks with Moscow.  Despite such warnings, the House today is likely to approve much stronger language barring further B-2 production unless the Pentagon submits, and Congress approves, a scaled-down plan for the entire program.  Investors will find lower yields on certificates of deposit at major banks this week, but these declines were fairly slight compared with those of recent weeks.  The average six-month savings-type CD was off 0.04 percentage point to 8.12% in the week ended Tuesday, according to Banxquote Money Markets, an information service here.  In the three previous weeks, the average six-month CD aimed at individuals dropped a combined 0.33 point.  Savings CDs are those less than $50,000.  This week, yield declines materialized across regions, categories and maturities according to Banxquote, but generally downturns were less than 0.05 point.  On average, one-year CDs are now at their lowest level of the year, with the average issue yielding slightly more than 8%.  Of the 18 major banks Banxquote surveyed, Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. has the strongest one-year issue at 8.65%, unchanged from last week.  The average one-year issue currently yields 8.02%, down from 8.05%.  Most longer-term CDs pay less than 8%.  The average two-year issue yields 7.91%, down 0.01 point from last week.  The average five-year issue is currently paying 7.94%, down 0.02 point.  In contrast, an investor can put funds in a money market mutual fund and often find a superior yield without having to tie up cash for an extended period. (Check-writing privileges are available on many money funds, for example.) The average seven-day compounded yield on a money fund was 9.03% in the week ended July 18, according to Donoghue's Money Fund Report, Holliston, Mass.  Even though the differences in investment dollars is sizable, savings-CD yields are almost even with their large-denomination counterparts, jumbos.  Traditionally, investors are rewarded for making bigger deposits with stronger yields.  Yields on large-denomination CDs -- $90,000 and more -- hardly budged in the week.  The average six-month issue and one-year issue fell 0.02 point to 8.15% and 8.01%, respectively.  For the second consecutive week, newly issued U.S. Treasury bills were sold with higher yields.  Three-month bills shot up to 8.37% from 8.14% the week earlier, while six-month bill yields climbed to 8.16% from 8.09%.  A small gain in the average yields on CDs sold by brokers and dealers was attributed to the Treasury bill rise.  Many of these CDs, which are issued by smaller banks and savings and loans, have yields pegged directly to T-bill yields.  The average six-month CD added 0.06 point to 8.78%, while the average three-month issue increased 0.04 point to 8.85%.  The one-year issue fell 0.03 point to 8.66%.  THE HOUSE VOTED to slash $1.8 billion from Bush's Star Wars budget request.  Despite White House lobbying, the Democratic-controlled chamber approved an amendment reducing to $3.1 billion from $4.9 billion funding to develop the space-based anti-missile system for the year starting Oct. 1.  Lawmakers earmarked some of that money for anti-drug efforts and other programs.  The House's cuts in the Strategic Defense Initiative are $700 million deeper than those approved last month by the Armed Services Committee.  Bush's $305.5 billion military spending plan fared better in the Senate, which is moving to endorse requests for both SDI and the Stealth bomber.  ---  SOVIET MINERS RETURNED to work as Gorbachev guaranteed their demands.  Tens of thousands of miners returned to work in Donetsk, the Soviet Union's richest coal basin, after the Kremlin leader and Premier Ryzhkov pledged increased pay, longer vacations and other benefits.  As the coal strikes eased, shipyard workers in Estonia began a strike rooted in the Baltic republic's ethnic conflicts.  The strikers demanded cancellation of a language law and withdrawal of a political proposal favoring longtime residents of the area.  More than 20,000 people demanding independence for Soviet Georgia protested for the second consecutive day in the capital of the southern republic.  ---  Solidarity leader Walesa met in Warsaw with Jaruzelski and urged the Polish president to make "the only wise decision" and have the Communists turn over the entire government to the union-led opposition.  While calling for Solidarity to assume power, Walesa again rejected Jaruzelski's call to join a coalition government.  ---  Cambodian peace talks collapsed in France, days before the start of a 20-nation international conference on the conflict in the Asian nation.  Prime Minister Hun Sen reportedly refused to combine his delegation to Sunday's forum with representatives of the three factions opposing the Vietnam-backed Phnom Penh government.  ---  The IRS ignored several reports of wrongdoing among high-ranking employees during the past few years in an effort to protect its public image, congressional investigators said.  The allegation followed a yearlong inquiry focusing on eight cases involving 25 senior officials in 10 offices across the country.  ---  The House Ways and Means panel voted to make the catastrophic-illness insurance program voluntary and to halve the surtax that pays for it.  The compromise, prompted by strong pressure from the elderly, was approved 19-17.  ---  The House Ethics Committee hired Phelan's Chicago law firm to review a complaint about GOP Whip Gingrich's book deal.  And an Atlanta business publication reported that Gingrich temporarily increased the pay of two staff members after they worked on his 1988 re-election campaign.  ---  Austrian officials are seeking to question a Vienna call girl who reportedly had a relationship with senior U.S. envoy Felix S. Bloch, who is suspected of spying for the Soviet Union, a government official in Austria said.  Bloch hasn't been charged.  ---  The pilot of Flight 232 said there wasn't a procedure to handle the complete hydraulic failure that caused the United Airlines jumbo jet to crash last week in Iowa, killing 111 people.  He said the crew improvised.  Meanwhile, investigators searched fields surrounding Sioux City's airport for pieces of the aircraft's tail-mounted engine.  ---  The Census Bureau reported that average earnings of working wives have grown about twice as fast as those of working husbands in recent years.  But the wives still are earning on average less than half as much as the men.  ---  A U.S. judge in Washington ordered the permanent dismissal of theft and wire-fraud charges in the Iran-Contra case against Poindexter.  The former national security adviser still faces a conspiracy charge at a trial this year.  The order was granted at the request of Independent Counsel Walsh.  ---  A pro-PLO Palestinian lawyer said he had talks "several days ago" with Prime Minister Shamir, fueling speculation that Israel's government is breaking its ban on contact with the outlawed group.  The lawyer said they discussed Shamir's plan for Arab elections in the occupied territories.  The prime minister refused to comment.  ---  Angolan rebels downed an airliner, killing 42 of the 48 people on board in what was considered the most serious violation of a month-old cease-fire, Luanda reported.  Military sources said the Soviet-built plane was hit by a ground-to-air missile Sunday.  ---  About 300 Chinese students staged a rally this week at Beijing University to vent their anger over the crackdown on pro-democracy protests, participants said.  The demonstration appeared to be the first since the June 3-4 killings in Tiananmen Square.  ---  Gunfire erupted in Somalia's capital, near the home of an ousted defense minister who has been detained on charges of plotting against the Mogadishu government, sources said.  The outburst of shooting came nearly two weeks after clashes between Moslem worshippers and Somali soldiers.  ---  Opposition parliamentarians walked out of India's upper house after insisting that Gandhi resign as prime minister and call new elections over irregularities in a 1986 arms purchase.  Opposition members of the lower house resigned en masse Monday.  ---  Khashoggi's bail was set by a federal judge in New York at $10 million.  The Saudi financier, who was extradited to the U.S. from Switzerland last week, is charged with aiding ousted Philippine leader Marcos in an alleged $100 million real-estate fraud.  The Senate Agriculture Committee approved a Democratic proposal for a $955 million disaster-relief program to aid farmers hit hardest by last year's drought.  Farmers growing wheat, corn or other government-regulated crops could qualify for disaster relief by losing at least 40% of their crop.  Other farmers would have to show a 45% crop loss to receive compensation, according to the proposal.  The estimated cost of the proposal exceeds the $870 million cap the Bush administration put on disaster relief in the fiscal year starting Oct. 1, but committee Democrats said the difference can be made up by making some payments out of this year's budget.  However, party-line disputes over the legislation could kill its chances of being passed by the full Senate before the congressional recess in August.  "We have got to find some way to bring {the sides} together or there may not be a drought bill," said Senate Minority Leader Robert Dole (R., Kan.).  The House passed a similar, but more generous, bill last month.  The estimated $1.3 billion measure, which has bipartisan support, would provide as much as $100,000 to individual farmers, and would finance rural water-supply systems for Iowa and other drought-parched states.  The Bush administration has threatened to veto the House bill, which critics say isn't "budget neutral."  Early estimates of 1989 drought damage to winter-wheat crops showed a 10% harvest decrease, despite a 12.2% increase in planted acreage.  In the five states hit hardest by the dry weather-Kansas, Oklahoma, Texas, Washington and Colorado-winter-wheat crops are so poor that nine million of the 31 million acres planted won't be harvested, according to a Congressional Research Service report.  As B.A.T Industries PLC girds to fight the hostile #13.2 billion ($21.46 billion) bid by Sir James Goldsmith, "the main plank of our defense is going to be our record," says chief B.A.T spokesman Michael Prideaux.  But a look at that record shows a decidedly mixed performance by the big British tobacco-based conglomerate.  B.A.T has indeed outperformed the average British company over the period cited by B.A.T -- March 31, 1981, to March 31, 1989.  B.A.T's earnings have grown 18.5%, compared with a British average of 11.5%.  And its 35% average annual total return -- the rise in its stock price plus dividends -- also exceeds the British market average of 22%, according to Datastream International in London.  But the main reason was favorable currency movements in the early 1980s, when the U.S. dollar rose against the British pound, boosting the value of B.A.T's overseas sales.  In a July 1988 report, S.G. Warburg & Co., B.A.T's investment banker, noted that such currency moves are "a main determinant" of B.A.T's earnings.  And even in the period of B.A.T's choice, the company's stock price has lagged that of Britain's major tobacco company, Rothmans International PLC.  The stock edged out two other U.S. companies with big tobacco components, UST Inc. and Loews Corp., in 1981-89, but trailed them in the five years 1984-89.  That could add fuel to the view that B.A.T might have done better to stick to tobacco instead of diversifying into paper, retailing and insurance.  If it had stayed in tobacco, "the return would have been far higher," says Charles Peel, chairman of Peel Hunt & Co., a brokerage firm here.  The debate is more than academic.  Unlike the U.S., where takeover bids succeed or fail based on financial muscle and the Delaware courts, many British takeovers are decided by the opinions of a small group of about 50 institutional investors.  Sir James argues that B.A.T executives have frittered away the company's robust tobacco profits on a string of less-than-successful acquisitions.  He has belittled B.A.T's 4% annual earnings growth over the past four years as "pedestrian" and says its non-tobacco businesses should be sold off.  B.A.T counters that its record looks much better over the full eight-year tenure of its chairman, Patrick Sheehy, and that B.A.T was only doing what shareholders wanted at the time: diversifying away from tobacco into businesses with better long-term prospects.  B.A.T stock has outperformed several other British conglomerates, such as BTR PLC, that lack its combination of tobacco profits and heavy dollar exposure.  It has also outperformed two U.S. companies that combine tobacco with food or beverages, Philip Morris Cos. and American Brands Inc., during the eight years 1981-89.  But it lagged Philip Morris for the five years 1984-89.  And since 1981, B.A.T stock has also lagged that of its largest and best known rival British conglomerate, Hanson PLC; its chairman, Lord Hanson, is known for buying and selling assets adroitly.  Mr. Sheehy's own deal-making skill is open to question.  Three of B.A.T's four main acquisitions in the same eight-year period have encountered problems, ranging from mild to severe.  After paying $368 million for Marshall Field in 1982, B.A.T had to jettison two Field units that performed poorly.  Its #968 million purchase of Eagle Star insurance in 1984 was followed by massive underwriting losses that contributed to a company-wide earnings decline in 1985.  B.A.T's #684 million purchase of Allied Dunbar insurance in 1985 has gone smoothly.  But its latest and largest acquisition, the $5.2 billion purchase in December 1988 of Farmers Group insurance, was followed by a voter referendum to trim insurance rates in California, the heart of Farmers' market.  Some analysts say Farmers might fetch as little as $3.5 billion in a sale today.  At the news conference announcing his bid for B.A.T, Sir James said that B.A.T had over the past decade invested #7 billion on acquisitions, yet its stock-market value at the end of 1988 was less than that.  B.A.T, he implied, might have done better to put the money in a savings account.  B.A.T disputes that it has spent that much, and says in any case it has paid out #2 billion in dividends since 1981 alone.  Yet one British institutional investor says he considers the point "compelling evidence that the money was not well spent."  B.A.T's Mr. Prideaux notes that there would have been tax problems in paying out more of B.A.T's huge tobacco profits in dividends directly to shareholders, instead of reinvesting them.  Also, he says British law limits stock buy-backs to a small percentage of a company's shares.  Mr. Prideaux concedes that "some of the early diversifications did stumble a bit, principally when we bought Marshall Field."  But he says Eagle Star has turned around, and its profits doubled last year.  The problems with Farmers Group, he maintains, "are more apparent than real."  "Sure, everyone's got 20-20 hindsight; but what was management supposed to be doing?" he asks.  "The holders have been encouraging management to diversify, to reduce dependence on tobacco.  And shareholders haven't complained, because they've had marvelous performance."  Robert Raiff, a conglomerate-watcher at C.J. Lawrence Morgan Grenfell in New York, believes B.A.T's earnings growth has lagged other tobacco-based conglomerates like Philip Morris and RJR Nabisco over the past five and 10 years.  But Mr. Raiff is sympathetic to B.A.T management.  "There's no question that tobacco is a huge cash-cow business, and the question is how do you manage a cash cow in a new world of shareholder rights and expectations.  It's hard to find fault with their historic strategy, because that's what was expected."  Mr. Raiff says he isn't sure whether B.A.T should be broken up, but says it might make sense to be recapitalized with more debt.  Roy Burry of Kidder, Peabody & Co. says that B.A.T's longer-term earnings growth has lagged that of Philip Morris because that company remains more centered on tobacco.  Still, because of British tax rules, he believes B.A.T was right not to stick with tobacco and simply boost its dividend.  He says B.A.T's acquisitions will eventually result in higher dividends.  Mr. Burry says B.A.T "lost all sorts of money" trying unsuccessfully to save its Gimbels U.S. department stores.  On the other hand, he says Eagle Star's earnings "have come roaring back in the last two years."  Rodd Macklin of Legg Mason Wood Walker in Baltimore says B.A.T may have erred in investing in cyclical businesses with up-and-down profits like paper and insurance.  Like tobacco, such businesses are accorded low price-earnings ratios in the stock market, and therefore they don't make B.A.T more attractive to investors.  So far, many British investors are skeptical of Sir James's patter about "unbundling" -- that is, breaking up -- B.A.T because of his initial low bid and the fat percentage of profits from asset sales his group wants to keep.  They feel much more protective of British companies and the British economy than U.S. money managers do about U.S. companies, and they aren't sure B.A.T's companies would fare better in the hands of other large buyers.  Sir James's case "would be stronger if he could prove B.A.T has been an unmitigated disaster," said one London money manager.  ---  @ B.A.T Shares' Track Record  @How stock prices have multiplied  @ TIMES STARTING PRICES  @ 8 Years 5 Years  @ 3/81 to 3/89 3/84 to 3/89  @B.A.T Industries 8.2 2.6  @British Stock Market 3.5 2.1  @British Tobacco Stocks 8.5 2.7  @Rothmans International 8.9 3.8  @UST 7.7 2.7  @Hanson PLC 9 2.6  @BTR 5.4 2.4  @Loews 8.0 3.3  @Philip Morris 4.7 3.6  @American Brands 3.4 2.4  @NOTE: British companies' prices in pounds, U.S. companies in dollars  @Source: Datastream International, London; IDD Information Services  Average earnings of working wives have grown about twice as fast as those of working husbands in recent years, the Census Bureau reported.  Nonetheless, the wives still are earning on average less than half as much as the men.  For all working wives, both those who worked full-time and those who had part-time jobs, earnings averaged $13,245 in 1987.  That's more than 23% above their inflation-adjusted $10,744 average earnings in 1981.  Average earnings of working husbands gained less than 12% during the same period, rising to $29,154 from $26,075.  The 1981 figures are in 1987 dollars, adjusted for inflation.  Wives who worked full-time year-round -- just more than half of all working wives -- fared comparatively better, making about 57% as much as husbands who worked full-time all year.  Average earnings for these wives were $18,929 in 1987, compared with the husbands' $33,005.  The Census Bureau offered several explanations for why wives' earnings have been rising faster than husbands': an increase in the proportion of women working full-time, a decline in the proportion with children under 18 (a trend that would allow more women to work part-time, as well as full-time), a rise in the educational level of women, and a slow movement by women into professional and managerial ranks.  Similar factors were cited to explain another trend: an increase in the number of families in which wives earned more than husbands.  In 1987, according to the report, about 5.3 million wives earned more than their husbands, 18% of all families with both spouses working.  The 1987 figure compares with 4.1 million, or about 15.9%, in 1981.  The report said that in 1987, 43.5 million married couples, about 84% of all couples, had at least one spouse working.  In approximately two-thirds of these families, both husband and wife worked part-time or full-time; in just under 30% of the families, both worked full-time year-round.  Average earnings of families in which both spouses worked at least some of the time averaged $41,690 in 1987; for those with both working full-time all year, the average was $49,030.  The average was only $31,010 for families in which just the husband worked.  A federal judge upheld the jury verdict that awarded a Peruvian minerals concern $132 million in the silver-conspiracy case against the Hunt brothers of Dallas.  U.S. District Judge Morris E. Lasker, who presided over the six-month trial last year, rejected defendants' post-trial motions claiming that the evidence was insufficient to support the jury's verdict.  The jury concluded in August 1988 that three Hunt brothers -- Nelson Bunker Hunt, William Herbert Hunt and Lamar Hunt -- and others had conspired to corner the 1979-80 world silver market and that Minpeco S.A. should be compensated for its losses.  Minpeco had claimed that its investments in the silver market were ruined by prices pushed to artificial peaks because of the conspiracy.  Lamar Hunt, after settling with Minpeco for $17 million last fall, is no longer liable for any part of the $132 million judgment.  Mark Cymrot, Minpeco's attorney at the Washington, D.C., law firm of Cole Corette & Abrutyn, said Judge Lasker's decision will bolster Minpeco's position as a creditor in the bankruptcy case of Nelson Bunker Hunt and William Herbert Hunt.  Both filed personal bankruptcy petitions under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code a month after the verdict last year.  "This confirms that our claim is a solid one, which will help us in negotiations during the reorganization of the Hunts' estates," said Mr. Cymrot.  Mr. Cymrot said the decision also will help Minpeco to engage the assistance of the Brazilian government in trying to collect part of the judgment from multimillionaire businessman and investor Naji Robert Nahas, another defendant in the case.  Earlier this year Judge Lasker entered a default judgment against Mr. Nahas, a Lebanese-born Brazilian citizen who allegedly synchronized silver trading among the co-conspirators.  Aaron Rubenstein, an attorney for the Hunts at the New York law firm Kaye, Scholer, Fierman, Hays & Handler, said his clients will appeal the decision.  Britain's STC PLC said it is joining U S West Corp. to bid for one of the licenses Britain will issue this year to operate a cellular-communications network.  STC said additional partners are being considered.  Several United Kingdom and U.S. companies already have formed groups to bid for the two or three licenses expected to be issued.  STC also reported a 14% increase in pretax profit for the first half ended July 2, with growth in all main divisions.  Pretax profit rose to #114.6 million ($186.5 million) from #100.2 million a year earlier.  Profit attributable to shareholders, or net income, rose 9.6%, to #72 million from #65.7 million.  Sales grew 16%, to #1.28 billion ($2.08 billion) from #1.1 billion.  STC said new orders increased 18%, to #1.3 billion, a rise the company predicts will lift sales in the fiscal second half.  Canadian production of market pulp dropped 6.3% in June from a year earlier as the industry operated at 95% of capacity.  The Canadian Pulp and Paper Association, an industry group, said Canadian mills produced 583,000 metric tons of market pulp in June, compared with 622,000 metric tons in June 1988.  A metric ton equals 2,204.62 pounds.  Market pulp is wood pulp sold on the open market to producers of paper, sanitary and other products.  The statistics exclude pulp consumed at the producing mill or shipped to another mill that is affiliated with the producing mill.  Canada is the world's largest producer of market pulp.  The June operating rate compared with 94% in May and 102% a year earlier.  In the first six months of this year, output was almost unchanged at 3,572,000 metric tons, compared with 3,578,000 metric tons a year earlier.  Total shipments in June were 627,000 metric tons, up from 624,000 metric tons a year earlier.  Shipments to Europe rose while shipments to other markets fell.  Producer inventories at the end of June were 266,000 metric tons, a 13-day supply, down from 310,000 metric tons, a 16-day supply, at the end of May.  Producer inventories at the end of June 1988 were 287,000 metric tons, a 14-day supply.  Cooke Media Group Inc. said David J. Auger will become publisher of the Daily News of Los Angeles, effective Aug. 7.  Mr. Auger, 33 years old, succeeds Robert Steven Morris, who resigned suddenly in June after a dispute with Jack Kent Cooke, the newspaper's 76-year-old owner.  Mr. Cooke is a Washington businessman whose interests include ownership of the Washington Redskins, cable television investments, and real estate.  Mr. Auger has been vice president, marketing, for Cooke CableVision Inc., part of Mr. Cooke's media interests, which are based in Woodland Hills.  The fast-growing Daily News, with daily circulation of about 183,000 copies, is one of a combative group of daily newspapers serving the Los Angeles area.  Its circulation in parts of the sprawling San Fernando Valley, to the north of downtown Los Angeles, rivals that of the much larger Los Angeles Times.  Sotheby's Holdings Inc. reported world-wide auction sales for the 1988-89 season rose 48% to a record $2.3 billion, while rival Christie's International PLC reported sales grew 56% to $1.78 billion.  The season for both London houses runs from September to August.  Sotheby's said robust art sales in the past year in Europe and the U.S. indicate the "sustained strength of the art market across virtually all levels."  Sotheby's season was capped by its record sale of Pablo Picasso's 1901 self-portrait "Yo Picasso," for $47.9 million, the second-highest price paid for any painting at auction.  On May 9, Sotheby's impressionist and modern sale totaled $205 million, the highest mark reached in a single auction session.  Christie's called its season here "outstanding," adding that New York sales jumped 94% to $888 million from a year earlier.  Among Christie's record sales were Pontormo's "Portrait of Cosimo I de'Medici," marked by a $35.2 million price, setting a world record for an old-master picture.  Christie's also fetched a record $85 million total for the Goetz collection of 28 impressionist, modern and contemporary art works, the highest total for any single-owner sale.  Traditional Industries Inc. said it reached a settlement with the Federal Trade Commission over some of its sales practices.  Traditional Industries sells photo packages, which typically include a camera, family photo album, and photofinishing services.  These are usually sold to newlyweds and new parents in rural and small towns through a network of 1,200 sales agents.  According to the company, the FTC investigation focused on the idea that the company was allegedly billing certain services as "custom" that the government felt were not, and that Traditional Industries was failing to provide a three-day "cooling off" period in which customers could back out of a sale.  A Traditional spokesman said the company believes it was providing custom photofinishing services and that it wasn't bound by the three-day rule.  A spokeswoman for the FTC declined to comment.  As part of the consent order signed, the company won't pay a fine but will set up a $250,000 trust fund to provide refunds to certain customers.  The settlement must be approved by FTC commissioners, which could take about two months, the company said.  Long Island Lighting Co.'s directors voted to make up some $390 million in preferred-dividend arrears and to resume normal quarterly preferred payouts.  The arrears have been accruing since 1984 on 19 separate issues.  The accrued dividends will be paid Sept. 1 to stock of record Aug. 4.  The accrued payments range from $12.35 to $46.55 a preferred share, depending on its yield.  The utility's board took no action on the common-stock dividend, which hasn't been paid since 1984.  But analysts foresee the common-stock dividend being restored before year's end.  Lilco last paid 50.5 cents quarterly and has indicated that in 1990 it will pay at a $1-a-share annual rate.  Both the resumption of preferred dividends and the expected resumption of the common payout result from an agreement completed earlier this year between Lilco and New York state under which Lilco agreed to abandon its Shoreham nuclear power plant in exchange for sizable rate increases and other financial benefits over the next 10 years.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, Lilco common rose 50 cents to close at $17.375.  For holders of Lilco preferred stock, the announcement marked the end of years of wildly fluctuating stock prices keyed to the on-again, off-again talks between Lilco and New York state.  Indeed, the first time a deal was announced, late last year, the New York state legislature refused to endorse the pact.  The deal was subsequently rewritten to get around that problem, but not before New York Gov. Mario Cuomo officially pronounced it dead.  Lilco preferred issues are trading at 52-week highs and as much as 50% higher than their lows for the period.  Sears, Roebuck & Co. said second-quarter net income rose 21%, reflecting one-time gains and improvements in its securities brokerage and Discover credit card businesses.  But the company's enormous effort to revive its core retailing business didn't help results in the period.  The retailing and financial services giant's net was $391.2 million, or $1.11 a share, exceeding Wall Street's expectations.  That compares with net of $322.2 million, or 85 cents a share, a year earlier, after restatements for changes in insurance and income tax accounting rules.  Per-share earnings rose more than 30% because Sears has been buying back stock.  The results in the latest quarter include a gain of $54.9 million on the sale of the commercial division of the company's Coldwell Banker Real Estate unit, which was accounted for as a discontinued operation.  Sears said profit from continuing operations declined slightly to $334.9 million from $338.3 million a year earlier.  Revenue rose 9.2% to $13.28 billion from $12.16 billion a year earlier.  Other highlights of Sears's results:  -- Dean Witter Financial Services' profit quadrupled to $44.5 million from $10.9 million a year earlier.  Profit from securities-related businesses more than tripled to $32.1 million from $9.8 million a year earlier, while the company's Discover credit card operation posted earnings of $16.6 million.  A year earlier, the Discover card earned only $100,000.  -- Merchandise Group profit rose 2.5% to $161.6 million from $157.6 million a year earlier.  But excluding a one-time gain and a change in the way Sears calculates adjustments for the effects of inflation on its inventories, merchandise group profit fell 14%, according to Robert Buchanan, an analyst at A.G. Edwards & Sons Inc., St. Louis.  -- The Allstate insurance unit was hurt by severe weather losses but posted a 5% increase in profit to $199.8 million from $190.6 million a year earlier.  The year-earlier figure includes a $19.5 million loss from the discontinued life and health insurance operation.  Sears stock fell 12.5 cents on the news, closing at $45.625 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Walter Loeb, a Morgan Stanley & Co. analyst who raised his estimate for Sears earnings for the year, cautioned: "A lot of work still has to be done in realigning the merchandising division.  I think it was still a fight for survival" in the quarter.  "They're on the right track strategically," said Margo McGlade of PaineWebber Inc.  "But I don't know if shareholders are going to see a benefit on the bottom line for a long time.  What we're in now is a transition period."  For the first three weeks of July, for instance, Ms. McGlade estimated that Sears's sales at U.S. stores open at least a year were either flat compared with a year earlier or slightly lower.  Mr. Buchanan at A.G. Edwards said Sears's so-called comparable-store sales in the U.S. rose 4.5% in the second quarter, the first period to fully reflect Sears's switch on March 1 to a new competitive pricing policy known as "everyday low pricing."  Sears is counting on the addition of name-brand merchandise over the next two years to give sales a bigger boost.  Over the past year, the company has also reduced the number of managers in its merchandise group by 1,625 to streamline its cumbersome chain of command and cut costs.  Analysts said the merchandise group's profit margin declined, as expected, in the second quarter because of the new pricing strategy.  The merchandise group's results also include a gain that analysts estimated at $12 million, reflecting insurance reimbursements for Sears's costs in defending itself against an Equal Employment Opportunity Commission lawsuit in the 1970s and 1980s.  Merchandise group revenue rose 7% to $7.71 billion from $7.2 billion a year earlier.  Telenet Communications Corp., a data-communications subsidiary of US Sprint, said it cut rates as much as 70% on computer-to-fax services from the U.S. to Europe and Asia.  The company said it installed certain new facilities in anticipation of greater overseas faxing by U.S. users in the next few years.  A spokesman couldn't determine the cost of the new facilities, which allow more-efficient transmission of information to a fax machine.  The company's computer-to-fax service allows a U.S. user to dial a local phone number, via a computer modem, and transmit data to a facsimile machine.  Telenet said its fax transmissions would cost less than those sent over rivals' services.  US Sprint, a telecommunications company, is a unit of United Telecommunications Inc., Kansas City, Mo.  Annoyed by on-again, off-again merger negotiations with McCaw Cellular Communications Inc., LIN Broadcasting Corp. set a Monday deadline for completing a definitive agreement.  In a letter to McCaw Chairman Craig O. McCaw, LIN President Donald A. Pels said the cellular telephone and television company, based here, considers $127.50 a share a fair price.  If the two parties do not agree by July 31, Mr. Pels wrote, LIN will "pursue other such available alternatives" as the board "determines to be in the long-term interests of LIN's stockholders."  McCaw, based in Kirland, Wash., declined to comment on LIN's letter.  "Basically, LIN is saying 'put up or shut up,'" said Geoffrey Johnson, analyst with Argus Research.  "Effectively, it's an ultimatum."  The two companies have been playing the cat-and-mouse takeover game since June 6, when McCaw launched an unsolicited $120-a-share, or $5.85 billion, tender offer for the 90% of LIN that it doesn't already own.  LIN subsequently rejected the offer as inadequate and said it would talk to other potential bidders.  After no bidders emerged, and after LIN lost an important, though unrelated, lawsuit, McCaw lowered its bid to $110.  Last week, McCaw said it broke off negotiations and extended the $110-a-share offer for LIN to Aug. 11.  It was set to expire July 21.  Analysts said Mr. Pels appeared to be threatening to walk away from the deal, even though no other bidders for LIN have emerged.  Mr. Johnson predicted that if the deal falls through, LIN would proceed with earlier plans to spin off its TV properties.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, LIN shares closed at $111.875, up $2.375.  When McCaw made its tender offer, LIN was trading at $103.50 a share.  In the letter, Mr. Pels accused McCaw of using recent congressional tax and legislative proposals as a pretext for backing out of the deal.  "You were aware of all these developments prior to the commencement of our negotiations on July 12," he wrote.  A LIN spokesman said that McCaw said in private negotiations it had been prepared to pay $127.50 a share.  The problem, the spokesman said, was that McCaw refused to complete the deal in a timely fashion and insisted on keeping the offer open for 14 months.  LIN officials "are interested in showing the public they are tired of being jerked around," the spokesman said.  McCaw now owns about 15% of LIN, Mr. Johnson said.  McCaw is seeking to acquire LIN to obtain its valuable cellular-phone franchises here and in Los Angeles, Philadelphia, Dallas and Houston.  Molson Cos.  Ltd. of Canada is among a group of international companies that have agreed to participate in a planned offer for Elders IXL Ltd. that values the Australian brewing, resources, agribusiness, and financial-services company at about 5.4 billion Australian dollars (US$4.04 billion).  Earlier this month, Harlin Holdings Pty.  Ltd., a closely held concern associated with Elders Chairman John Elliott, said it was arranging financing for the offer at A$3 a share.  Mr. Elliott said yesterday that more than A$1.1 billion in equity has been raised for the offer, and A$4.9 billion in senior bank syndicated debt and subordinated debt is committed.  Institutions that have agreed to equity investments in Harlin include Molson, Prudential Bache Interfunding Inc., Compagnie Financiere de Suez and Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp. Details of these equity commitments weren't given.  Toronto-based Molson said its equity investment in Harlin would be about 5.5% and would entitle it to a seat on Harlin's board.  Canadian regulators earlier this month allowed a planned merger of the Canadian-based brewing operations of Molson and Carling O'Keefe Breweries of Canada Ltd., an Elders unit.  Harlin already owns about 18% of Elders.  Elders shares traded yesterday at A$2.97.  Schering-Plough Corp.'s directors adopted an anti-takeover plan giving shareholders the right to acquire shares in an acquiring company at half price under certain conditions.  The pharmaceutical company said the plan, which amended a previous plan to reflect changes in New Jersey corporate law, wasn't in response to any particular takeover threat.  Debating the defense bill this week, the creative Rep. Ron Dellums mentioned "the batmobile, euphemistically referred to as the Stealth bomber."  Running with that metaphor, we'd say that makes Mr. Dellums and his fellow opponents of Stealth the Jokers, though more in the mold of Cesar Romero than Jack Nicholson.  Opponents now are saying with a straight face that the Stealth B-2 bomber is "too expensive" to build, though these are usually the same people who want to build a pair of new mobile missiles, the MX and Midgetman.  Why not just kill one of the two missiles and keep the bomber?  These are also the same Members who, when Defense Secretary Dick Cheney recently tried to kill the F-14D fighter and V-22 Osprey, voted to revive them.  At least 100 Jokers of Congress toured the Northrop Batcave to inspect the B-2 over the past 10 years.  They know, or ought to know, that much of the plane's cost has gone to pay for an elaborate security system to prevent the revolutionary Stealth technology from being stolen by employees of Mikhail Gorbachev.  The pranksters know, too, that some $23 billion of the estimated cost of $70 billion for 132 planes already has been spent on R&D.  This means the marginal, from-this-day-forward cost of each new B-2 is some $300 million, well below the $500 million to $600 million floated by its critics.  As a share of the defense budget, that comes to about 1.3%, a smaller share than that once taken by the B-1 (1.6%) and B-52 (1.4%).  It's certainly true that Stealth's mission, as described by Air Force generals, is ludicrous.  The generals claim to want a "penetrating" bomber that can find and destroy mobile Soviet SS-24s and SS-25s missiles once nuclear war breaks out.  In other words, they want to spend $70 billion waiting for the Apocalypse.  But weapons are too important to leave to peacetime generals, and the B-2 has other, more realistic uses.  Because it can fly 10,000 miles on a single refueling, it gives the U.S. a way to project power without a global network of bases.  Because each plane can carry as many as 20 cruise missiles, conventional as well as nuclear, it also can project that power without risk of involving U.S. troops or pilots.  A single Stealth bomber could have accomplished, from a distance of hundreds of miles, what a fleet of bombers did in the attack on Libya's Gadhafi.  And though a cruise missile could do the same thing, the B-2 has one other advantage: It's reusable.  The best argument for Stealth is that its radar-shielding technology goes right to the heart of U.S.-Soviet military competition.  It degrades a $200 billion or $300 billion Soviet investment in air defenses.  It taxes a Soviet military-economic structure to compete to an extent it probably cannot: Soviet central planning is good at rolling out thousands of cookie-cutter missiles, but not at the hundreds of entrepreneurial innovations that constitute a stealthy B-2.  Congress has a habit of always favoring the "next" weapons technology, hoping to gain cover for opposing a current one.  Many Members opposed the B-1 bomber in the early 1980s, saying they supported the B-2; now they want to kill the B-2.  It's this sort of thinking on air defenses that already has given the Soviets a form of stealth technology: It's called a regular bomber.  Since the United States doesn't have any air defenses, it doesn't much matter if a Soviet bomber is detected by American radar.  The Jokers in Congress probably think Batman will come to the rescue.  Businessland Inc., the biggest personal-computer retailer, reported a sharp rise in quarterly earnings, but Microsoft Corp., the biggest software producer, projected that growth in the personal-computer market is slowing.  The contradictory messages about the outlook for the personal-computer market increased the confusion surrounding the industry and caused several major high-technology stocks to fall yesterday in heavy trading.  Businessland, San Jose, Calif., said that net income for the fiscal fourth quarter ended June 30 more than doubled to $7.4 million, or 23 cents a share, from $3.1 million, or 12 cents a share, a year earlier.  Businessland had an average of 32.1 million shares outstanding in the latest period, compared with 29.8 million shares outstanding a year earlier.  Revenue rose 21% to $322.6 million from $266.9 million.  The results were viewed by some analysts as evidence that fears of a broad slump in the personal-computer market may be overblown, despite recent setbacks at Ashton-Tate Corp. and some other computer concerns.  On Monday, Microsoft, whose results are also considered an indicator of personal-computer market health, reported a 51% increase in its fiscal fourth quarter earnings.  Nonetheless, Wall Street still seems to be expecting a slowdown.  Yesterday, several high-tech stocks fell, apparently because Microsoft projected at an analysts meeting in Seattle that the personal-computer industry's 1990 growth would hit only about 10%.  It also indicated that its new OS/2 operating system for personal computers hasn't been selling well, and that some analysts' estimates of its fiscal 1990 earnings are high.  After the meeting, Microsoft shares tumbled $3.25 to close at $52 in national over-the-counter trading.  Among other high-tech stocks, Ashton-Tate shares fell $1.75 to $14.50 and Apple Computer Inc. shares closed at $38.75, down 50 cents.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Compaq Computer Corp. shares nosedived $2 to $88.125, while Businessland shares rose 12.5 cents to $11.50.  Despite the stock market's negative expectations, it appears that different segments of the personal-computer industry are experiencing sharply different growth trends.  Generally, demand is strong for high-performance hardware, such as Apple's Macintosh, Compaq's 386 machines and International Business Machines Corp.'s PS/2 lines of computers.  But demand appears to be increasingly sluggish for software applications, even high-performance applications such as Ashton-Tate's database programs, Aldus Corp.'s Pagemaker program for desktop publishing and OS/2 operating software.  Demand has been slowing for months for low-performance personal computers, such as those made by Wyse Technology and AST Research Inc.  David Norman, Businessland's chairman and chief executive officer, attributed its results to booming sales of machines featuring Apple's Nu Bus and IBM's Micro Channel operating systems.  Both are business computer operating systems that incorporate high-powered data management and communications capabilities.  Machines utilizing the systems have been around for over a year, but Businessland said they have only recently begun to catch on with customers.  Mr. Norman said sales of machines with Nu Bus made up about 36% of Businessland's total sales in the quarter, while sales of machines with Micro Channel made up about 30% of total sales.  Demand for the products is outstripping the ability of Apple and IBM to meet it.  "If we could have had our orders filled, our results would have been even higher," Mr. Norman said.  Despite the jittery stock market and conflicting signals about the personal-computer market's condition, Mr. Norman said he expects hot demand for machines featuring Nu Bus and Micro Channel to buoy the market into 1990.  "Business customers have decided they want the new technologies and the high power," he said.  "I think we'll see heavy demand for these products throughout this year and into next," he said.  Mr. Norman said he has raised his projection for 1989 growth in the market for personal computers for business to 17% or 18% from 12% to 13%.  Describing the analysts meeting yesterday, Microsoft said that its president, Jon Shirley, told analysts that the company was comfortable with projections of fiscal 1990 revenue growth of roughly 25% to about $1 billion.  But Mr. Shirley said some analysts' earnings projections were too high, mainly because Microsoft will have difficulty maintaining its historical 20%-plus profit margins in the face of a shift in product mix to more applications software, which is more expensive to market, and an increase in research and development costs.  Some analysts had been predicting fiscal 1990 profit growth of approximately 25% from the $170.5 million, or $3.03 a share, earned in the fiscal year ended June 30.  Mr. Shirley declined to disclose Microsoft's own revenue and earnings forecast.  An interest-rate retreat is stimulating residential construction activity, and total 1989 contracting will end up just 2% below 1988's record level, according to the F.W. Dodge division of McGraw-Hill Inc.  Total construction contracting will ease to about $254 billion from $258 billion last year, Dodge said.  Previous Dodge forecasts anticipated a steeper decline than 2% in 1989.  "With the decline of mortgage rates now a fact instead of a forecast, a lot of the suspense has been taken out of the second-half outlook for the credit-sensitive categories of building," said George A. Christie, vice president and chief economist of Dodge.  A better second half, he said, would push residential contracting to about $127 billion in 1989, even with last year's level.  Commercial building should be weaker, however.  After three consecutive years of decline, commercial building will slide another 7% from 1988's $75 billion, Dodge said.  Relatively no movement is expected in the public-works sector of construction contracting, which should rise only 1% to $43 billion because of federal budget freezes.  A small increase in highway and bridge construction is expected.  The already-depressed South Central region will be the only major region to hold even with last year.  The biggest decline, 4%, is expected in the southern Atlantic region, Dodge said, but that area is coming off five years of uninterrupted expansion.  Short-term interest rates tumbled and bond prices strengthened yesterday as investors began to suspect that the Federal Reserve has once again eased credit policy.  Speculation that the Fed is allowing interest rates to move lower gained momentum when the central bank failed to enter the market during its normal pre-noon intervention period.  Specifically, the Fed had been expected to arrange matched-sales purchase agreements, a technical trading operation used to drain reserves from the banking system.  By doing so, the Fed could have signaled its displeasure at seeing the federal funds rate fall below its target of 9 1/4%.  The rate, which banks charge each other on overnight loans, slipped as low as 9-1/16% yesterday.  The closely watched rate is considered an early signal of changes in Fed policy, although it often swings because of purely technical factors.  When the central bank failed to offset the decline, "that suggested that the Fed has eased another notch," says David Jones, chief economist at Aubrey G. Lanston & Co.  "If the Fed did not want the market to conclude that it was easing, it would have drained," he said.  But many other economists aren't so sure.  Donald Fine, chief market analyst at Chase Manhattan Bank, said the small decline in the fed funds rate "is not a definite sign of easing."  But, he added: "My feeling is that they haven't done it yet, but they will very soon."  He expects a fed funds rate of 9% within two weeks.  Robert H. Chandross, vice president and chief economist at Lloyds Bank PLC, interpreted the absence of Fed intervention differently.  He says the Fed has completed its trading activities for the time being as the end of the banking system's two-week statement period approaches.  Banks borrow from each other, if necessary, to keep average daily reserves over a two-week period at certain minimum levels.  The fed funds rate fluctuates widely on the last days of that period.  That statement period ends today.  "I don't think it is justified to conclude that the Fed is up to something so close to settlement day," says Mr. Chandross.  But if the fed funds rate stays below 9 1/4% through tomorrow, "then I'd get suspicious," he said.  In trading yesterday, the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond rose about 1/4 point, or about $2.50 for every $1,000 face value.  Corporate and municipal bonds were flat to 1/4 point higher.  Mortgage securities gained 1/4 point, as investors shrugged off talk of a large sale of mortgage securities by a big thrift today.  Traders say that New West Federal Savings & Loan Association, a so-called "bad bank" that was established to hold the troubled assets of American Savings & Loan Association, will begin liquidating a mortgage-backed portfolio estimated at $13 billion.  New West is rumored to be planning to sell $500 million of Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities in competitive bidding through about five dealers today.  Officials at Ranieri Wilson & Co., which is said to be managing the sale, weren't available for comment.  New West was formed in late 1988 when the Federal Savings & Loan Insurance Corp. arranged the bailout of failed American Savings by a group led by Texas investor Robert Bass.  New West's portfolio is thought to be the largest thrift holding of mortgage-backed issues in the nation.  The anticipated New West sale would continue the heavy liquidation of mortgage securities by insolvent and solvent thrifts that has totaled billions of dollars in recent months.  Treasury Securities  Treasury bonds were modestly higher in light trading.  The market registered little reaction to two key economic reports released yesterday: the durable goods report for June and the employment cost index for the second quarter.  Traders said the reports were generally in line with what economists had expected.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at 108 13/32 to yield 8.12% while the latest 10-year notes were quoted at 107 13/32 to yield 8.0%.  Short-term rates were sharply lower.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was quoted late at 8.00% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.26% while six-month Treasury bills had a discount rate of 7.59% and a bond-equivalent yield of 7.98%.  Those rates are down from Monday's auction when the average discount rate was 8.09% for three-month bills and 7.73% for six-month bills.  Elsewhere, fixed-income markets are bracing for today's new supply of Treasury notes and agency bonds.  The Treasury will auction about $9 billion of new two-year notes.  In when-issued trading, the new two-year notes were quoted at a price to yield 7.75%, down slightly from Monday.  Meanwhile, the Federal Farm Credit Banks are scheduled to sell $805 million three-month bonds due Nov. 1, $1.14 billion six-month bonds due Feb. 1, 1990, and $645 million one-year bonds due Aug. 1, 1990, to settle Aug. 1.  Corporate Issues  Corporate bonds were 1/8 to 1/4 point higher in light trading.  In the new-issues market, Hertz Corp. offered $100 million senior subordinated notes due Aug. 1, 1996.  The 9 1/8% issue was priced to yield 9.15%.  Despite Paramount Communications Inc.'s withdrawal of its bid for Time Inc. on Monday, only one of Time's bond issues has seen any trading.  Ever since Paramount launched its bid for Time in early June, there has been virtually no trading in Time's paper as investors sat out the battle.  Prior to Paramount's bid, Time had planned a merger with Warner Communications.  The only Time issue that was traded yesterday was the 8 3/4% sinking-fund debentures due 2017.  The issued closed at 82, up 1 1/2 point on the day.  Municipal Issues  The summer doldrums persisted in the municipal market, as investors gave a mixed response to new issues.  Minnesota received what underwriters and the issuer characterized as aggressive bids for its $225 million general obligation bond issue.  But demand for the bonds as priced for reoffering wasn't overwhelming.  A balance of $126.9 million remained unsold late yesterday, according to winning lead underwriter Goldman Sachs & Co.  The Goldman Sachs group reoffered the bonds to yield from 5.85% in 1991 to 6.75% in 2007-2009.  The $11 million 1990 maturity was won by Chase Securities Inc. and reoffered to yield 5.85%.  Elsewhere in the new-issue market, a $58.7 million Cleveland general obligation issue was oversubscribed, according to lead underwriter Prudential-Bache Capital Funding.  The bonds were tentatively priced to yield from 5.90% in 1990 to about 6.97% in 2009.  Preliminary plans were announced for California's $3 billion revenue anticipation note sale.  A BankAmerica group currently plans to set preliminary pricing for the issue on Aug. 1.  The notes will be dated Aug. 8, 1989 and due June 29, 1990.  In the secondary market, New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% bonds due 2018 were up 1/8 to 99, to yield 7.28%.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities generally rose 1/4 point.  Ginnie Mae 9% securities for August delivery ended at 98 18/32, up 8/32, and its 9 1/2% securities at 100 18/32, up 7/32.  Freddie Mac's 9 1/2% issue closed at 99 18/ 32, up 8/32.  In the derivative market, Freddie Mac issued a $307.5 million Remic through Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp.  The deal is noteworthy because it has 18 classes, which may be a record in the six-year-old history of the derivative mortgage-backed market.  Foreign Bonds  Merrill Lynch & Co.'s international unit shook up the West German bond market by withdrawing a controversial Eurobond issue for Finnish Export Credit, a company based in Spain.  Redemption of the two-year issue, which was launched two weeks ago and denominated in marks, was linked to the exchange rate between the mark and the Spanish peseta at maturity.  It is being replaced with a two-year 15 1/8% annuity bond and currency warrants which Merrill says provides investors with the same cash flows.  Merrill's Frankfurt unit said it pulled the issue following consultations with the borrower and Spanish authorities who expressed concerns that "peseta-linked redemption issues might affect the orderly development of the peseta bond market."  As in the original offering, Merrill is sole manager.  Some traders say Merrill was forced to pull the deal because it violated certain guidelines.  Among other things, Spanish authorities want Euro-peseta deals to be lead-managed by banks in Spain.  Michael North, a syndicate manager in Merrill's Frankfurt office, said that the new offering "is a compromise we have reached with the Spaniards" and is in writing.  The original structure had been approved only orally, he says.  In other foreign markets:  -- Bonn's 7% issue due February 1999 ended 0.15 point higher at 102.30, to yield 6.66% while the 6 1/2% notes due 1994 were unchanged at 99.25 to yield 6.69%.  -- Japanese government bond prices moved higher again.  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 closed at a price of 96.79, up 0.32 yen per 100 yen face value.  The issue's yield fell to 5.125%.  -- British government bonds were narrowly mixed.  The Treasury's 11 3/4% issue due 2003/2007 rose 1/32 to 114 9/32, to yield 9.80% while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 fell 2/32 to 99 25/32, to yield 11.87%.  Uncertainty reigned in the financial markets, as stocks slipped after a midday rally, bond prices edged up on hints of easier credit, and the dollar was off against other major currencies.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average lost 1.90 points to 2583.08.  Trading was active, in contrast to the relatively sluggish mood in the bond and currency markets.  With no clear direction for the economy or for monetary policy to guide them, investors were hesitant to make any bold moves.  This allowed program trading to dominate stock-market activity and put a damper on other financial markets.  After a round of computer-driven program trading sent the Dow Jones industrials up more than 18 points to 2603 at noon EDT, sell programs and profit-taking pulled prices down more than 31 points from that peak.  Stocks recovered most of their losses by the close, however.  Some analysts speculated that investors are being torn between consumer-related stocks, which they perceive as safe in the event of a recession, and relatively low-priced cyclical stocks that could boom if the economy continues to grow.  But a key element in the possible resurgence of cyclical stocks is a further easing of credit by the Federal Reserve, and it isn't clear when that might happen.  Some fixed-income traders suggest that with the federal funds rate -- the interest rate banks charge one another for short-term loans -- hovering around 9 1/8% the past two days, the Fed may already have eased slightly.  Traders said that until Monday, the lower end of the range appeared to be 9 1/4%.  Other traders, however, are convinced the Fed wants more evidence of a slowing economy before it eases further.  That might come next week in the government's employment report for July.  If employment continues to grow at a sluggish pace and unemployment levels rise, the Fed might be more likely to ease further.  Yesterday's report on durable-goods orders didn't provide much help for uncertain investors.  Orders in June were up 0.3%, about in line with expectations.  But excluding defense-related goods, orders were off 0.7% after a revised decline of 4.3% in May.  Analysts said these orders tend to be volatile because they reflect defense-related spending and orders for such major items as airplanes and locomotives, which can skew the monthly figures.  In major market activity:  Stock prices were off marginally.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 179.3 million shares.  But advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of decliners, 772-684.  Bond prices rose.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year issue gained about a quarter-point, or $2.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  The yield slid to 8.12%.  The dollar declined.  In late New York trading, it was quoted at 1.8830 marks and 141.45 yen, compared with 1.8967 marks and 142.50 yen late Monday.  Twice in just 10 days during January, institutional investors dumped millions of Apple Computer Inc. shares on the over-the-counter market, sending the stock's price -- and James Shepherd, a Waco, Texas, investor -- on a roller coaster ride.  The day the computer maker said it would cut some Macintosh prices, its stock tumbled 7.7% as a breathtaking seven million shares changed hands.  Less than two weeks later, after Apple forecast lower quarterly earnings, the institutions yanked the stock down another 10% on record-shattering volume of 18.9 million shares.  Although Mr. Shepherd says he likes matching wits with the big boys, he doesn't like Apple's volatility.  "When it goes down like that, you lose -- even if you don't sell," he says.  He plans to unload some of his shares soon.  The quirky OTC market, long the arena for fledgling stocks and small investors, is falling to the big-money crowd.  Since 1982, institutional investors -- giant insurance companies, mutual funds and pension funds -- have increasingly become the dominant players.  That is evident in figures from the National Association of Securities Dealers Automated Quotation system, the computerized system that displays market makers' bid prices to buy and offer prices to sell the major OTC stocks.  In the first five months of this year, big-block trades -- an indicator of institutional activity -- accounted for 43% of total volume on Nasdaq's National Market System, where its largest stocks are traded.  That percentage increased steadily from 1983 to 1988, when it leveled off.  "The OTC market has always been the purview of the man on the street, but now it's the thundering herd that pushes the market higher or lower," says Binkley Shorts, who runs the $330 million Over-The-Counter Securities Fund.  "The OTC stocks the institutions are interested in have greater volatility and are a more dangerous game for individual investors."  The over-the-counter market also includes some 11,000 small issues known as pink-sheet stocks, after the hue of the pages on which they are quoted.  Many of these stocks have low prices, and most are thinly traded.  But Nasdaq, with some 4,500 larger OTC stocks, now is the second-largest equity market in the U.S., after the New York Stock Exchange, and the third-largest in the world, after New York and the Tokyo exchange.  Why have the institutions become so enamored of Nasdaq?  "Some of the bigger Dow Jones Industrials-type stocks have had big gains and are becoming too pricey for us," explains Mark Schoeppner, president of Quaker Capital Management, a Pittsburgh firm that invests money for corporate pension and profit-sharing programs.  "We end up in Nasdaq searching for other opportunities," he says.  The institutions arrived in the nick of time, rescuing OTC market makers after individual investors fled after the 1987 stock-market crash.  The defection of the little guys was principally responsible for a drop in the average daily volume of Nasdaq trading, which shrank 18% from year-end 1987 to year-end 1988.  Small investors still haven't returned in full force, but the institutions are taking up much of the slack.  Daily volume has averaged 133.4 million shares in 1989, up from about 123 million last year, though still short of the 150 million-or-so pace of 1987.  Besides much-needed trading volume, the institutions have brought Nasdaq respectability and liquidity.  Richard Bruno, who heads OTC trading at PaineWebber Inc. in New York, says proudly that the prestige attached to institutional trading "has given the biggest Nasdaq stocks visibility" and persuaded many companies to stay in the OTC market rather than move to the exchanges.  But Nasdaq's higher profile with big institutions has spawned some problems.  For one thing, securities firms complain that the institutions drive such hard bargains in their buying and selling that the firms' profits are being squeezed.  Far more alarming is the perception that, even in the wake of the crash, the OTC market is increasingly being battered by program trading.  This technique -- the rapid, computer-assisted trading of large blocks of stocks, often tied to movements in stock-index futures -- earlier drove individuals from the New York and American stock exchanges.  Peter DaPuzzo, head of retail equity trading at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. in New York, notes that 30 OTC stocks are in the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index, whose movements routinely trigger program trades.  Many individuals, scared off by the volatility, have retreated to smaller issues, many brokers say.  The shift has created, in effect, three OTC markets.  At the bottom are the thousands of small stocks that trade infrequently and gyrate wildly whenever a few shares do change hands.  In one day, the stock of SJNB Financial, a California bank holding company, tumbled 20% on volume of only 3,500 shares.  Institutions generally avoid such issues.  Somewhere in the middle is a group of companies with market values ranging from $50 million to $300 million.  These, the traditional OTC issues, have become the refuge of individual investors and extra-cautious fund managers such as the OTC Fund's Mr. Shorts, who hate being battered by the wide swings of stocks with big institutional followings.  On top are the OTC's glamour stocks, including such billion-dollar issues as Apple, MCI Communications, Liz Claiborne and LIN Broadcasting.  They have fallen under the dominance of the institutions, which like the ease with which they can buy and sell huge blocks.  Since 1985, the NASD says, institutions' stakes in Nasdaq's largest stocks have jumped to nearly 40% from 30%.  Institutional holdings of companies valued at $25 million or less have hardly grown at all.  The big OTC issues remain less volatile than exchange-listed stocks and those in the S&P 500-stock index, NASD statistics indicate.  But many investors and brokers aren't persuaded.  Harry Methner, a retired electronics technician in Denver who has owned shares of Apple since it went public in 1980, recalls other sessions such as the two in January that toppled the stock.  Often he would wake up at 3 a.m., wondering after especially volatile days whether to sell.  Now he just tightens his seat belt and tries to ignore the bumps.  "An individual investor can get whipsawed trying to keep up with them," he says.  The institutions can be mercurial.  In early May they took a shine to Price Co. and pushed the stock's price up 19%, from $40.50 a share to $47.50.  But on June 20 Price posted lower-than-expected quarterly results, and their ardor for the cash-and-carry wholesaler wilted.  Its stock plunged 14%, with 57% of the volume in blocks of 10,000 shares or more.  James Pappas, an OTC investment adviser in Redding, Conn., notes that institutions get corporate news first.  In acting on it, he says, they often trample the little guy.  Some small investors in Applied Biosystems Inc., one of Nasdaq's highflying biotechnology issues, were indeed run over recently.  Disappointed institutional investors hastily unloaded their holdings and plunged the stock into a 16% free fall after the Foster City, Calif., analytic-instruments maker forecast only a 15% fourth-quarter earnings increase.  Several bewildered shareholders, who hadn't heard the announcement, called the company the next day to ask why the stock had plunged.  In addition to issuing a news release about its earnings forecast, Applied Biosystems had sent its announcement to a wire service for brokerage-firm analysts, a company spokeswoman says, and faxed copies to brokerage houses and institutions that were large holders.  In explaining the company's actions, a spokeswoman confirms the individual investors' suspicions.  "Institutional investors aren't the only game, but they're the major game in town," she says.  "Therefore, making information and management available to them becomes important to maintaining a fair stock valuation."  Roger McNamee, the co-manager of T. Rowe Price's New Horizons Fund, contends that some institutions sell quickly because they don't know the full story and won't wait.  For them, he says, the motto is: "When in doubt, shoot it."  That is apparently what knocked down Helen of Troy Corp.'s shares last month.  About 90% of the company's hair-care products come from plants in China.  As the political protests in Beijing escalated, traders and brokers say, institutional investors, fearing that production would be disrupted, quickly dumped the El Paso, Texas, company's stock.  Helen of Troy officials tried to calm them by explaining that the plants are nearly 2,000 miles from Beijing and that the flow of products hadn't been disrupted.  But many institutions remained skeptical.  The stock slid 26% in three days, on an average daily volume of 960,000 shares -- 10 times normal.  Small investors' complaints about institutional bullying are echoed by OTC market makers.  They feel pinched because spreads -- the difference between bid and asked prices, which represent their profit on institutional trades -- have narrowed.  Spreads for individual investors average about 23 cents a share, according to NASD figures, while traders say spreads for institutions range from six to 13 cents a share.  At Nashville-based J.C. Bradford & Co. last month, an institutional customer berated an OTC trader for making too much money on a block trade.  Lou Todd, the chief equity trader, angrily recalls that the client "said he didn't ever want to see us make more than {about six cents a share} on a trade for him."  Mr. Todd says the brokerage firm's profits are being squeezed by such demands, but he still accepts the business because the institutions represent so much order flow.  "It's a quandary," he says.  Because of the institutions, market making -- maintaining orderly trading by buying and selling shares when imbalances develop -- now is "less profitable and involves more risk" for traders, says A. Cuyler Kline, who heads OTC trading at Atlanta's Robinson-Humphrey Co., a unit of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  Moreover, Shearson's Mr. DaPuzzo says institutional buyers expect market makers to fill part of their thousand-share orders immediately at the best available price and to negotiate with other market makers for the rest.  "That means we've got a lot of capital at risk with the potential of making only about 12 1/2 cents a share and losing anywhere from 25 cents a share to 50 cents," he says.  The institutions respond that they have an obligation to their investors to hold down trading expenses.  "We're not in a position to be crusaders for paying more money," comments Charles Utoft, who heads fixed-income and equity-trading operations for the giant IDS Financial Services unit of American Express Co.  Data on profits from OTC trading aren't available, but traders and some analysts believe the smaller firms are being squeezed especially hard.  Large firms, such as Shearson, Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. and big OTC market maker Herzog, Heine Geduld Inc., commit millions of dollars to market-making every day but can live with the tighter spreads and the increased risk because they handle so much institutional business.  "Institutional OTC trading is economically feasible only if you do a lot of it -- you can {afford to} lose on some if you can make a profit on most of it," Mr. DaPuzzo says.  And with so many small investors still hugging the sidelines, most securities firms rarely turn away institutional business.  As Lance Zipper, head of OTC trading at Kidder, Peabody & Co., notes, "There are a lot of dogs but only a few bones."  @ ---  @ Big Stocks and Big Blocks  @ Large block volume as a percentage of total volume for the most active Nasdaq stocks; first half of '89  @ BLOCK VOLUME  @ Apple Computer Inc. 54.2%  @ MCI Communications Corp. 60.2  @ Intel Corp. 59.1  @ Sun Microsystems Inc. 52.7  @ Seagate Technology Inc. 43.2  @ MiniScribe Corp. 45.8  @ Wheelabrator Group Inc. 72.1  @ Tele-Communications Inc. 52.5  @ Liz Claiborne Inc. 54.7  @ Oracle Systems Corp. 49.4  @ Source: NASD  When JCB Co. first tried to interest cash-happy Japanese in credit cards nearly three decades ago, it took a little ingenuity to spread the firm's name around.  A young JCB executive took to having himself paged over the public address system at train stations.  "They would call for 'Mr.  Sato of JCB,'" recalls Kazunao Murata, a senior executive vice president of JCB.  "It was free advertising."  Today, JCB and its trademark blue, red and green logo are among the best-known corporate symbols in Japan, synonymous with the rapid growth of consumer credit here in recent years.  The challenge now is to get JCB's name known in rich markets overseas, where credit cards long have been ubiquitous.  The company has lined up thousands of merchants overseas to accept its card from the swelling number of wealthy Japanese tourists, and it's beginning to add U.S. and European cardholders.  By offering a wide range of financial and travel perks, JCB hopes to win a significant following away from its big Western rivals.  That's no mean ambition.  Although JCB is the biggest bank-issued credit-card name in Japan, with some 16 million cardholders, or 39% of Japan's bank credit-card market, it's a relatively small player globally.  Visa International, for example, had 187.2 million cards in issue at the end of 1988, while American Express Co. has nearly 31 million cardholders.  Only 30,000 of JCB's cardholders -- less than 1% -- are outside Japan, mainly in Hawaii and Hong Kong, where the company has ties to local banks.  But Takashi Tanimura, JCB's president and chief executive, figures JCB can boost its proportion of foreign cardholders to 10% in the "immediate future" and hopes that eventually half of JCB's cardholders will be non-Japanese.  On July 1, as part of its effort to expand its foreign presence and serve its Japanese cardholders abroad, JCB opened a wholly owned subsidiary in Los Angeles, with branches in New York and Chicago.  Earlier this year, the company tied up with the Plus System and with Star System, two U.S. networks that will let JCB holders use their cards at more than 27,000 automatic teller machines in the U.S.  The company also has linked with a number of other credit-card transaction companies in the U.S. to increase the number of merchants who accept JCB.  In April, Holiday Inn Corp. agreed to accept JCB cards at 1,500 hotels in 52 countries.  In Europe, JCB now has London and Paris offices and is campaigning aggressively to win acceptance of its cards at a growing number of stores throughout the 12-nation European Community.  But JCB executives admit such tie-ups don't guarantee success.  Instead, they hope to advance in the world-wide market by providing better services than their rivals.  "Japanese consumers are never satisfied unless it's perfect," Mr. Tanimura says.  He argues that such nit-picking about efficiency and quality is the equivalent of boot-camp training for JCB.  Japanese consumers, for instance, until lately had been accustomed to paying for everything with cash.  So they don't like to wait while merchants get authorization to accept their cards.  JCB has sped up the process by laying down spending limits based on the kind of products cardholders are buying, not on the cardholder's overall credit-worthiness.  In Japan, where repayment of debts is a matter of great personal pride, that system seems to work.  JCB has a remarkably low default ratio -- around 0.4% of loans don't get repaid.  U.S. card issuers suffer a default ratio 10 times worse.  Still, Mr. Tanimura admits that JCB might have to modify its system for setting credit limits to suit overseas markets.  But he says JCB's other services may be easier and more profitable to export.  Take JCB's gift-certificate program.  Cardholders can use their JCB cards to buy gift certificates that are accepted by the same merchants that take JCB cards.  The advantage to JCB is two-fold: "Merchants pay commission and we get a float on the funds from the time of issuance to the time of use," Mr. Tanimura says.  JCB recently opened special resorts on the tropical Japanese island of Okinawa and near a ski area on the northern island of Hokkaido, and it plans to open similar resorts overseas.  JCB cards can be used to pay for discounted vacations at the resorts -- and JCB profits both from the resorts and on the use of money.  Other services that JCB offers include a monthly catalog of goods cardholders can order -- and do, to the tune of 30 billion yen ($210.9 million) last year.  The company also runs a service for cardholders who are dissatisfied with merchandise bought with JCB cards; rather than leaving it to cardholders to complain, JCB itself will protest to merchants.  The services may be expensive to provide, the company says, but they pay off by increasing the volume of business JCB does.  Interest income and handling charges from merchants add up handsomely.  Last year, on transactions valued at 1.7 trillion yen ($11.97 billion), JCB earned 8.5 billion yen ($59.7 million) before taxes, up 40% from a year earlier.  The remaining goal, Mr. Tanimira says, is to extend that success overseas.  "If the services we can provide enable us to survive in the tough Japanese market, we can survive in the world," he says.  ---  @ JCB's Growth  @ (For fiscal years ending Nov. 30)  @ NUMBER OF SALES  @ CARDHOLDERS VOLUME*  @ (In millions) (In billions)  @ 1985 8 $6.69  @ 1986 9 7.75  @ 1987 11 9.51  @ 1988 14 11.97  @ 1989 16** 14.76**  *At current exchange rate  **Company estimates  The Senate Finance Committee approved legislation that would raise the federal government's debt limit to $2.86 trillion through Oct. 31.  The measure, approved by a voice vote, also includes a Treasury-requested provision changing the way that federal debt issues are accounted under the debt limit.  Under the committee's approach, the debt ceiling would revert to the current level of $2.80 trillion Nov. 1, requiring Congress to act on another debt-limit bill this fall.  Congressional budget writers believe the longer-term extension could be used to enact a possible budget agreement between lawmakers and President Bush for fiscal 1991, which begins Oct. 1, 1990.  The Treasury estimates that the current debt ceiling will be met by mid-August, when Congress will be in a month-long recess.  The House has already approved a debt-limit increase to $3.12 trillion, estimated to be enough to fund government operations through September 1990, and is expected to go along with the short-term extension.  The committee-approved measure would also provide that Treasury-issued zero-coupon bonds, which pay interest upon maturity rather than periodically, be accounted for under the debt limit at their current accrual value rather than face value.  The effect would be to reduce the amount of federal borrowings subject to the debt limit by about $15 billion, according to the Finance Committee.  Last year, the Treasury issued zero-coupon bonds to help refinance Mexico's debt and may issue more in connection with other international debt problems and to deal with the savings-and-loan problem.  Sen. John Heinz said he would oppose the change when the full Senate considers the bill, perhaps as early as this week.  "It's just one more gimmick . . . to make our books look better now with a bigger bill later," the Pennsylvania Republican said.  Walk.  Sit.  Stay.  Roll over.  Go to court.  Such is the life of one German short-haired pointer, a show dog bearing the name CH. Robin Crest Lorien Corniche.  Cory, as he is called for short, isn't any run-of-the-litter critter.  The "CH." in his name stands for champion.  He has won 245 show awards as Best of Breed and 19 awards as Best in Show.  Basically, his problem comes from serving more than one master.  One of the dog's three owners thinks the kennel-club world has seen enough of Cory, who is four years old.  The other two owners think he has plenty of prizes still ahead.  In what is fast becoming a pit-bull match, the one owner, Anthony Attalla, is suing the other two, John and Rita Remondi, charging that they have been showing Cory even though he is officially retired (as announced in Dog News).  In the suit, filed in federal district court in Manhattan, Mr. Attalla says, "Cory has achieved the pinnacle of success . . . and any further competition would only diminish what he has accomplished."  Mr. Attalla claims that his work with Cory is no gravy train.  In the suit, he says that under the owners' agreement he lays out fees and other expenses for showing the animal and he decides when to show -- or to retire -- Cory.  So far, Mr. Attalla says, he's spent over $125,000, the amount sought in damages.  In return, he is entitled to all ribbons and awards.  The Remondis are in charge of caring for the dog.  Despite the retirement, the suit says, the Remondis showed Cory twice recently. (He placed fourth and then didn't place at all.) For now, a judge's order temporarily bars them from further shows.  In a memo filed in court, Mr. Remondi claims that Mr. Attalla retired the dog "simply and solely to better" the chances that Mr. Attalla's agent would win with a rival Rover.  The Remondis also say Mr. Attalla has bought a Rottweiler to show in another category and doesn't want to spend money on both Cory and the other dog.  They claim that Mr. Attalla has breached the pact by not paying certain expenses.  Stud fees are also at issue.  The Remondis argue that the retirement "fraudulently" deprives them of their opportunity to show Cory, a dog who they assert "is in the best condition of his life."  New orders for durable goods edged up 0.3% in June as higher bookings for electrical and nonelectrical machinery more than offset a decline in automobile orders, the Commerce Department said.  The modest increase, to $124.10 billion, followed a sharp 4.4% drop in May.  Excluding defense-related orders, which vary widely from month to month, orders fell 0.7% in June, following a 3.9% drop in May.  Economists said the report indicates the manufacturing sector is still struggling to attune itself to a slowed economy.  "We are going through a correction (stage) in the manufacturing sector," said Robert Dederick, chief economist at Northern Trust Co. in Chicago.  But Mr. Dederick said that, so far, the weaker orders haven't been accompanied by the kind of inventory buildup that usually precedes a recession.  Aubrey Zaffuto, vice president of IBJ Schroder Bank & Trust Co. in New York, agreed.  "Aside from weaknesses in the automobile industry, we don't see any signs of accumulation (of inventory)," she said.  "That bodes well for growth in the second half."  Nonelectrical machinery orders were up 3.7% in June after declining 2% in May.  Orders for electrical machinery rose 2.8%, following a drop of 6.1% the month before.  Sagging demand for cars held down orders for transportation equipment, which fell 3.5% last month.  In May, new orders for transportation equipment dropped 9.7% despite considerable gains in aircraft orders.  New orders for nondefense capital goods, considered an indication of future plant and equipment spending, rose 0.5% in June to an adjusted $37.49 billion, after declining 7.7% in May.  Shipments of durable goods slowed 1.1% in June to $121.6 billion, the fifth monthly decline this year.  The shipment slowdown caused unfilled orders to rise 0.5%, or $2.5 billion, to $470 billion.  Durable goods are generally items intended to last more than three years.  The figures are adjusted for seasonal variations.  All they ask for is a chance to compete.  But when Alfredo Santos tried to start a jitney-cab service in Houston, he says, the city told him he was breaking a 60-year-old ordinance restricting competition in municipal transit.  Marlene Young violated no laws in trying to set up a minibus line in the suburbs of Syracuse, N.Y.  She even had the strong support of local officials.  But state regulators blocked her plan, saying it might take too much business away from the existing privately owned bus company.  Wilfred Allick Jr. for years operated a charter-boat service in the U.S. Virgin Islands -- until the National Park Service closed it as part of an effort to reduce the number of competitors in the area.  Like thousands of others, these three entrepreneurs have learned firsthand one of the uglier truths of this nation's free-enterprise system: It's a lot freer for some businesses than others.  In industry after industry, government bodies have erected obstacles or outright bars to competition.  Though most are wrapped in the banner of protecting the public, they often simply protect existing practitioners, critics say.  "For the guys with the inside track, government can be your best friend," says Richard Givens, a New York City lawyer and former regional director of the Federal Trade Commission.  With government as a shield, a company "can protect its own turf to the detriment of other businesses and the public," he says.  Though there are no firm estimates, the economic costs of such government-sanctioned anti-competitiveness probably run into the tens of billions of dollars a year, says Paul Pautler, deputy director of economics at the FTC.  In 1986, for instance, the FTC studied state laws limiting the number of auto dealerships that can be opened in a given area.  Some three dozen states had passed such laws, usually at the urging of auto dealers, the FTC found.  It estimated that the reduced competition cost consumers $3 billion annually in higher car prices.  Many government-restricted occupations -- such as owning a cab or a beauty parlor -- are just the kind of relatively low-skill, low-capital business opportunities that should be within reach of poor people, says Walter Williams, an economics professor at George Mason University in Fairfax, Va., and author of a book on the subject.  But with stringent entry requirements that can cost thousands of dollars, these opportunities are denied many people, he argues.  Beyond dollars and jobs, adds Mr. Williams, "what is the moral basis in a free society for government to tell one person he can drive his own cab and another person that he can't?"  State-imposed barriers to entry are nothing new, dating back to at least the Middle Ages, when governments began sanctioning guilds in various crafts and started setting minimum competence requirements in such fields as medicine, according to S. David Young, author of a book about occupational licensing.  And some barriers clearly are necessary.  Nobody wants to be operated on by a brain surgeon whose only previous experience came carving the holiday turkey.  On the other hand, not everybody agrees on the need for government to restrict who can be a tree surgeon or a barber or a masseur or a landscape architect or many of the nearly 500 occupations that are licensed by one or more states.  Some states also set minimum fees for practitioners in some fields, such as moving companies.  The justification for all this regulation is "sometimes hard to understand," says Jeffrey Zuckerman, director of the FTC's bureau of competition.  Congress and the courts have given state and, to a lesser degree, local governments exemptions from federal antitrust laws, as Robert Fellmeth learned when he tried to attack the garbage-hauling monopoly in Chula Vista, Calif.  Mr. Fellmeth, a San Diego lawyer, filed suit against Chula Vista in federal district court in San Diego on behalf of two garbage haulers who, he says, wanted to compete for commercial customers with the private company chartered by the city.  Mr. Fellmeth won a summary judgment in 1983 but lost on appeal when the federal circuit court in San Francisco ruled the following year that the city had the power to grant an exclusive franchise.  Thomas Harron, Chula Vista's city attorney, says the city has stayed with one hauler because "we've had very good service, and the last thing we want to do is interrupt things when they are going well."  Indeed, says Mr. Fellmeth, the city was so happy with the hauler that it granted every rate increase the company requested for seven years in a row.  City officials don't dispute that statement.  Mr. Santos, the would-be jitney operator, filed suit in April in federal district court in Houston, charging the city with violating his "right to establish a business free from arbitrary, anachronistic, anticompetitive and excessive regulation."  The 37-year-old Mr. Santos, a Houston cab driver, started using his cab as a jitney in 1984 after discovering such a service on a visit to Mexico City.  A jitney is essentially a cross between a bus and a cab, usually following a relatively fixed route and charging a fixed rate per passenger.  Jitneys were very popular around the U.S. early in this century -- too popular, in fact, for streetcar companies, which persuaded many cities, including Houston, to enact laws barring jitneys, says Clint Bolick, Mr. Santos's attorney and director of the Landmark Legal Foundation Center for Civil Rights, a Washington, D.C., group that focuses on attacking government barriers to entrepreneurs.  The streetcar companies now are largely extinct, but the anti-jitney laws remain.  The cab companies and bus lines like the laws because they "limit competition," Mr. Santos says.  "I think people should have a choice."  An attorney for the city of Houston declines to comment while the matter is in litigation.  Ms. Young, the Syracuse area minibus promoter, also argued for choice to the state of New York, but a state administrative law judge wasn't moved.  In a written opinion turning down her application last month, the judge acknowledged that Ms. Young was "wholeheartedly" supported by local residents because the existing bus line "hasn't satisfied" users' needs.  But he added that Ms. Young's service could damage the existing bus company economically and, in the long run, hurt overall transportation service in the area.  He also questioned Ms. Young's financial capacity to operate the minibus service.  Ms. Young says she plans to appeal to higher state officials and is considering filing suit.  Mr. Allick, the boat operator, may have claim to the unkindest cut of all.  For 18 years, like his father before him, he took tourists to the Buck Island Reef National Monument, near St. Croix.  But in the mid-1970s, the National Park Service decided that too many charter-boat operators were going to Buck Island.  So it began licensing operators and regulating charter rates to stop "predatory" price cutting, says Leonard Hall, who is in charge of concessions for the Park Service in the southeastern U.S., which includes the Virgin Islands.  The process has apparently worked.  Where once there were 23 operators, only seven remain.  In fact, the Park Service is currently more worried about "price gouging" than price cutting, Mr. Hall says.  None of the operators whose licenses were terminated did anything to harm customers or the national monument, Mr. Hall concedes.  He adds that Mr. Allick was one of the best operators around.  Mr. Allick's transgression was that he needed a new mast on his sailboat and took longer to get his boat back in operation than the Park Service allowed.  So in 1982, the agency terminated his permit.  Mr. Allick worked for other charter-boat operators for a while.  Last year he reapplied for a Buck Island permit but was turned down; the Park Service says it isn't giving out any new permits.  Now Mr. Allick is trying to start his own charter service to other sites in the area.  He is also considering filing suit through the Landmark Legal Foundation.  "I get very frustrated," he says.  "I just want to make an honest living."  Ashton-Tate Corp. reported a $19.8 million loss and sharply lower revenue for its second quarter, largely because of a backlog of unsold inventory on distributors' shelves and the partial write-off of a 1986 acquisition.  The Torrance, Calif., software firm, which is best known for a data-base program that runs on personal computers, also announced that Luther J. Nussbaum, president and chief operating officer, had resigned over differences in "management philosophy" with Edward M. Esber Jr., Ashton-Tate's chairman and chief executive officer.  The developments are the latest in a series of problems at Ashton-Tate, once one of the software industry's stars.  The firm faces growing competition in its core data-base business and suffers from the painful effects of a decision earlier this year to scale back excessive product shipments to distributors.  It also is under intense pressure to deliver a new version of its flagship dBASE product.  The sluggish performance of many of its other products, meanwhile, prompted the firm to reorganize its software-development effort two weeks ago.  Ashton-Tate warned investors last month of the impending loss, but underestimated it by nearly $5 million.  Revenue fell 21% to $59.5 million compared with $71.9 million in the fiscal second quarter ended July 31, 1988.  The company this year switched to a calendar year from a fiscal year.  Profit in the 1988 quarter totaled $11.5 million, or 44 cents a share.  Of the loss in the latest quarter, 40% resulted from a write-off of rights and inventories related to the Decision Resources product line acquired in 1986, the company said.  Ashton-Tate said it could post a loss for the third quarter.  In national over-the-counter trading, Ashton-Tate shares dropped $1.75 to close at $14.50.  Mr. Esber denied that Mr. Nussbaum was being held responsible for Ashton-Tate's problems.  "Nobody is intending here to pick scapegoats," he said in an interview.  A former executive with Businessland Inc., a computer and software retailer, Mr. Nussbaum brought much-needed organization to Ashton-Tate's ranks.  But former employees say he antagonized numerous employees and was partly responsible for the high turnover among senior executives.  Mr. Nussbaum wasn't available for comment.  Mr. Esber said he will assume Mr. Nussbaum's job of daily management of Ashton-Tate.  That could be good news for the company, since Mr. Esber remains highly regarded despite the company's recent stumble.  "If anyone was going to win out in a fight for control it was going to be Esber," said Tim Bajarin, executive vice president of Creative Strategies Research International, Santa Clara, Calif.  The most immediate problem facing Mr. Esber is to ensure the completion of dBase4 version 1.1.  Copies of the program are being tested by outsiders, but the final version may not be shipped until the fourth quarter, a spokesman said.  Ashton-Tate's first version of dBase4 received a lackluster response, prompting the firm to embark on an improved version.  Regardless of how long it takes to ship the new dBase, Mr. Esber said the company won't succumb to the lure of easy sales obtained by booking as sales, shipments of inventory that distributors don't need.  "We're not going to resort to old patterns of loading up the channel," he said.  Joseph A. Rice, former chairman and chief executive officer of Irving Bank Corp., was elected to the board of this oil and gas investment firm, filling a vacancy.  Mycogen Corp. said David H. Rammler, a co-founder of the biotechnology concern, resigned as chairman.  Mr. Rammler, a partner in Vanguard Associates, a Menlo Park, Calif., venture-capital firm, will remain a director of Mycogen.  Mycogen's president and chief executive officer, Jerry D. Caulder, was named to succeed Mr. Rammler as chairman.  "He's done a super job.  It was time to elevate him" to the additional post, said Mr. Rammler.  Mycogen posted a $185,000 net loss for the third quarter ended June 30, compared with a $1.2 million net loss a year ago.  Revenue was $2.9 million, compared with $1.6 million in the year-earlier quarter.  In the first nine months, the net loss narrowed to $1.7 million from $2.8 million on a 44% increase in revenue to $6.2 million from $4.3 million.  South Africa's inflation rate, as measured by the consumer price index, rose 15.7% in June from a year earlier, the government's Central Statistical Services said.  June's CPI rose to 177.7 points from 153.6 points a year earlier and was up 1% from May's 175.9.  May's year-to-year increase was 14.9%.  The June food index was 188.1 points, up 11.2% from 169.2 points in May 1988.  May's year-to-year increase was 9.3%.  Japan's crude-oil imports declined 8.9% in June to 13.8 million kiloliters when compared with a surge in the year-earlier month, the Ministry of International Trade and Industry said.  Ministry officials said domestic demand for oil products remained strong owing to robust economic expansion, and output of oil products showed gains in the month.  Officials said oil importers rushed to make purchases around this time last year because of the impending imposition of an oil tax.  The large imports in the year-earlier month made those in June this year look small in comparison, officials said.  Pantera's Corp. said Stephen I. D'Agostino, chairman of Lord Capital Corp., was named chairman and chief executive officer of this owner of the Pizza Inn chain.  Mr. D'Agostino succeeds Jack D. Harris, who was named a vice chairman.  David C. Fraser, president of Lord Capital, also was named a vice chairman of Pantera's.  Pantera's also said it has hired Lord Capital, a New York merchant bank, to help it raise new equity and restructure its bank debt.  Pantera's said there isn't any assurance that it will be able to obtain the additional equity or restructure debt.  The company recently said it doesn't believe it can make about $4.7 million in loan payments due Aug. 1.  It also said that discussions with its lenders had ended and that its cash reserves are depleted, despite a December stock offering that raised about $4 million, and a $1.5 million infusion from a shareholder who exercised warrants in May.  Pantera's also said it expects to report a substantial loss for its fourth quarter ended June 30.  Robert L. McGeehan, formerly director of this carbide products and cutting-tools company's metalworking systems division, was elected president, succeeding Quentin C. McKenna, who remains chairman and chief executive officer.  Mr. McGeehan also was elected to the Kennametal board, succeeding Karl von der Heyden, who recently resigned.  Collagen Corp., based here, said it bought Hercules Inc.'s stake in Epicor Inc., a joint venture set up by Collagen and Hercules to develop wound-healing products.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The transaction gives Collagen complete ownership of Epicor, which was established in 1987.  Hercules is a Wilmington, Del., cellulose and resins concern.  Collagen, which develops products that help human tissue heal, closed at $16.75 in national over-the-counter trading yesterday, down 62.5 cents.  F. Gregory Fitz-Gerald, 48 years old, was named a principal at this private investment banking firm.  He had been executive vice president of Primerica Corp., which he joined after its 1988 merger with Commercial Credit Corp., where he was executive vice president, corporate services.  Michael Henning, 49 years old, was named managing partner of this accounting and consulting firm's New York office in charge of the client practice.  Stephen Key, 46, was named managing partner of the New York office's financial services practice, while John Schreyer, 50, was named managing partner of the metropolitan office, which serves smaller-sized businesses in New York.  Ernst & Young was formed by the recent merger of Ernst & Whinney and Arthur Young & Co. Mr. Henning was managing partner of Ernst & Whinney's New York office, while Mr. Key was managing partner of the New York office of Arthur Young.  Mr. Schreyer was managing partner of Arthur Young's metropolitan office.  Gerald Loev was named a senior vice president of this insurance and financial services company and to the new position of chief management information officer for its Prudential Investment Corp. investment arm.  He had been a partner in the systems practice of Booz, Allen & Hamilton Inc.  James K. Bakken was elected to the board of this maker of automotive parts, succeeding Robert Magill whose term had expired.  Mr. Bakken, 65 years old, recently retired as vice president, corporate quality for Ford Motor Co. where he had worked for 43 years.  A seat on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange was sold for $510,000, the same price as in the previous sale on July 14.  Seats are quoted at $500,000, bid, and $540,000, asked.  The record price for a full membership on the exchange is $550,000, set last March 9.  JUDGE GOES PRIVATE: Judge Ruby Kless Sondock, presiding judge of the 234th Judicial Court of Harris County, Texas, is stepping down from the bench to join the New York law firm of Weil, Gotshal & Manges.  Judge Sondock, 63 years old, will be a litigation counsel to the Houston office of the 500-lawyer firm.  Judge Sondock became the first woman to serve full time on the Texas Supreme Court when she was appointed in 1982 to serve out the term of a judge who had died.  She returned to her seat as presiding judge after completing that term.  REAL ESTATE LAWYERS MOVE ON: Richard J. Kane, Ronald G. Todd, Arthur C. Silverman, Michael M. Meadvin and Susan L. Robbins, formerly real-estate partners at the New York firm of Golenbock & Barell, joined Reid & Priest, also of New York.  Mr. Kane, 48, and Mr. Todd, 43, specialists in structuring deals, joined the 150-lawyer firm as partners, as did Mr. Silverman, 51, an expert in construction law.  Mr. Meadvin, 38, also a construction law specialist, joined as counsel, as did Ms. Robbins, 37, a real-estate leasing expert.  Telos Corp. won a $40.1 million Army contract for automatic data-processing maintenance.  Continental Maritime of San Diego received a $27.8 million Navy contract for ship overhaul.  Texas Instruments Inc. was given a $13.5 million Navy contract for radar-system parts.  PCS Inc., a provider of computer-based processing of prescription drug claims, said Donald B. Dahlin, 38 years old, resigned as president and chief executive officer, effective next Monday, for "personal reasons."  A successor wasn't named.  PCS, 86%-owned by San Francisco-based McKesson Corp., said Mr. Dahlin, who joined the company in 1981, informed the board June 15 of his desire to leave.  A spokesman for PCS said Mr. Dahlin wasn't asked by the board to resign.  Mr. Dahlin couldn't be reached for comment.  The company said that it entered into a severance agreement with Mr. Dahlin and that the expense will be charged against earnings for the second quarter ending Sept. 30.  The spokesman declined to detail terms of the agreement.  Zurn Industries Inc., an energy and environmental products concern, said it definitively agreed to sell a 30% equity interest in the Honey Lake Power Facility in Wendel, Calif., to a buyer that wasn't identified.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Zurn said it expects the sale will boost second-quarter earnings to the "mid-50 cent {a share} range."  Zurn had year-earlier profit of $5.6 million, or 46 cents a share.  Upon completion of the sale, Zurn will own a 7% stake in the project, a 30,000-kilowatt plant, which the company also said it will operate for 10 years.  B.F. Goodrich Co. and Phelps Engineered Plastics said they mutually agreed to terminate the letter of intent regarding the sale of Goodrich's marine products and services business unit.  The unit, which makes reinforced rubber sonar domes for the U.S. Navy, employs approximately 150 people and had 1988 sales of about $12 million.  THE BOOK "The Soul of a New Machine" chronicles the development of an advanced computer at Data General Corp.  The company was identified incorrectly in a story about Convex Computer Corp. in an earlier edition.  (See: "Technology: Convex Computer Looks to Big Future in Tiny Niche" -- WSJ July 24, 1989)  Hong Kong's tourist arrivals rose 8.3% in May to 533,692 visitors from 492,659 a year earlier, following April's 18.4% rise, the Hong Kong Tourist Association said.  The figures reflect a slowing trend that is expected to have become even more pronounced in June, as China's political turmoil caused visitors to scuttle trips to the region.  Hong Kong's tourist arrivals jumped 24.2% last year.  The June arrival figures won't be available for another month.  But hotel industry officials have said occupancy levels in leading properties have dropped off as much as 25 to 30 percentage points in the weeks following the June 3-4 massacre in Beijing's Tiananmen Square.  The current account of France's balance of payments widened in May to a seasonally adjusted 5.020 billion francs ($776 million) from a revised 3.446 billion francs in April, according to preliminary figures released by the Economics Ministry.  The ministry said April's deficit was revised downward from a previously estimated shortage of 4.048 billion francs.  The May deficit brought the accumulated current account deficit over the first five months of this year to three billion francs, compared with a surplus of 4.6 billion francs a year earlier.  On an unadjusted basis, the May current account data show a deficit of 6.4 billion francs, up from 2.7 billion francs in April.  April's deficit was revised upward from a previously estimated deficit of 3.275 billion francs.  ALBERTO-CULVER Co. recently reported that net income in its third quarter ended June 30 was $8.3 million, or 63 cents a share, on sales of $182.2 million.  In an earlier edition, a story provided projections for the company instead of actual earnings.  (See: "Alberto-Culver Says Its 3rd-Quarter Profit Increased 15% or More" -- WSJ July 24, 1989)  Annualized interest rates on certain investments as reported by the Federal Reserve Board on a weekly-average basis:  @ Week Ended:  @ July 21, July 14,  @ 1989 1989  @ Treasury bills (90 day)-a 7.97 7.77  @ Commrcl paper (Dealer, 90 day)-a 8.65 8.63  @ Certfs of Deposit (Resale, 90 day) 8.75 8.71  @ Federal funds (Overnight)-b 9.24 9.31  @ Eurodollars (90 day)-b 8.81 8.91  @ Treasury bills (one year)-c 7.96 7.85  @ Treasury notes (three year)-c 7.89 7.80  @ Treasury notes (five year)-c 7.88 7.81  @ Treasury notes (ten year)-c 8.07 8.01  @ Treasury bonds (30 year)-c 8.14 8.05  a-Discounted rate. b-Week ended Wednesday, July 19, 1989 and Wednesday July 12, 1989. c-Yields, adjusted for constant maturity.  Reuters Holdings PLC said first-half pretax profit rose 32% as the information-systems company continued with a cost-cutting program begun in the wake of the October 1987 market crash.  Pretax profit rose to #135.9 million ($220.6 million) from #102.9 million in the first half of 1988.  Profit after tax rose 35% to #85.3 million, or 20.6 pence per share, from #63.4 million, or 15.1 pence a share.  Total revenue increased 16% to #548.3 million from #471.4 million, but the company said revenue growth was constrained by a sharp fall in sales of large tradingroom systems.  However, revenue from the core information service operations and from smaller trading-room systems rose by nearly 20% in the first half.  Reuters said it plans to consolidate development work on its trading-room systems in Chicago, closing the London end of the operation.  The reorganization will result in the elimination of about 15 jobs out of 65 involved in trading-room systems in London, the company said.  Glen Renfrew, chief executive and managing director, hinted there may be further job losses as part of cost-cutting efforts.  Last year, Reuters trimmed 550 jobs.  Mr. Renfrew said Reuters will launch its Globex system by year end, despite continued talks about the electronic futures-trading system between the Chicago Mercantile Exchange and the Chicago Board of Trade.  The system, the first major U.S. effort at world-wide futures trading by computer, was designed by Reuters and the Chicago Merc.  The Board of Trade has criticized Globex, saying it is susceptible to manipulation and would markedly reduce liquidity in the market.  Peter R. Lessler was elected senior vice president, planning and acquisitions, at this business information services provider.  He had been vice president, acquisitions.  The Canadian government is preparing for a political battle over its plan to introduce a value-added consumption tax in 18 months.  "It's a political time bomb that could cost the government the next election," warned John Bulloch, president of the Canadian Federation of Independent Business, which represents small- and medium-sized businesses.  The move is being watched closely by U.S. advocates of such a tax, who contend it would help the U.S. government correct its big budget deficit.  The value-added tax is a type of sales tax imposed on goods and services at each stage of production and distribution in proportion to the value added to them at every stage.  The planned Canadian levy, named the Goods and Services Tax, is similar to Japan's unpopular new consumption tax, which contributed to the Liberal Democratic Party's defeat Sunday in the Diet's upper house election.  Strategies for promoting the multistage tax are expected to be a main topic today at meetings of Prime Minister Brian Mulroney's cabinet and of the caucus of the ruling Progressive Conservative Party.  The government says the new levy, by replacing an outmoded federal retail sales tax, will boost Canada's economic growth and exports.  It also is expected to provide the government with a major new source of funds to narrow its budget gap, which is proportionately larger than the U.S. deficit.  Critics say the new tax will push up consumer prices, will hurt some key industries, and will impose a heavy administrative load on small businessmen.  The new tax will be imposed at a 9% rate on most transactions, from haircuts to car sales, effective Jan. 1, 1991.  This will be in addition to provincial sales taxes, in all provinces except Alberta, which range to as much as 12%.  Businesses throughout the production and distribution chain, including retailers, are to levy the new tax on their domestic sales.  They are to be able to claim a credit for any tax paid on goods and services purchased for their business.  The ultimate burden of the tax will fall on the consumer.  The existing federal levy, which is to be replaced by the new tax, has a general rate of 13.5%, but applies directly only to about a third of the goods and services purchased by Canadians.  The new tax is to be fully removed from Canada's export sales, but imports are to be fully taxable.  This will give Canada's merchandise trade surplus a bigger immediate boost than the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement, predicted the Conference Board of Canada, a research and advisory group.  The Canadian government says the new sales tax system will benefit Canada's resource and other primary industries, and its construction, transportation and utilities industries.  However, some Canadian industries, including tourism, securities and restaurant businesses, say they will be hurt by the tax change and are pressing the government for concessions.  The restaurant industry faces the possibility more Canadians will eat at home because tax-free status has been accorded to "basic groceries."  Pizza, milk and chicken purchased in grocery stores would be tax free.  But the same products sold in school cafeterias and fast-food restaurants would be fully taxable, said the Canadian Restaurant and Foodservices Association.  Securities industry spokesmen warned that many securities transactions will be shifted out of Canada for execution if they are subject to the new tax in Canada.  Insurance and financial services are given special treatment under the value-added tax laws of most countries.  The government estimates that the introduction of the new tax will result in a one-time increase of 2.5% to 3% in average retail prices in 1991.  But some companies predict their prices will rise much more sharply.  Dylex Ltd., a Toronto-based clothing concern, predicted that the new tax and regular inflation would likely mean a one-year jump of 15% or 16% in retail clothing prices.  Unlike many other businesses, retail clothing hasn't previously been subject to federal sales tax.  The government is to disclose further details of its sales tax plan, including draft legislation, next month.  The final legislation, to be introduced in the fall, is expected to be approved by Parliament.  Canada would be the latest of more than 45 countries to adopt a type of value-added consumption tax in the last 20 years.  Its planned tax is somewhat broader than the value-added tax systems of most countries, but it doesn't cover as many goods and services as a model value-added tax statute prepared by the American Bar Association's Value Added Tax committee.  The model statute is available to Congress if it should consider a national sales tax.  James A. Taylor, 64 years old, resigned as a director of this thrift holding company, decreasing board membership to eight.  Mr. Taylor, who said he stepped down "to consider other opportunities" that he declined to identify, earlier this year resigned as Citadel's chairman, president and chief executive officer, citing health reasons.  PNC Financial Corp. said directors authorized a common stock-repurchase program involving as many as 1.4 million common shares.  The bank holding company said it will buy back the shares from time to time and will use the shares primarily for employee benefit and other stock issuance plans.  PNC Financial has about 93.5 million common shares outstanding.  PNC shares closed yesterday at $44.875, off 75 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Amstrad PLC, a British maker of computers and communications equipment, said it is recalling its PC 2000 computer, a model designed to spearhead the company's bid to win customers away from International Business Machines Corp.  Shipments of the computer were suspended in April.  Also that month, Amstrad warned of lower-than-expected earnings for the fiscal year that ended June 30.  Amstrad said the model's problem centered on a chip in its hard-disk controller unit.  "The hard-disk failure rate, whilst low, is unacceptable to us," said Amstrad's chairman, Alan Sugar.  "Rumors in the market suggest wholesale failure and we can't allow our reputation to be damaged."  Amstrad said it will correct the faults of the 7,000 computers sold and relaunch the range in September.  Recalled units will be replaced immediately with new stock fitted with a re-engineered hard-disk controller circuit.  The Justice Department, calling local phone companies "virtual monopolists," said the Federal Communications Commission shouldn't substitute price-cap regulation for the traditional rate-of-return system.  The commission has proposed capping rates on telephone companies' interstate service, similar to a plan it adopted last spring for American Telephone & Telegraph Co.  The plan would replace the current system under which regulators set a rate of return on a company's investment base.  In a filing with the FCC, the department's antitrust division said it supports the notion of giving local phone companies incentives to operate more efficiently.  But it said the FCC plan won't work.  "While AT&T faces increasing competition in nearly all of its markets," the Justice Department wrote, "the {local exchange carriers} are virtual monopolists with respect to residential and most business customers, and appear likely to retain their monopoly position for the foreseeable future."  In crafting its proposal, the FCC devised safeguards to prevent the companies from abusing their monopoly powers.  For example, a so-called automatic stabilizer would allow rates to be adjusted annually when a company's rate of return was two or more percentage points higher or lower than the allowed rate of return.  But the Justice Department said these measures require monitoring that essentially keeps rate-of-return regulation in place and may boost administrative costs, while maintaining inefficiencies inherent in the current system.  Instead of price caps for the local carriers, the department recommended lengthening the time between rate reviews as an incentive to improve efficiency.  The department also suggested automatic rate adjustments to reflect changes in certain costs and giving the phone companies some flexibility to cut rates to respond to new competition.  The department had signaled problems with the proposal for local phone companies in late 1987, when it enthusiastically embraced rate caps for AT&T but concluded that advantages "may be somewhat less" for the local companies.  The regional Bell companies, which have been eager to shift to a more flexible regulatory arrangement, were generally disappointed with the Justice Department's conclusions.  The timetable for FCC action on the price-cap plan is uncertain.  The agency is undergoing a major transition and isn't likely to take up the matter soon.  Chairman Dennis Patrick, who championed price caps for both AT&T and the local phone companies as a way to encourage more efficient operation of telephone companies, plans to leave the commission next month.  Also, Commissioner Patricia Diaz Dennis, whose term expired in June and is interviewing for a new job, has recused herself from most major telecommunications matters; she can sit on the commission until a successor is confirmed.  In the meantime, confirmation hearings haven't been scheduled for three nominees, including Alfred Sikes, who has been chosen to succeed Mr. Patrick.  Monday, July 24, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2% to 11%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 3/16% high, 9% low, 9 1/8% near closing bid, 9 1/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, July 24, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 8.09%, 13 weeks; 7.73%, 26 weeks.  CALL MONEY: 10% to 10 1/4%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.85% 30 to 38 days; 8.75% 39 to 59 days; 8.50% 60 to 89 days; 8.375% 90 to 119 days; 8.25% 120 to 149 days; 8.125% 150 to 179 days; 7.75% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000:8.95% 30 days; 8.80% 60 days; 8.70% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.51% one month; 8.44% two months; 8.40% three months; 8.21% six months; 8.17% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market:8.95% one month; 8.75% three months; 8.65% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.88% 30 days; 8.68% 60 days; 8.52% 90 days; 8.42% 120 days; 8.27% 150 days; 8.20% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9 1/8% to 9% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% four months; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% five months; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9 1/8% one month; 9% three months; 8 13/16% six months; 8 5/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.88%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par).9.81%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.80%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 9.02%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Things once thought impossible in Japanese politics suddenly have become possible.  The severity of the ruling Liberal Democratic Party's defeat in Sunday's upperhouse parliamentary election and the resignation of Prime Minister Sosuke Uno have created a level of uncertainty unknown since the LDP took power 34 years ago.  Will the LDP be able to retain control of the government, or will the opposition parties unite and claim leadership?  Will the LDP reform itself without changing its basic structure, or will it splinter?  Will politicians abandon the traditional back-room maneuvering that has ignited public anger, or will the public slip back into apathetic acceptance of business-as-usual?  Both the battered ruling party and the resurgent opposition already have set out to shape the answers to those questions.  LDP leaders held emergency meetings to start deciding who will replace Mr. Uno, who held the premiership for only two months.  And the opposition -- led by the Japan Socialist Party, which won more of the seats contested Sunday than any other party -- aimed at forcing early elections for the more-powerful lower house of parliament.  The LDP lost its majority in the upper house Sunday but still holds a majority in the lower house.  But both sides will encounter potential pitfalls.  For the LDP, the way in which it selects a replacement for Mr. Uno may prove crucial to improving the party's image: If the leaders of various LDP factions select the next party president and de facto prime minister through their usual behind-the-scenes deal-making, it will only aggravate the party's image of arrogant disregard for the public.  Within hours of Mr. Uno's resignation announcement, party elders and concerned junior members were calling for an open election in the name of democracy.  The list of candidates looks painfully familiar.  It includes former Prime Minister Takeo Fukuda; former chief cabinet secretary Masaharu Gotoda; the LDP's "Mr.  Clean," Masayoshi Ito; the current party secretary general, Ryutaro Hashimoto; and faction leader Toshio Komoto.  Many of them were approached by party leaders before Mr. Uno accepted the job.  They rejected the offer then, or were passed over, and the outlook is similarly bleak today.  Meanwhile, most political analysts expect the opposition to succeed in forcing elections for the lower house before year end, thereby denying the LDP more time to recoup some of its lost popularity.  The opposition parties plan to make good on a key campaign pledge by jointly introducing a bill to abolish the wildly unpopular consumption tax sponsored by the LDP and imposed in April.  That kind of bill is sure to entangle the lower house in endless wrangling, building immense pressure for an election.  If the opposition succeeds with this ploy, however, it will face much deeper challenges.  The four non-Communist opposition parties agree on several short-term issues but are bitterly opposed in their underlying policies.  The Socialists, strained between hardline and moderate elements, would have to move toward the middle of the road to win the cooperation of the centrist Democratic Socialist Party and Komeito (Clean Government Party).  The power the opposition might be able to command if it can unify was demonstrated Sunday by the startling success of a new party -- Rengo, an organization created by the main labor organization and backed by all four opposition parties.  In direct battles against incumbent LDP politicians in the ruling party's traditional rural strongholds, Rengo captured 11 of the 12 seats it sought.  Rengo members plan to encourage a coalition.  And the Socialists proved Sunday to have broadened their base beyond the solid support of unions, a growth that should give them more flexibility.  Thanks largely to the charisma and drive of Takako Doi, the only woman to lead a political party, the Socialists galvanized support from citizens' action groups.  Even some of the business mainstream, while worried about the LDP's fate, now thinks it would be worthwhile to make friends with the Socialists.  Eishiro Saito, the head of Japan's largest business organization, Keidanren, said his organization would like to engage in policy dialogue with the opposition.  But the LDP will provide a stiff challenge to Socialist attempts to form a coalition.  The ruling party will woo the centrist parties, whose policies are largely in tune with the LDP's, enticing them with a virtually guaranteed access to power.  The centrist parties -- the Democratic Socialists and Komeito -- probably won't side with the LDP before a lower-house election, because it would lose them votes, party members and political analysts say.  Afterwards, however, most analysts expect them to eagerly climb aboard.  The Socialists also are hampered by what has long seemed to be an innate lack of will to take power.  And it isn't certain that the sudden political awakening of voters that led to Sunday's reversal of fortunes is sustainable.  Polls suggest people want more balance in government; much of the opposition support came from anti-LDP, not pro-opposition, votes.  But Japan's population is intrinsically cautious and polls also show an overwhelming preference for an LDP-led coalition government.  "People are consoled by the fact that they consider the LDP won't be so easily toppled," said Nobuo Tomita, a professor of politics at Meiji University.  "People consider the LDP needs a good spanking."  Bank of Yokohama Ltd.'s offer for Guinness Mahon Holdings PLC closed with 84.8% of the British merchant bank's shares committed to the Japanese bank.  Bank of Yokohama's friendly bid, which values the whole of Guinness Mahon at #94.5 million ($153.4 million), is expected to be declared unconditional by Friday.  British newspaper publisher Robert Maxwell has said he intends to retain a 10% holding in Guinness Mahon while selling a 4.5% stake, the balance of his shares, to Bank of Yokohama.  The Japanese bank was chosen in May as the preferred buyer of a 61% stake in Guinness Mahon held by Equiticorp International PLC's creditor banks.  Equiticorp International's liquidation left the banks holding the Guinness Mahon shares as collateral for the loan Equiticorp used to finance the original purchase of the stake.  When Giuseppe Vita became Schering AG's chairman and chief executive officer last month, one of West Germany's most globally oriented companies became even more international.  The 54-year-old Sicilian is the first non-German national to head a major West German concern.  But even before Mr. Vita's appointment, the pharmaceutical and chemical company looked beyond West Germany's borders.  About 80% of its sales are generated abroad, and foreigners hold more than half of its shares.  Schering will continue to expand abroad, with particular emphasis on the U.S. and Japan, Mr. Vita says.  "We want to emphasize that our future is more oriented toward the foreign markets," he says.  "We have a strong position in West Germany, but we see greater chances abroad."  Schering, analysts say, is at the forefront of a trend, in preparation for the single European market scheduled for the end of 1992, in which many European companies are likely to adopt a more multicultural corporate identity.  The company (unrelated to the U.S. concerns R.P. Schering Corp. and Schering-Plough Corp.) is "more international in their approach than any other company here," says Kiran Bhojani, chemical analyst at Schroeder, Muenchmeyer, Hengst & Co. in Frankfurt.  "Perhaps it has something to do with being based in Berlin.  They have to go out more than others, and that has an effect on their mentality."  Schering's main targets for expansion aren't the other European Community countries, where the company has a strong position and generates 33% of its sales, Mr. Vita says; rather, it is aiming at the U.S. and Japan, where it is still relatively weak.  To pursue this goal, Schering will focus on strategic cooperation and joint ventures with other pharmaceutical companies, but will resist the merger wave in the global pharmaceutical industry and remain independent, he says.  Taking advantage of the boom in pharmaceuticals, Schering is about to step up its investment program in the U.S. and Japan, Mr. Vita says.  While Schering dominates Europe's oral-contraceptive market, it is still in fifth or sixth place in the U.S. with a market share of only 3.5%.  After breaking even for the first time last year in the U.S., the company now wants to boost its investment outlays and focus increasingly on marketing.  Schering is aiming to gain a 5% U.S. market share in oral contraceptives in 1990 and slowly move up to third place, Mr. Vita says.  This would translate into a 1% share of the total U.S. pharmaceutical market.  "In three or four years, I hope, we will have an acceptable pharmaceutical presence in the U.S.," he says.  "If our financial situation permits us to invest further, we will."  Even Schering's dividend policy is oriented toward foreign investors, analysts say.  Because foreign investors don't get the 56% tax credit that is added to the dividend to West German investors, Schering last year complemented its regular payout of 12 marks ($6.29) a share with a 5% stock dividend.  Partly because of Schering's concern for foreign investors, "They are very popular abroad," says Schroeder Muenchmeyer's Mr. Bhojani.  Of Schering's total capital, 21% is held by British institutions, 18% in Swiss accounts, and 2% in the U.S., according to company figures.  Mr. Vita confirms a Schering forecast of more than 10% profit growth for 1989.  In 1988, net income climbed 9.8% to 157 million marks ($82.3 million) from 143 million marks, as sales increased 12% to 5.27 billion marks from 4.7 billion marks.  Mr. Vita says he expects continuing profit growth: "I'm optimistic because we have a series of products with strong potential in the market."  Ameriana Savings Bank said its board has approved a plan to reorganize into a holding company structure with Ameriana becoming the subsidiary of newly formed Ameriana Bancorp.  The banking concern said that under the plan, shareholders will exchange their common stock for an equal number of shares in the new holding company.  Ameriana said implementation of the plan is subject to the approval of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board and Ameriana shareholders.  A special meeting of shareholders will be held later this year to vote on the plan.  Fleet/Norstar Financial Group's Fleet Credit Corp. unit signed an agreement to acquire the equipment-finance business from the Signal Capital Corp. unit of Itel Corp., Chicago.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Fleet Credit is a leasing and commercial finance concern.  Fleet/Norstar is a financial-services company.  Signal Capital's equipment-finance business has assets of $750 million and will increase Fleet Credit's assets to more than $2 billion, Fleet said.  The acquisition is scheduled to close in early August.  Raw-steel production by the nation's mills increased 0.2% last week to 1,850,000 tons from 1,846,000 tons the previous week, the American Iron and Steel Institute said.  Last week's output fell 3.2% from the 1,911,000 tons produced a year earlier.  The industry used 83.3% of its capability last week, compared with 83.1% the previous week and 89.6% a year ago.  The American Iron and Steel Institute reported:  @ Net tons Capability  @ produced utilization  @ Week to July 22 ............. 1,850,000 83.3%  @ Week to July 15 ............. 1,846,000 83.1%  @ Year to date ............... 57,057,000 88.5%  @ Year earlier to date ....... 56,079,000 89.8%  The capability utilization rate is a calculation designed to indicate at what percent of its production capability the industry is operating in a given week.  A federal judge dismissed before trial four of five claims in an antitrust suit filed by Twin Laboratories Inc., a maker of nutritional supplements for body-builders, against rival Weider Health & Fitness.  In February, Twin Labs filed suit in U.S. District Court in Manhattan, charging that Weider, based in Woodland Hills, Calif., was excluding competition in their industry by denying ad space to Twin Labs in two magazines Weider publishes, Flex and Muscle & Fitness.  In his opinion, District Judge Michael B. Mukasey ruled that Twin Labs, Ronkonkoma, N.Y., hadn't proved that Weider has monopoly power in the market for such nutritional supplements; that Weider had tried to monopolize that market; that ad space in the magazines is essential for Twin Labs to compete, and that Weider interfered with potential economic relations of Twin Labs.  Judge Mukasey left in place, however, a claim that Weider intentionally harmed Twin Labs through acts that otherwise would be lawful.  To prevail on this claim, the judge ruled, Twin Labs must prove specific and measurable losses.  An economist testifying for Twin Labs, Judge Mukasey said, provided enough evidence of such damage to allow the claim to go to trial.  Twin Labs' next move in the case hasn't yet been decided, said David M. Malone, attorney for the company at Rivkin, Radler, Dunne & Bayh in Washington.  Alan R. Malasky, attorney for Weider at Arent, Fox, Kintner, Plotkin & Kahn in Washington, said that "from the outset, the company has believed that its actions have been lawful in all respects and that Twin Labs' antitrust claims were wholly without merit."  Weider also will seek to have the remaining claim dismissed, the attorney said.  MICHAEL BAKER Corp. said it will offer 800,000 common shares for $13 a share.  The Beaver, Pa., consulting, engineering, architectural and maintenance services concern said co-underwriters, PaineWebber Inc. and Legg Mason Wood Walker Inc., have the option for 30 days to buy an additional 120,000 shares from the company to cover over-allotments.  Michael Baker closed yesterday in composite trading on the American Stock Exchange at $13 a share, down 62.5 cents.  ROCHESTER TELEPHONE Corp. said it has set Aug. 7 as the record date for its 2-for-1 stock split, with distribution to begin the first week of September.  The New York State Public Service Commission approved the split at its July 19 meeting.  The telephone utility's board approved the split in March.  As of June 30, there were 11,473,986 common shares outstanding.  Edward Seaton's concern for freedom of the press in Central America seems hypocritical, to say the least ("Nicaraguan Press Law Grants New Rights to Censors," Americas, July 14).  I'd like to hear his views on this matter regarding the "fledgling democracies" of El Salvador and Guatemala.  As he must know, there are far more extreme and violent abuses of the rights of domestic journalists by the government and the military in these countries, which receive scant attention by the media here, than occur in Nicaragua.  Peter J. Stamos  New York  With reference to your July 17 Outlook column, let me assure your readers that Fannie Mae is in superb financial condition.  We support the studies of our company called for in the FSLIC bill to reconfirm that fact.  David O. Maxwell  Chairman and CEO  Federal National Mortgage Association  Washington  Dennis J. Hall, 47-year-old president of the Carrier Transicold unit of United Technologies Corp., was named executive vice president and chief financial officer of this maker of roofing materials and computer tape, succeeding Jerome P. Eichert, 61, who is to take early retirement at year end.  Carlisle is moving to Syracuse from Cincinnati.  Gareth R. Hughes, 44 years old, was appointed to the new post of executive vice president, product planning and development.  He also was nominated to the board, to fill a position that has been vacant for a year.  Maxicare, a health maintenance organization that earlier this year filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of federal bankruptcy law, said Mr. Hughes was previously president and chief operating officer of Mount Co., a Burbank, Calif., entertainment concern, and, prior to that, corporate vice president, industrial relations world-wide, for MCA Inc., Universal City, Calif.  In your July 14 article "Based on the Meetings We Attend, We're Partial to Reclining Chairs" Donald Stone was quoted as stating, "I got into this because secretaries . . . do silly things. . . ."  How wonderful that this man has gotten a position in a university to help undo all the silly things that secretaries do when arranging luncheons, meetings, etc.  Perhaps Mr. Stone should be taking a course in "Speaking on the Record" so that he doesn't say those silly things that unthinking people say.  I'm offended.  This man doesn't know how to make people comfortable.  As a secretary, I am squirming after this article, and my chair fits just fine.  Renee Gold  West Hartford, Conn.  Darrell L. Clark, 47-year-old vice president, financial systems division, was named to the new post of senior vice president, Integrated Systems Group.  Thomas A. Mays, 40, vice president, personal computer division, was named to the new post of senior vice president, General Purpose Products Group.  Both were also named to this computer maker's executive committee.  James G. Adamson, 48, general manager of the Dundee, Scotland, facility, was named vice president in charge of the new self-service systems division, based in Dundee.  William J. Eisenman, 42, general manager of the Columbia, S.C. facility, was named vice president in charge of the multi-user products division.  Frederick D. Wolf, assistant comptroller general of the U.S. General Accounting Office, was admitted to the partnership of this accounting and consulting firm.  Mr. Wolf, 48 years old, will join the financial services practice in Washington Sept. 1.  When a federal employee proposes that American corporate boards be structured like European corporate boards, you know that's a bad, bad idea for U.S. business.  Government attorney Mark S. Nadel (Manager's Journal, June 26) wants American directors to be elected from slates of outsiders who represent specific groups of stockholders. ". . . when management disagreed with policies favored by shareholders, management, not shareholders, would be expected to move on."  This is a recipe for disaster.  Directors would represent competing interest groups, e.g., those wanting maximum short-term dividends, those advancing various political agendas (environmental concerns, South African disinvestment, moral TV programming), those favoring increased investments in basic research, or whatever.  These director blocs would cause stockholder meetings to resemble U.N. debates: lots of rhetoric, little action.  The only ones to gain would be the activists (presumably not businesspeople) elected to such directorships, and lawyers (including perhaps those contemplating a career shift from public to private sector) who represent those activists in stockholder suits against management.  The fatal flaw in this proposal is that it assumes managers need answer only to shareholders.  The truth is management today must balance the concerns of many groups of "stakeholders."  Stockholders are one group; others include customers, employees, vendors, ultimate consumers and society.  Each of these groups (including stockholders) desires, and is entitled to, a set of mutually beneficial exchange relationships with the company.  The best way that any board can "maximize shareholder wealth" is to counsel and assist its management in maintaining that exchange-to-mutual-benefit balance with all stakeholders.  To insist that management focus only on stockholder concerns is a certain recipe for dissatisfied customers, disgruntled employees, etc.  In other words -- disaster.  And if any stockholder is displeased, the remedy is readily available in the marketplace: Sell the stock.  Mr. Nadel sneeringly dismisses this market solution as the "Wall Street Rule."  But the market solution is vastly superior to Mr. Nadel's proposed politicized, "European model" board.  Politics lately has given us Jim Wright and the HUD scandals; few European companies are models of effectiveness.  But investors again are pushing U.S. stocks to record levels.  If it ain't broke. . . .   Ben M. Enis  Professor of Marketing  University of Southern California  Los Angeles  I get weary of the train of thought presented by Jacqueline Hornstein and Anthony G. Lawrence of New York's Adirondack region (Letters, July 14).  This idea that man is the invader of nature and spoiler of the earth in all he does is bunk.  That black flies serve a legitimate, more important purpose than man himself is a shallow thought.  By the same train of thought, diseases such as the Plague, malaria and AIDS should go uncured as they serve a purpose from this great, always correct, Mother Nature.  Ms. Hornstein should be just as appalled to want to add artificially lynx, wolf and moose as that too goes against the strict letter of "forever wild."  The philosophy I always have followed as have the previous generations of man everywhere is expressed early in the Bible from Genesis 1:28, "Fill the earth and conquer it."  John De Lapa  Benton Harbor, Mich.  Poughkeepsie Savings Bank FSB said second-quarter net income dropped 88% because of higher one-time gains a year earlier, a drop in interest income, and higher operating expense.  The thrift's second-quarter net fell to $289,000, or eight cents a share, from $2.6 million, or 73 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  Last week, Poughkeepsie's share price dropped $3, and the Dow Jones Professional Investor Report quoted Richard Morash, a director and dissident shareholder, as attributing the drop to rumors that the company would post higher nonperforming loans.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Poughkeepsie's stock fell 25 cents to close at $16.75 a share.  Such loans rose $7.5 million in the second quarter from the first quarter, but Maurice Kinkade, chairman and chief executive officer, said that loan losses didn't materially increase and the bank made no additional specific provisions for loan losses.  Second-quarter nonperforming loans reached $57.8 million, or 3.4% of assets, from the first quarter's $50.3 million, or 3% of assets.  Pretax gains on the sale of some loan-servicing business dropped to $574,000 from $2.6 million a year earlier.  Net interest income declined because of higher short-term interest rates, which increased the bank's cost of funds.  The higher operating expense was tied to a proxy fight led by Mr. Morash, a Boston investor.  In June, the bank settled with Mr. Morash's group, agreeing to hire an investment adviser to help sell the bank.  Mr. Kinkade said the effort to sell the bank is continuing but that it is too early to assess the likelihood of success.  Closing arguments began in a trial that could have a major impact on the use of the federal racketeering law in future securities-related prosecutions.  The five-week racketeering and fraud trial of five former officials of Princeton/Newport Limited Partnership and a former trader at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. has been closely watched on Wall Street.  It marks the first time that officials of a securities firm have been tried for alleged violations of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law, or RICO.  The law carries heavy sentences and asset forfeitures upon conviction; it also allows for pretrial restraint of defendants' assets.  If the government wins this case, the Justice Department, which must approve RICO charges against defendants, is likely to give prosecutors the go-ahead to bring more such cases.  A loss for the government could result in fewer securities-related RICO cases.  The case may have other ramifications as well.  If a jury succeeds in convicting former Drexel trader Bruce Newberg, who is one of the defendants, prosecutors are understood to be hopeful that Mr. Newberg will cooperate against his former boss, Michael Milken, in exchange for a more lenient sentence.  Mr. Newberg was charged in March along with Mr. Milken, the former head of Drexel's junk bond operations, in a separate indictment.  Both were accused of racketeering, securities fraud, tax fraud and other crimes.  Some of Mr. Milken's alleged crimes involved trading with Princeton/Newport.  In the current case, the government has accused the six defendants of conspiring to create illegitimate tax losses through a series of prearranged securities transactions.  In these deals, Princeton/Newport allegedly sold securities at a loss and then repurchased them by prior agreement at the same or slightly higher prices.  Such a practice is known as stock parking.  In his closing argument, Neil Cartusciello, an assistant U.S. attorney, said the defendants "joined together in a scheme that they knew was wrong."  At Princeton/Newport, Mr. Cartusciello said, the "arrogance is an arrogance that everything is so complicated and so clever that no one will be able to piece it together."  Mr. Cartusciello said that James Sutton Regan, the managing general partner of Princeton/Newport and a defendant in the case, wasn't being truthful when he testified that his firm never had an agreement to park securities at other securities firms, including Drexel, and repurchase them at a set price.  Princeton/Newport tried to conceal the prearranged trades even from its own lawyers and accountants by artificially changing prices of securities and altering its records, Mr. Cartusciello added.  In his closing, Theodore Wells, an attorney for Mr. Regan, said his client and the other Princeton/Newport officials never cheated the government out of taxes and that none of the defendants had derived any financial benefits from the trades.  "Would it be arrogant to commit a crime where you got no money?"  Mr. Wells asked jurors.  "That wouldn't be arrogant; that would be insane," he said.  Mr. Wells said Mr. Regan believed the trades "were legal then and he still thinks they're legal now."  Citing the tape recordings of phone calls that the government has relied on to present the bulk of its case, Mr. Wells said that most of Princeton/Newport's phone calls were recorded by the firm itself.  "Why would you do criminal acts on a taped phone?"  Mr. Wells asked jurors.  Mr. Wells said that the government hadn't proved anything against his client.  "This is a weak case," he said, adding that, under the circumstances, the government owes Mr. Regan an apology for putting him on trial.  Supported by strong domestic demand, Japan's production of cars, trucks and buses in the first half grew 4.2% from a year earlier, to a record 6.6 million units, the Japan Automobile Manufacturers Association said.  In June alone, the association said, production reached about 1.2 million units, a record for the month.  June was the fourth consecutive month in which Japan's motor vehicle production stayed above the year-earlier level.  Association officials, explaining the gains for June and the first half, said robust economic expansion fueled consumer appetites for cars.  "Exports aren't doing so good, but domestic sales are strong, and that's pushing up production," an official said.  Though the association is scheduled to release export statistics for June later this week, overseas shipments are likely to show a year-to-year decline of about 1%, according to officials.  The Japan Automobile Dealers' Association said at the beginning of this month that domestic sales in June climbed 15.5% from a year earlier to 508,319 units, the largest production on record for the month.  It is an article of faith at McDonald's Corp. that you can start at the bottom as a grill man, work hard, and become wildly successful.  To prove this, McDonald's points proudly to Chairman Fred Turner, who began his career flipping hamburgers alongside legendary founder Ray Kroc at age 22.  The Malloy twins got into the business at age 17.  They started with lowly jobs at a McDonald's outlet in New York City's borough of the Bronx.  Figuring that being poor, black and from a housing project would be no barrier to success, Derrick and Dorian Malloy learned the ropes and began their climb, gradually becoming two of the most successful entrepreneurs in the north Bronx.  Today, at age 34, they own two Wendy's International Inc. franchises that do $2.5 million a year in volume, in competition with the McDonald's where they toasted their first buns.  Lately, they have begun diversifying, having bought the right to franchise automated suntan-oil booths in Daytona Beach and Orlando, Fla.  But what is most striking about the Malloys' success is that they attribute much of it to this: learning the McDonald's management rubrics and putting them into practice.  "Learn what the white man has to teach us -- then do it for ourselves," says Derrick Malloy, eight minutes older than his brother.  "You don't have to sell drugs, you don't have to be a stick-up kid."  Blacks are still struggling for a footing in franchising.  In a 1986 Commerce Department survey of 2,177 franchising companies, 1,517 reported no minority franchise owners at all. (The survey did not include certain large franchisers, representing about 25% of all outlets.) Getting loans and capital can be tough because of short track records and the perception that blacks are poor credit risks.  In addition, black franchise owners have complained that they don't get the same opportunities to expand, especially in predominantly white markets, as other franchisees.  Yet the ranks of minority operators are growing, in part because the best companies provide a road map for success.  "Franchising can be a very productive venture -- if you choose the right organization," says Patrick Jones, president of a Chicago venture-capital firm that specializes in minority firms.  "But it isn't for everybody," he warns.  Those who succeed "conform, become a part of the system and do what they're told," says Mr. Jones, who has invested in over 20 minority fast-food franchises over the last 10 years.  The Malloys, advanced-degree graduates of McDonald's "Hamburger University," couldn't agree more.  They're convinced that franchising can be a practical path to entrepreneurship for black youth.  You don't even have to finish college to make it, say the twins, who have about three years of community college between them.  McDonald's taught them how to separate their professional judgment of subordinates from their personal feelings about them -- something that perhaps no amount of schooling could have instilled.  More tangibly, their experience, which began at a McDonald's outlet on Gun Hill Road, near U.S. Highway 1, made them astute record keepers.  For example, they learned to compare bun and burger counts and to detect theft of meat in case of a mismatch.  And on a more sophisticated level, McDonald's taught them how to project future revenue and profit estimates for the purpose of achieving steady growth.  The Malloy twins also learned how to play hardball against competitors, including the very same McDonald's organization where they started -- and adopted several classic tactics of retail warfare.  Their teacher was mainly the New Jersey-based 21st Century Corp., one of McDonald's largest multiple franchisees, with 38 stores in the New York metropolitan area.  The Malloy twins opened their first Wendy's outlet on U.S. Highway 1, about one mile from their former employer.  Quickly, 21st Century leased big outdoor advertisements on either side of the store, pointing motorists to McDonald's.  The billboard war was on.  Then, the twins got word that McDonald's also planned a store north of the new Wendy's -- in perfect position to box them in between the two stores.  To thwart the pincer movement, the twins put a large Wendy's billboard high above the site of the unbuilt McDonald's.  The brothers also laid plans to open their second Wendy's.  Eventually, the competing entrepreneurs reached a truce and removed their billboards, but the battle for that hot northeast corner of New York continues.  "They have to understand -- everything we learned, we learned from them," says Dorian Malloy.  When the Malloys began back in 1972, however, the McDonald's store on Gun Hill Road was typical of the fast-growing urban fast-food store.  Regiments of mostly black youths staffed the store for about $1.50 an hour in shifts, to feed gangs of hungry black kids.  Friends often ate free.  The store had almost no competition for either customers or labor.  The Malloy twins resembled their co-workers in some ways, cutting up with the best of them.  Derrick Malloy jokes that he and his brother got away with pranks because "being identical twins they didn't know who to fire."  But they also vowed that if McDonald's wanted to teach them the business, they would learn to be the best.  A major milestone in that learning process came in 1974, at something called the "All-American," a national McDonald's competition to crown the best sandwich-making crews.  The Malloys, then 19, won the Bronx, and later the entire New York contests, with Derrick going to the national quarter-finals.  They wowed the judges when they turned around to help the sandwich dressers and the bun toasters without skipping a beat on the griddle. (Dorian even changed the garbage bags, washed his hands and got back to his spatula without a burn.)  "The store really went crazy -- that won the contest for the Bronx, it was over," Dorian recalls.  "McDonald's did something for you, it made you feel good about yourself," Derrick says.  As 21st Century grew, the twins rose through the ranks.  By 1984, they had become 21st Century's top black managers.  As corporate and group directors of operations, they had trained many store managers to run profitable restaurants; it was time to get their own.  While they approached McDonald's for a franchise, they also opened a restaurant for their mother, "Mom's Kitchen," right next door to the Gun Hill Road McDonald's.  It was a profitable, though small, thorn in the McDonald's outlet's side, competing 24 hours a day with fried chicken, homemade potato salad and cole slaw, but it was exhausting for the twins, who still held their full-time jobs.  They wanted a McDonald's of their own but, according to the twins, the chain was not very supportive.  A McDonald's spokesman wouldn't comment on the Malloys' efforts.  Moreover, the brothers found that Wendy's required only about half the investment (about $200,000 per store) while offering the chance to own both the land and building (with McDonald's, the franchisee only owns the interior of the store).  Ironically, McDonald's has an aggressive program of identifying minorities, who account for 16% of their owners, for franchise opportunities.  Early in 1985, the Malloys, through a contact at Wendy's, learned of a chance for a store not far from the Gun Hill Road McDonald's.  With $50,000 of their own savings and $50,000 borrowed from a McDonald's supplier who had known them since they were crew workers, they formed a partnership with a white franchise owner, Lee Magnus of New Jersey.  The store, opened in April 1986, put the twins in direct competition with their former employers.  It was this moxie that led Charles King, founder of K-Sun Inc., the suntan-booth company, to choose the Malloys and their partner (the engineer who built the second store) over 50 groups vying to get a crack at developing the Florida markets.  He was impressed by the twins' vision for expansion into an almost all-white market.  "The black {suntan-oil} market -- well, there's not much there -- they just don't burn," says Mr. King.  "But they saw the tremendous potential on the Caucasian side.  Which shows they . . . know a good thing when they see it."  The twins aren't millionaires yet, but they hope to be by age 40.  "We're still looking for that money tree -- where you don't have to put all that much time into it," says Dorian.  "To be honest, I'm a little tired now.  I mean, I'm doing the same thing I've been doing for the last 17 years.  Martin Marietta Corp. said second-quarter profit rose 7% to $86.9 million, or $1.64 a share, despite a slight drop in sales to $1.43 billion.  A year earlier, profit was $81.4 million, or $1.53 a share, on sales of $1.44 billion.  Backlog at the end of the quarter was a record $12 billion, up from $10.8 billion a year earlier.  Norman R. Augustine, chairman and chief executive, said the company "remains optimistic for the full year."  Results were particularly strong in the astronautics group as the company stepped up production of the Titan IV unmanned launch vehicle used to carry heavy payloads into space.  In the first six months, profit was $146.1 million, or $2.76 a share, up from $132.4 million, or $2.49 a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose to $2.75 billion from $2.74 billion.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Martin Marietta closed at $46.125, up 37.5 cents.  President Bush will sign into law this week a bill ending federal wellhead price controls on natural gas, which date back to 1954.  Gas decontrol has been a long time coming, lagging far behind President Reagan's crude-oil price decontrol of 1981.  But better late than never.  What is truly remarkable about gas decontrol is that, in the end, there was little political dispute over the principle of freemarket pricing.  All of the major segments of an industry that once fought tooth and nail for regulatory advantage suddenly seemed to have experienced a miraculous conversion to a concept something like this: "Hey.  In a market system, resources will be managed more efficiently and everyone will gain.  Why didn't we think of this before?"  The American Gas Association, mainly representing local utilities, seems delighted, even though many distributors once thought they needed federal protection against producer market power.  Says George H. Lawrence, president of the AGA: "In this modern natural-gas industry, for the first time in its history, we're without any federal controls or intrusions on the supply or demand side of our business and we think it's going to be fine."  No doubt it will be, not only for the industry but also for the economy, which hasn't had any significant deregulatory boost for several years now.  No one seems to doubt anymore that this big industry, serving business and some 50 million American homes, now will be able to make more efficient use of its huge capital infrastructure of wells, pipelines and gas mains, with benefits to the total economy.  Mr. Lawrence recalls the checkered history of gas controls: "We came out of World War II with a big surplus of natural gas and as we began to build the pipelines to do something with it we ended up with a Supreme Court decision that put on price controls.  It took awhile for that to work a shortage in the interstate market but it did.  Then we began the phased removal of those controls in 1978.  But meantime they put controls on the demand side with the fuel use act.  Then we got rid of that, and now the final curtain is going to drop on the rest of controls.  So really it's sort of a landmark period."  Maybe it required regulatory excess to make the point.  The Supreme Court decision Mr. Lawrence refers to was a gem of judicial activism, the 1954 Phillips Petroleum v.  Wisconsin.  The court ruled that the Federal Power Commission was required by law to fix wellhead prices.  Wisconsin's argument was simple: It didn't want to pay what Phillips wanted to charge.  But the FPC never could quite figure out how to set the price of gas, so it just responded to political pressures and tried to keep the price low.  Supply shortages resulted, shifting demand to oil.  When oil, too, was put under controls in 1971, the country was on its way to an energy "shortage," which ultimately manifested itself in soaring prices, gasoline lines, rationing and cold furnaces.  Even then some politicians chose to blame not controls, but Mother Nature.  We were simply "running out" of fuel, they wailed.  It wasn't until oil was decontrolled that this myth was dispelled.  Oil-product prices went down as the market quickly sorted itself out.  Gas decontrol took more time because there still were politicians locked into the fuddled notion that had motivated the Wisconsin attorney general and the Supreme Court in 1954 -- that natural gas was a "monopoly" industry that needed a price cop.  More to the point, decontrol would have some losers, such as producers who had invested in expensive deep wells, so the politics of that had to be managed.  In the final analysis, natural-gas regulation collapsed of its own weight.  Amid all the energy silliness of the 1970s, Congress passed the 1978 Powerplant and Industrial Fuel Use Act, dictating who could have natural gas and who couldn't.  Homeowners could have it but the act barred the use of both oil and gas for fueling new electrical power plants.  One result was to reduce throughputs in natural-gas pipelines, thus raising the unit cost of each cubic yard of gas moved and boosting the gas bills of homeowners.  This act, coupled with a "tier" system for pricing gas based on its origins, ultimately turned into a regulatory farce.  The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, successor to the FPC, began dismantling this elaborate structure in the mid-1980s and the fuel use act was repealed outright two years ago.  FERC's administrative deregulation deserves much of the credit for this week's denouement, simply because it finally convinced all the players that they were better off in a deregulated environment.  It became increasingly possible for local utilities and industrial customers to shop for gas, signing contracts with producers offering the best deals and thereby generating competition among producers.  Pipelines lost their grip on the market and have been forced by market pressures to become carriers for gas purchased independently from producers.  Even local distributors are offering their lines to bring gas to industrial customers who have made direct contracts.  More intense "gas-to-gas" competition, not to mention continued pressure from alternative fuels, has pushed prices down.  Despite inflation, consumers are paying less for natural gas now, on average, than in 1984.  All of which makes gas a strong competitor against other energy sources.  President Bush's new environmental push could give gas a further boost, perhaps expanding the limited market as a fuel for buses, trucks and cars.  Why do prices go down under decontrol?  Simply because the biggest cost of natural gas at the burner tip is the $100 billion capital infrastructure needed to get it there.  If that infrastructure is used inefficiently, the price goes up.  If producers, transporters and distributors are free to seek the most efficient ways of buying and selling gas, competition and improved efficiency will push the price down.  All this may sound elementary after a decade of economic benefits from a broad range of decontrol measures -- in energy, transportation and communications -- but the learning process was long and tedious.  "The more throughputs you get through the facility, the less it's going to cost the consumer because of the spreading of the fixed costs," says Eugene A. Tracy, chairman of Peoples Energy Corp. of Chicago.  "To the extent that you have increased ability to sell gas, with a supply situation where we have some confidence, you become more efficient.  When they built the Sears building, we couldn't even talk to the Sears people about gas.  It was prohibited for us to sell that quantity of gas under the regulations.  What we have now is an opportunity to market in those areas."  No one worries much about "running out" anymore.  The AGA notes that decontrol already has brought forth supplies from low-cost sources, such as methane deposits in coal seams that once were regarded mainly as a mining hazard.  In a decontrolled market, price regulates usage.  If natural shortages ever should develop, the price will rise and consumers will start to switch to alternative fuels.  But that day is still a very long way off.  It can be hoped that it will be a long time too before the country repeats its costly 35-year experiment with gas controls.  Chrysler Corp.'s Chrysler Motors unit said the base price for its 1990 Eagle Talon sports coupe models is $12,995.  The Talon is built by Diamond-Stars Motors, a joint venture with Mitsubishi Motors Corp., at Normal, Ill.  The Talon TSi Turbo starts at $14,753 while the price for the Talon TSi Turbo AWD (all-wheel drive) is $16,437.  NWA Inc. said a combination of rising fares and increased traffic helped double second quarter net income to a record $70.8 million, or $2.38 a share.  Analysts said NWA's airline unit, Northwest Airlines, benefited from the machinists' strike at Eastern Airlines, which forced such other carriers as American Airlines to shift some of their fleets into Miami and farther away from direct competition with Northwest.  What's more, Northwest wasn't hurt significantly by Eastern's slow rebuilding of its service this summer, offering discount fares to woo passengers.  Many other major U.S. carriers are expected to report second quarter results this week.  Meanwhile, investor Alfred Checchi extended his $121-a-share tender offer for NWA through yesterday as he cleared up financing paperwork and waited for regulatory clearance for the $3.65 billion transaction.  Analysts said the extension doesn't signal any problems with the tender offer, even though Mr. Checchi had expected to wrap up the acquisition as early as Friday, which is when the tender offer was originally slated to expire.  By that time, more than 99% of NWA common shares outstanding had been tendered under the offer, a spokeswoman for Mr. Checchi said.  According to the spokeswoman, Mr. Checchi extended the offer until 5 p.m. EST yesterday, and would probably extend it until he gets regulatory clearance for the purchase.  Mr. Checchi can't complete the purchase until the Federal Trade Commission gives him antitrust clearance.  Mr. Checchi is asking the agency to end early the waiting period required under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Act, which is slated to expire tomorrow.  Also, the Department of Transportation hasn't completed its review of the transaction.  While the department can't block the purchase outright, Transportation Secretary Samuel K. Skinner has expressed concern about the debt the transaction would impose on NWA.  The potential for labor unrest is also clouding the pact.  While two groups of Northwest pilots said last week that they will support Mr. Checchi's acquisition, the pilots' union is on the brink of a confrontation with Northwest Airlines management over contract negotiations, which have been conducted under the supervision of a federal mediator since December.  The two sides appear far from agreement.  Talks broke off on Friday, then resumed yesterday.  NWA attributed the rise in earnings to a 16% jump in traffic and a 3.2% increase in yield, or revenue passenger miles, from a year earlier.  In the 1988 quarter, NWA earned $28.4 million, or 97 cents a share.  NWA said second quarter operating revenues climbed 19.3% to $1.65 billion from $1.38 billion for the 1988 quarter.  In the first six months, net was $83.3 million, or $2.82 a share, compared with a year-earlier loss of $15.1 million.  Operating revenue rose 19.3% to $3.13 billion from $2.62 billion.  Candid Comment  To some people, listening means impatiently waiting for a place to insert "that reminds me. . . ."   -- Ivern Ball.  ---  Summer Bulletin  Picnics are occasions where people have their outings and insects have their innings.  -- B. Bader.  From Charles Krauthammer's July 21 column in the Washington Post:  Consider today's prices.  Each Stealth goes for no more than nine Van Goghs.  Procter & Gamble Co., moving to trim costs, said it will close a Chicago soap plant next year.  Analysts said the closing could cost as much as $35 million, or 20 cents a share, in the fiscal 1989 fourth quarter ended June 30.  The Cincinnati consumer products concern, which rarely shutters a facility, said the 59-year-old plant will be closed because it is more profitable to move production to other existing U.S. plants.  The plant makes Lava, Camay and Safeguard bar soaps and liquid Ivory hand soap as well as glycerin for industrial customers.  Some of the facility's 275 workers will be offered transfers to other locations, but a company spokeswoman declined to say how many would be dismissed.  Analysts said the move is expected to hurt P&G's otherwise rosy year-end results, which will be announced in early August.  P&G officials in early June told analysts their estimates of $7.03 to $7.15 were too low.  In a recent interview, John G. Smale, chairman and chief executive officer, said that while he doesn't project earnings, he considered analysts' predictions that the company would earn about $7.25 a share as reasonable.  Last year, P&G earned $1.02 billion, or $5.96 a share.  Strong international growth and gains in domestic health-care product markets will boost earnings from continuing operations above the $7.25-a-share figure, according to information provided recently to analysts by the company.  P&G officials confirmed the closing will require a one-time write-off in the fourth quarter.  They declined to quantify what the plant closing will cost, but confirmed it will have a material impact on year-end results.  The range of estimates on the charge is 10 cents to 20 cents a share.  In the fiscal 1988 fourth quarter the company earned $140 million, or 82 cents a share, on sales of $4.97 billion.  Effects of the plant closing caused some analysts to revise their estimates once again.  Jack Salzman at Goldman, Sachs & Co., for instance, revised his estimate downward to $7.10 to $7.15 a share from $7.30 to $7.35 a share.  Still, analysts agreed the plant closing is a good move: "P&G is very cost conscious and profit focused," said Jay Freedman, analyst at Kidder, Peabody & Co.  The closing, while it affects only 275 of the company's 44,800 domestic employees, is unusual because P&G is often considered a lifetime employer.  "It's rare for them to close a plant and lay off people," said Joseph Kozloff, analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  It is also a further sign of steady progress by P&G in trimming layers of managers.  For instance, P&G has streamlined its brand management by grouping products into categories.  "A lot of people have been waiting for P&G to restructure," said Lynne Hyman, analyst with First Boston Corp.  "They're doing it bit by bit."  P&G closed yesterday in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange at $117.625, up 12.5 cents.  Employers are starting to consider providing benefits for unmarried mates of employees, but the practice still faces financial, tax and insurance problems, as well as political opposition from conservative groups that see homosexuals as the main beneficiaries.  Still in embryonic stages, partner benefits and policies have been adopted in recent years by almost a dozen employers.  Cities, including Madison, Wis., and Berkeley, Calif., have led the way in awarding sick and bereavement leave for workers with unmarried mates.  In San Francisco, voters will decide this fall on a domestic-partners ordinance that would, among other things, provide sick and bereavement leave for city workers.  "The issue is on the table," says Raymond Kann, managing partner for Hewitt Associates, a Lincolnshire, Ill., benefits and compensation firm that advises 2,500 companies.  "What direction it takes or how it is implemented is still not clear."  The issue is surfacing mainly among public employers because they are more susceptible to political pressure from gay groups, but it isn't lost on companies.  At a meeting this spring of 500 corporate compensation executives, the issue received top billing; two years ago, it was scarcely mentioned.  Among Hewitt's West Coast clients, 10% to 20% are studying some partner benefits, compared with none in 1984.  The impetus behind the drive is simple.  Forty percent of an average worker's total annual compensation will be paid out in benefits next year, up from 35.4% in 1975, according to Hewitt Associates.  And with health-care costs surging, health coverage especially is a coveted benefit for unmarried partners who don't already have it.  But partner benefits face a variety of obstacles.  Because the main boosters are homosexuals, such proposals can run into political problems.  In Madison, opposition from church groups helped thwart an effort by city officials to extend health-care benefits to workers' unmarried mates.  "We ran into a firestorm of controversy -- more than I expected," says James L. McFarland, a Madison city-council member who introduced the doomed measure.  The lack of health benefits is nettlesome to Alix Olson and Martha Popp.  Ms. Olson, a city police detective, can't get health coverage for Ms. Popp, her companion of 13 years, or Ms. Popp's two children.  "We take our kids to school, we pay our taxes," says Ms. Popp, a substitute teacher without health coverage.  "Then to turn around and not be allowed to have benefits -- it wears away on you."  Many employers are skittish about extending health benefits because of cost -- though programs in Berkeley and West Hollywood, Calif., haven't been extraordinarily expensive.  In West Hollywood, where the switch to a partner plan was accompanied by the adoption of self-insurance and a so-called cafeteria-style plan -- allowing employees to choose the benefits they want -- the city's health costs fell.  In Seattle, a push for partner benefits has been stymied, at least temporarily, by tax considerations.  Because domestic partners don't fit the Internal Revenue Service's definition of a family, Seattle officials believe, such benefits may not be tax-deductible for employers and would be taxable income for employees.  Seattle asked the IRS for a ruling earlier this year.  If the city's doubts are confirmed, existing programs elsewhere could be scaled back sharply.  But they might not be eliminated, for the tax code would leave an opening in some cases: An unrelated person may be viewed as a dependent if an individual provides at least 50% of that person's support and if cohabiting couples don't violate local ordinances.  Insurance-industry reluctance also has made it hard for employers to offer partner benefits.  So far, not enough employers provide such benefits to provide enough data to quantify an insurer's risk, industry officials say.  "It's the big unknowns that make insurance companies uneasy," says a spokeswoman for the Health Insurance Association of America.  But advocacy groups, most of them gay, say the reasons insurers give are smoke screens that hide industry concern and biases about AIDS and homosexuals who might enroll in partner-benefits plans.  The health-insurance association denies the charge, saying that AIDS claims are still dwarfed by other catastrophic illnesses such as heart disease.  West Hollywood, a city of 38,000 people with a large gay population, was turned down by all 16 insurance companies it asked to underwrite the city's partners plan.  City officials say insurers told them they had no previous experience in underwriting such benefits.  So West Hollywood chose to self-insure its health coverage starting Jan. 1.  So far, with partner benefits and the cafeteria plan in place, the city has saved money.  For the first six months of this year, it paid $35,000 in premiums, compared with an estimated $100,000 it would have paid its commercial carrier for less complete coverage without partner benefits.  The self-financed plan provides up to $20,000 a year in medical coverage for each employee or domestic partner.  Above that amount, the city offers insurance for employees, but partners have to find their own additional coverage.  Under the plan, the city's total exposure is $168,000; the balance is covered by a reinsurance firm.  David Amorena, a city planner, says the program has enabled him to provide better health benefits to his partner, Joe Lucas, an actor with minimal insurance from an actors' union.  Partner coverage, says Mr. Amorena, "is one of the benefits of working for a municipality."  Outside directors at Par Pharmaceutical Inc. began investigating the generic-drug concern's research operations after the company said it filed false drug information with the Food and Drug Administration.  The company also said it was recalling one of its drugs and had stopped selling two others.  The announcement, which hammered Par's shares, followed the implication of the Spring Valley, N.Y., company in a federal criminal investigation of the FDA's drug-approval process.  Just over a week ago, Par said it and a 60%-owned unit would plead guilty to providing an unlawful gratuity to an FDA employee.  Two company officials previously resigned and agreed to plead guilty in the inquiry.  An FDA spokesman said the agency began following up the criminal probe several weeks ago with its own investigation of Par.  Par's stock yesterday fell $1.625 a share to close at $8.375 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The latest disclosure indicates the company's problems with the FDA are far from over.  "We're looking into the whole management of the company from many points of view, both in terms of people and overall internal controls," said Photios T. Paulson, one of the outside directors who is supervising the independent review of Par's research and development activities and record-keeping systems.  "We want to assure that the business of Par is affected as little as possible and that we continue to correct certain things and continue to build the business," Mr. Paulson added.  Par said it has begun a voluntary recall of its generic version of the anti-hypertensive drug Maxzide and has voluntarily stopped shipments of it.  Mr. Paulson said the company had received information from an executive indicating that certain product samples given to an FDA official during a recent inspection were intentionally drawn from a batch that was different from the one the inspector was told they came from.  Representatives of Par met late last week with FDA officials to alert it to the false information.  At that time, Par said, it also discussed with the FDA the status of two other approved products that it had withdrawn from sale before the meeting.  The company said it is investigating whether a recall of one of the products would be appropriate.  Par didn't identify the other products or say why it stopped selling them.  The FDA, however, identified the drugs as the generic equivalents of Orphengesic Forte, a muscle relaxant, and Valproic Acid, an anti-convulsant.  The agency said it found record-keeping discrepancies involving the two drugs.  It is unclear whether the problems of false information or record-keeping discrepancies involved any of Par's other drugs, but the FDA said it was considering looking at the records of other products.  Mr. Paulson said that so far, the drugs mentioned are the only ones he knows that are affected.  "But obviously, we have suspicions" about the possibility of false information being given on others, he said.  The company announced that R.K. Patel, one of Par's founders, took a voluntary leave of absence as senior vice president and director, and that Jeffrey M. Levine, executive vice president, and Barry S. Geller, vice president, regulatory affairs, took voluntary leaves of absence from the board.  Par, which had fiscal 1988 sales of $99.6 million from a line of several hundred products, said it didn't believe there were any adverse health or safety implications involved.  The company said it was cooperating fully with the FDA.  Rep. John Dingell, chairman of the House Energy and Commerce Committee, said in a statement, "This sorry spectacle shows the need for far better regulation than the generic-drug industry has received to date."  A former model for Winston cigarettes says the ads he made were "designed to appeal to children and teen-agers" and he "was told very clearly that young people were the market we were after."  The model, David Goerlitz, is scheduled to testify about the ads at a Congressional subcommittee hearing today on a proposed bill that would severely restrict cigarette advertising -- especially ads seen by children.  His testimony is expected to be among the most controversial of that of some 25 experts planning to testify on both sides of the proposed bill.  In his prepared testimony, Mr. Goerlitz says that RJR Nabisco marketing experts interviewed teen-agers in shopping malls, showing them pictures of him and other "Winston men" to choose the most effective photos for ads -- a charge RJR flatly denies.  "The other models and I were depicted as young and daring buddies, and that's what young people relate to at 14 or 15 years old," Mr. Goerlitz says.  "When the tobacco industry tells you that it doesn't want your children to smoke, that's a big lie."  The bill proposed by Rep. Tom Luken (D., Ohio) would prohibit those cigarette ads that can be seen by kids from using pictures or images, basically only allowing all-text "tombstone" ads.  The bill, co-sponsored by Rep. Bob Whittaker (R., Kan.), would also ban vending-machine sales of cigarettes in places accessible to children.  Rep. Luken last year unsuccessfully proposed an outright ban on cigarette advertising, and it is far from clear whether he can muster support for his modified bill.  But he is benefiting from the current extremely cautious, conservative advertising environment.  After Lark cigarettes paid $350,000 to be included in the current James Bond film, "Licence to Kill," for example, the movie's producers added a health warning in the film's ending credits, a move Rep. Luken has been demanding.  Yesterday, Rep. Luken's office learned that all references to Lark cigarettes will be deleted when the film is shown on TV in the U.S.  The Surgeon General's health warning will remain at the end.  In a letter to Rep. Luken, Michael G. Wilson, one of the film's producers, wrote, "Our attorneys were of the opinion that Lark cigarettes were not being advertised in the film."  But he added that the addition of the warning and other steps were being taken "in light of the public interest and to avoid controversy."  Meanwhile, the advertising industry has already organized for a fight against Rep. Luken's bill.  Representatives from more than half a dozen advertising trade groups are expected to testify today, as is a law professor specializing in First Amendment issues.  The proposed bill, by prohibiting images and color in advertising, "is a transparent attempt to ban all tobacco advertising by making it so unattractive," contends DeWitt F. Helm, president of the Association of National Advertisers.  Mr. Helm and Burt Neuborne, a professor of law at New York University, also plan to assert that the proposed bill violates First Amendment protection of speech.  Mr. Neuborne says in his prepared testimony that if the bill were to pass, "the temptation will be overwhelming to use the new censorship tool against other disfavored speech."  Mr. Neuborne also contends that there is a "total lack of empirical data linking smoking in children to the mere use of color and imagery in tobacco advertising."  Advertisers are afraid that if cigarette advertising is curtailed in any way, other restrictions will surely follow.  Indeed, ever since cigarette TV commercials were banned in the early 1970s, pressure has been mounting to curtail other types of cigarette advertising as well.  Tobacco advertising accounted for about $620 million in ad revenue in 1987, according to Advertising Age.  While spending has been shrinking -- the level was $729 million in 1986 -- cigarette ads still provide a major source of revenue for a number of magazines and newspapers.  While no cigarette companies are scheduled to testify, an RJR Nabisco spokeswoman questioned the prepared testimony of Mr. Goerlitz, the former Winston model.  She said Mr. Goerlitz approached RJR last year in hopes of becoming a spokesman on behalf of smokers' rights, but RJR declined.  She said Mr. Goerlitz asked when his RJR contract expired and indicated he would seek to become a smokers' rights spokesman at another tobacco firm.  "Goerlitz was hired as a model, never a marketing consultant," the spokeswoman added.  "He wasn't qualified to make the assessment he is now making, and those assessments are patently false."  She said Winston never has and never would advertise to people under the age of 18, and added that no consumer research ever included participation by children.  Mr. Goerlitz said he had considered an offer to become a smokers' rights advocate for an RJR competitor in June, 1988 -- while he was still a smoker -- and that he called RJR to learn when his contract would expire.  But he said he quit smoking a few months later, after visiting his brother in a cancer ward.  While his brother wasn't suffering from lung cancer, others in the ward were, and "there was nothing like the insurmountable guilt of the Winston man walking around a cancer ward."  Mr. Goerlitz said he appeared in 42 Winston ads between 1981 and 1987, generally in action sequences in which he and other models were shown acting out daring mountain rescues.  "What I did for the past seven years is wrong," he said.  "I glamorized something that kills you."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   EARNINGS: Interpublic Group of Cos., New York, said second-quarter 1989 net income rose 17% to $28.3 million, or 84 cents a share, vs. $24.2 million, or 73 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  NEW ACCOUNTS: Quaker State Minit-Lube, Oil City, Pa., awarded its $10 million account to Chiat/Day/Mojo, Los Angeles.  The account had been handled since 1981 by Evans Communications, Salt Lake City.  Quaker State Minit-Lube is a unit of Quaker State Corp. . . .  Romann & Tannenholz, a New York agency, announced several recent new-business wins: ABC Carpet Co., Georgette Klinger and Furyo, a French menswear designer.  It also picked up a new product assignment from Hamilton Beach.  Total billings are $11 million.  MINORITY STAKE: Capital Cities/ABC acquired a minority interest in In-Store Advertising, a New York-based maker of electronic over-the-aisle billboard systems that display brand and pricing messages to shoppers.  Capital Cities could use the partnership to sell media packages that combine in-store promotions with network-TV buys.  Robert F. Radin was named president of the shareholder services group, a new post at the financial and travel services company.  He had been executive vice president overseeing the mutual fund transfer agent operations of Boston Co., a subsidiary of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., itself majority-held by American Express.  Shareholder services, which provides record keeping and funds transfers, was purchased from Boston Co. in June. 